On the inclusion of collisional correlations in quantum dynamics
We present a formalism to describe collisional correlations responsible for thermalization effects in finite quantum systems. The approach consists in a stochastic extension of time dependent mean field theory. Correlations are treated in time dependent perturbation theory and loss of coherence is assumed at some time intervals allowing a stochastic reduction of the correlated dynamics in terms of a stochastic ensemble of time dependent mean-fields. This theory was formulated long ago in terms of density matrices but never applied in practical cases because of its complexity. We propose here a reformulation of the theory in terms of wave functions and use a simplified 1D model of cluster and molecules allowing to test the theory in a schematic but realistic manner. We illustrate the performance in terms of several observables, in particular global moments of the density matrix and single particle entropy built on occupation numbers. The occupation numbers remain fixed in time dependent mean-field propagation and change when evaluating the correlations, then taking fractional values. They converge asymptotically towards Fermi distributions which is a clear indication of thermalization.


Quantum theory as a description of robust experiments: Derivation of the Pauli equation
It is shown that the Pauli equation and the concept of spin naturally emerge from logical inference applied to experiments on a charged particle under the conditions that (i) space is homogeneous (ii) the observed events are logically independent, and (iii) the observed frequency distributions are robust with respect to small changes in the conditions under which the experiment is carried out. The derivation does not take recourse to concepts of quantum theory and is based on the same principles which have already been shown to lead to e.g. the Schrödinger equation and the probability distributions of pairs of particles in the singlet or triplet state. Application to Stern–Gerlach experiments with chargeless, magnetic particles, provides additional support for the thesis that quantum theory follows from logical inference applied to a well-defined class of experiments.
[1] R.T. Cox Amer. J. Phys. 14 1946 1 13 [2] R.T. Cox The Algebra of Probable Inference 1961 Johns Hopkins University Press Baltimore [3] M. Tribus Rational Descriptions, Decisions and Designs 1999 Expira Press Stockholm [4] C.R. Smith G. Erickson J. Skilling Maximum Entropy and Bayesian Methods 1989 Kluwer Academic Publishers Dordrecht 29 44 [5] E.T. Jaynes Probability Theory: The Logic of Science 2003 Cambridge University Press Cambridge [6] E.T. Jaynes Phys. Rev. 106 1957 620 640 [7] E.T. Jaynes Phys. Rev. 108 1957 171 190 [8] H. De Raedt M.I. Katsnelson K. Michielsen Ann. Phys. 347 2014 45 73 [9] B.L. van der Waerden M. Fierz V.W. Weisskopf Theoretical Physics in the Twentieth Century: A Memorial Volume to Wolfgang Pauli 1960 Interscience New York [10] W. Pauli Z. Phys. 31 1924 373 385 [11] W. Pauli Z. Phys. 43 1927 601 [12] D. Bohm R. Schiller J. Tiomno Nuovo Cimento Series 10 1 1955 48 66 [13] T. Takabayasi Progr. Theoret. Phys. 14 1955 232 [14] H. Batelaan T.J. Gay J.J. Schwendiman Phys. Rev. Lett. 79 1997 4517 4521 [15] J.E. Sherwood T.K. Stephenson S. Bernstein Phys. Rev. 96 1954 1546 1548 [16] D. Griffiths Introduction to Elementary Particles 1987 Wiley New York [17] W. Heisenberg Z. Phys. 77 1932 1 11 [18] M.I. Katsnelson Graphene: Carbon in Two Dimensions 2012 Cambridge Univ. Press Cambridge [19] A. Khrennikov Beyond Quantum 2014 Pan Stanford Publishing Singapore [20] G. ’t Hooft Found. Phys. Lett. 10 1997 105 111 [21] K. De Raedt H. De Raedt K. Michielsen Comp. Phys. Comm. 171 2005 19 39 [22] G. ’t Hooft T.M. Nieuwenhuizen B. Mehmani V. S˘pic˘ka M.J. Aghdami A.~Yu Khrennikov Beyond the Quantum 2007 World Scientific, Singapore 3 19 [23] K. Michielsen F. Jin H. De Raedt J. Comput. Theor. Nanosci. 8 2011 1052 1080 [24] H. De Raedt K. Michielsen Ann. Phys. (Berlin) 524 2012 393 410 [25] H. De Raedt F. Jin K. Michielsen Quantum Matter 1 2012 1 21 [26] Hans De Raedt Kristel Michielsen Front. Phys. 2 2014 [27] K. Michielsen H. De Raedt Internat. J. Modern Phys. C 25 2014 01430003 [28] Website, For additional information see,  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Robust_optimization . [29] L.E. Ballentine Quantum Mechanics: A Modern Development 2003 World Scientific Singapore [30] J.P. Ralston, Emergent mechanics, quantum and un-quantum, in: Proc. SPIE 8832, 88320W1–25, 2013. [31] P.R. Wallace Phys. Rev. 71 1947 622 634 [32] M. Creutz J. High Energy Phys. 0804 2008 17 [33] G.E. Volovik JETP Lett. 90 2010 697 704 [34] J.P. Ralston, Revising your world-view of the fundamental constants, in: Proc. SPIE 8832, 883216–1–16, 2013. [35] E. Madelung Z. Phys. 40 1927 322 326 [36] T.C. Wallstrom Phys. Rev. A 49 1994 1613 1617 [37] G.E. Volovik R.T. Jantzen H. Kleinert R. Ruffini Proceedings of the Eleventh Marcel Grossmann Meeting on General Relativity 2009 World Scientific Singapore 350 [38] S.P. Novikov Uspekhi Mat. Nauk. 37 1982 3 49 [39] W. Gerlach O. Stern Z. Phys. 9 1922 349 352 [40] D. Bohm Phys. Rev. 85 1952 166 179 [41] T. Takabayasi Progr. Theoret. Phys. 8 1952 143 [42] T. Takabayasi Progr. Theoret. Phys. 2 1954 810 [43] D. Bohm R. Schiller Nuovo Cimento Series 10 1 1955 67 91 [44] R. Schiller Phys. Rev. 125 1962 1116 1123 [45] M. Reginatto Phys. Lett. A 249 1998 355 357 [46] H. De Raedt, M.I. Katsnelson, K. Michielsen, Quantum theory as the most robust description of reproducible experiments: application to a rigid linear rotator, in: Proc. SPIE 8832, 883212–1–11, 2013. [47] A.E. Allahverdyan R. Balian Th.~M. Nieuwenhuizen Phys. Rep. 525 2013 1 166 [48] G. Pólya Mathematics and Plausible Reasoning 1954 Princeton University Press Princeton [49] J.M. Keynes A Treatise on Probability 1921 Macmillan London [50] W. Feller An Introduction to Probability Theory and its Applications, vol. 1 1968 Wiley  &  Sons New York [51] G.R. Grimmet D.R. Stirzaker Probability and Random Processes 1995 Clarendon Press Oxford

The Casimir effect for fields with arbitrary spin
The Casimir force arises when a quantum field is confined between objects that apply boundary conditions to it. In a recent paper we used the two-spinor calculus to derive boundary conditions applicable to fields with arbitrary spin in the presence of perfectly reflecting surfaces. Here we use these general boundary conditions to investigate the Casimir force between two parallel perfectly reflecting plates for fields up to spin-2. We use the two-spinor calculus formalism to present a unified calculation of well-known results for spin-1/2 (Dirac) and spin-1 (Maxwell) fields. We then use our unified framework to derive new results for the spin-3/2 and spin-2 fields, which turn out to be the same as those for spin-1/2 and spin-1. This is part of a broader conclusion that there are only two different Casimir forces for perfectly reflecting plates—one associated with fermions and the other with bosons.


Spectrally resolved photon echo spectroscopy of Zn(II), Co(II) and Ni(II)–octaethyl porphyrins
Graphical abstractSpectrally resolved femtosecond three-pulse photon echo signal from some metal–octaethyl porphyrins (M–OEPs) like Zn(II)–OEP, Ni(II)–OEP, Co(II)–OEP is reported.


Equation of motion coupled cluster theory calculations of the X-ray emission spectroscopy of water
The equation of motion coupled cluster theory including single and double excitations (EOM-CCSD) method is applied to study the X-ray emission spectroscopy of water. For the 1b1 orbital, a difference of about 0.7eV is predicted between a tetrahedrally coordinated water molecule and a water molecule in which water molecules accepting hydrogen bonds are absent, and as a proton is dissociated emission from the 1b1 and 3a1 orbitals become closer in energy. The resonantly excited X-ray emission spectrum for the 4a1 orbital shows a red-shift in the bands and a reduction in intensity for the 3a1 band.


Controlling the femtosecond laser-driven transformation of dicyclopentadiene into cyclopentadiene
Dynamics of the chemical transformation of dicyclopentadiene into cyclopentadiene in a supersonic molecular beam is elucidated using femtosecond time-resolved degenerate pump–probe mass spectrometry. Control of this ultrafast chemical reaction is achieved by using linearly chirped frequency modulated pulses. We show that negatively chirped femtosecond laser pulses enhance the cyclopentadiene photoproduct yield by an order of magnitude as compared to that of the unmodulated or the positively chirped pulses. This demonstrates that the phase structure of femtosecond laser pulse plays an important role in determining the outcome of a chemical reaction.


Stability and dynamics of vacancy in graphene flakes: Edge effects
Density functional theory calculations show that graphene flakes with monovacancy at the edge are energetically more stable than the flakes with vacancy in the middle. The energies of metastable and transition states for one step of vacancy motion towards the edge are calculated. We show that thermally activated motion of vacancy towards the edge occurs even at room temperature whereas the probability of return motion back to the middle is negligible. Molecular dynamics simulations of the vacancy motion in graphene flakes confirm this conclusion. The obtained results explain the mechanisms driving structural transformations in graphene.


Vibrational energy transfer in N(2D)+N2 collisions: A quasiclassical trajectory study
Rate coefficients for the N(2D)+N2 collisions were calculated employing quasiclassical trajectories and the first available set of potential energy surfaces for such excited nitrogen interactions. The details of the vibrational energy transfer are discussed, such as the contributions from reactive and non-reactive trajectories as well as the contribution of each electronic symmetry. The calculated state-to-state and state-to-all rate coefficients show that deactivation is far more probable than excitation, and multi-quanta deactivation play an important role.


Absorption cross-sections of hole polarons in glassy and β-phase polyfluorene
Absorption induced by electrochemically injected holes is studied in poly-9,9-dioctylfluorene (PFO) films. Injected charges form positive polarons which are delocalised over four fluorene units in the glassy phase and about seven fluorene units in its β-phase. Polaron absorption cross-sections at the 640nm peak are similar to the published values of chemically reduced oligofluorenes in solution. The absorption cross-section of polaron in the β-phase at 470nm is about eight times smaller than the stimulated emission cross-section derived from published data. This indicates that β-phase-rich PFO is an attractive candidate for a light-emitting layer in double-heterostructure organic laser diodes.


Multiple transition states and roaming in ion–molecule reactions: A phase space perspective
We provide a dynamical interpretation of the recently identified ‘roaming’ mechanism for molecular dissociation reactions in terms of geometrical structures in phase space. These are NHIMs (Normally Hyperbolic Invariant Manifolds) and their stable/unstable manifolds that define transition states for ion–molecule association or dissociation reactions. The associated dividing surfaces rigorously define a roaming region of phase space, in which both reactive and non reactive trajectories can be trapped for arbitrarily long times.


Free energy basin-hopping
A global optimisation scheme is presented using basin-hopping with the acceptance criterion based on approximate free energy for the corresponding local minima of the potential energy. The method is illustrated for atomic and colloidal clusters and peptides to examine how the predicted global free energy minimum changes with temperature. Using estimates for the local free energies based on harmonic vibrational densities of states provides a computationally effective framework for predicting trends in structure at finite temperature. The resulting scheme represents a powerful tool for exploration of energy landscapes throughout molecular science.


Polymorphism of dioctyl-terthiophene within thin films: The role of the first monolayer
The origins of specific polymorphic phases within thin films are still not well understood. The polymorphism of the molecule dioctyl-terthiophene is investigated during the presence of a silicon-oxide surface during the crystallisation process. It is found that a monolayer of molecules forms two-dimensional crystals on the surface. In the case of thicker films crystalline islands are formed, a comparison of the three polymorphic phases observed within thin films and the thermodynamically more stable single crystal phases reveals distinct differences which can be related to an adaption of the molecular packing with the flat surface of the substrate.


Protective effect of ascorbic acid against double-strand breaks in giant DNA: Marked differences among the damage induced by photo-irradiation, gamma-rays and ultrasound
The protective effect of ascorbic acid against double-strand breaks in DNA was evaluated by single-molecule observation of giant DNA (T4 DNA; 166kbp) through fluorescence microscopy. Samples were exposed to three different forms of radiation: visible light, γ-ray and ultrasound. With regard to irradiation with visible light, 1mM AA reduced the damage down to ca. 30%. Same concentration of AA decreased the damage done by γ-ray to ca. 70%. However, AA had almost no protective effect against the damage caused by ultrasound. This significant difference is discussed in relation to the physico-chemical mechanism of double-strand breaks depending on the radiation source.


In situ observation of the oxidation of S32101 duplex stainless steel at 900°C
Duplex stainless steel exhibits a dual phase microstructure of austenite islands in a ferrite matrix. The oxidation characteristics of the phases depend on the composition within them. High temperature, in situ SEM observation of the growing oxide on a duplex stainless steel has shown differences in the morphologies of the oxide on the two phases. Cross-sections through the oxide, and at phase boundaries reveal that the structures and thicknesses of the oxides on the two phases differ and that there is enhanced oxide growth at the phase boundary which may be due to enhanced diffusion of manganese.


On-site transient analysis for the corrosion assessment of reinforced concrete
A range of methods exist to assess the condition of steel reinforcement in concrete. The analysis of the transient response to a small perturbation has been employed successfully in laboratories to assess corrosion. This work examines a simplified method for the application of transient analysis to in situ reinforced concrete structures. The complex analysis has been simplified and undertaken with the use of common spreadsheet packages. The results illustrate that transient response analysis is a viable technique for use on site and appears to provide a more accurate representation of steel corrosion current densities at very low values than polarisation resistance.


Chromia layer growth on a Ni-based superalloy: Sub-parabolic kinetics and the role of titanium
Oxidation of the Ni-based superalloy RR1000 has been undertaken in air over the temperature range 600–900°C for times up to 5000h. The surface oxide consisted of a protective Ti-doped chromia layer but with rutile forming on its outer surface. Sub-surface oxidation of Al and Ti also occurred. The thickening kinetics of the chromia layer were sub-parabolic with initial rates around two orders of magnitude higher than expected for Ti-free chromia. This enhancement and the sub-parabolic kinetics are accounted for by Ti-doping of the chromia layer. Over time the enhancement reduced because of Ti-depletion in the alloy.


Influence of plasma electrolytic oxidation on fatigue performance of AZ61 magnesium alloy
The effect of plasma electrolytic oxidation (PEO) on the fatigue of AZ61 magnesium alloy has been investigated under high cycle conditions in air and 3.5% NaCl solution. PEO employed an alkaline pyrophosphate–silicate–fluoride electrolyte, with an offset square waveform, a frequency of 50Hz, and current density of 130mAcm−2. The PEO treatment led to reductions in the fatigue limit by 38% in air and by 56% in 3.5% NaCl solution. The reduction of the fatigue limit is attributed to cracking of the coating, roughness of the alloy/coating interface, corrosion and influences of Al–Mn particles.


Time-lapse synchrotron X-ray diffraction to monitor conservation coatings for heritage lead in atmospheres polluted with oak-emitted volatile organic compounds
We discuss the effectiveness of a lead tetradecanoate coating on lead to protect against harmful volatile organic compounds emitted from oak. The oak volatile organic compounds were characterized by GCMS and the major constituent was found to be acetic acid. Under the test conditions, the coating decreases the rate of corrosion by up to 75% compared to bare lead. The thickness of corrosion products on the sample was also calculated thus demonstrating the power of the time-lapse synchrotron radiation X-ray diffraction technique to deliver a quantitative estimate of the effectiveness of the coating.


A new combinatorial approach to assess the influence of alloy composition on the oxidation behavior and concurrent oxygen-induced phase transformations for binary Ti–xCr alloys at 650°C
Poor oxidation performance of Ti-based alloys is an important life-limiting factor for high temperature applications. In this paper, a combinatorial approach is used to investigate systematically the influence of composition and time on the oxidation of Ti–Cr system. A compositionally graded Ti–xCr specimen (0⩽x⩽40wt%) was prepared and oxidized at 650°C. The structure and composition of the oxide and near-surface region were studied and a critical composition of ∼20wt% Cr was identified above which the oxidation resistance is enhanced. Below the critical composition transition to a rapid breakaway oxidation was observed for extended exposure times.


Observation of the effect of surface roughness on the oxidation of Zircaloy-4
Zirconium alloys are used as fuel cladding in light water reactors. Surface preparation techniques that might impair oxidation resistance would limit the lifetime of the cladding and therefore prevent higher burn-up of fuels. The work presented here investigates the impact of surface roughness on the oxidation kinetics of Zircaloy-4 in 400°C steam for exposures up to 275 days. The work shows well defined differences in oxidation kinetics between sample preparations following ∼84 days oxidation. Scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and image analysis of samples in cross section allows for an assessment of the variation in surface roughness between samples at different stages of oxidation.


Synchrotron X-ray radiography studies of pitting corrosion of stainless steel: Extraction of pit propagation parameters
In situ synchrotron X-ray radiography was used to observe the evolution of 2D pits growing at the edge of stainless steel foils in chloride solutions of varying concentrations under current and potential control. A method was developed for measuring the local anodic current density along the perimeter of pits from the rate of advance of the pit into the metal. Pit depth tends to increase with time with kinetics consistent with diffusion control (under a salt layer), whereas lateral development (on film-free surfaces) is influenced by solution conductivity. Perforated covers formed on pits control their growth and stability.


Effect of sulphate impurity in chromic acid anodizing of aluminium
The formation of porous anodic alumina during potentiostatic anodizing of aluminium for times up to 900s has been investigated using two grades of chromic oxide reagent. The anodic films were examined by ion beam analysis and scanning and transmission electron microscopies. Sulphate impurity in the chromic acid led to incorporation of sulphate into the anodic film, a lower current density, a smaller cell size and less feathering of the pore walls. In addition, the efficiency of film formation was increased. The sulphate concentration in the film was greatly enhanced relative to the electrolyte.


Micro-mechanical measurement of fracture behaviour of individual grain boundaries in Ni alloy 600 exposed to a pressurized water reactor environment
A micro-mechanical technique is used to determine values of the critical stress intensity factor for fracture for grain boundaries of various orientations in Ni alloy 600 exposed to Pressurized Water Reactor (PWR) primary water at 325°C with a hydrogen partial pressure of 30kPa. Pentagonal cross-section cantilevers 5μm wide by 25μm long were milled using a focused ion beam (FIB) at individual grain boundaries in unoxidised Alloy 600 samples and in samples that had been exposed to simulated PWR environment for 4500h and for 1500h. The cantilevers were notched at the grain boundaries using FIB and tested using a nanoindenter to deflect them in bending. The critical stress intensity factor for the fractured cantilevers in samples that had been exposed for 4500h was measured to be between 0.73 and 1.82MPa(m)1/2. No intergranular fracture occurred in the samples that had been exposed for 1500h and in the unoxidised samples. No direct correlation was observed between the grain boundary misorientation angle and the critical stress intensity factor.


Sample selection for extreme value analysis of inspection data collected from corroded surfaces
Inspection of corroded engineering components is vital for ensuring safety throughout the lifetime of infrastructure. However, full inspection can be infeasible due to time constraints, budgetary limits or restricted access. Subsequently there is growing interest in partial coverage inspection (PCI) techniques which use data from the inspection of a limited area to assess the condition of larger areas of a component. Extreme value analysis (EVA) is a tool for PCI, it allows an inspector to build a statistical model of the smallest thicknesses across a component. Construction of extreme value models relies on the selection of the smallest thicknesses from the inspection data. Current methodologies rely on the judgement of the analyst to select sets of thickness minima and frequently the inspection data is not checked to ensure that the assumptions made by EVA are reasonable. Consequently, the resulting models can be subjective and can provide inadequate models for extrapolation. In this paper, a framework for building extreme value models of inspection data is introduced. The method selects a sample of thickness minima such that the data is compatible with the assumptions of EVA. It is shown that this framework can select a suitable set of minima for a large number of correlated exponential and Gaussian surfaces and the method is tested using real inspection data collected from an ultrasonic thickness C-scan of a rough surface.


The vibrational and configurational entropy of α-brass
The heat capacities of two samples of a fcc Cu–Zn alloy with the composition CuZn15 and CuZn34 were measured from T=5K to 573K using relaxation and differential scanning calorimetry. Below ∼90K, they are characterised by negative excess heat capacities deviating from ideal mixing by up to −0.20 and −0.44J·mol−1·K−1 for CuZn15 and CuZn34, respectively. The excess heat capacities produce excess vibrational entropies, which are less negative compared to the excess entropy available from the literature. Since the literature entropy data contain both, the configurational and the vibrational part of the entropy, the difference is attributed to the excess configurational entropy. The thermodynamics of different short-range ordered samples was also investigated. The extent of the short-range order had no influence on the heat capacity below T=300K. Above T=300K, where the ordering changed during the measurement, the heat capacity depended strongly on the thermal history of the samples. From these data, the heat and entropy of ordering was calculated. The results on the vibrational entropy of this study were also used to test a relationship for estimating the excess vibrational entropy of mixing.


A Monte Carlo algorithm for degenerate plasmas
A procedure for performing Monte Carlo calculations of plasmas with an arbitrary level of degeneracy is outlined. It has possible applications in inertial confinement fusion and astrophysics. Degenerate particles are initialised according to the Fermi–Dirac distribution function, and scattering is via a Pauli blocked binary collision approximation. The algorithm is tested against degenerate electron–ion equilibration, and the degenerate resistivity transport coefficient from unmagnetised first order transport theory. The code is applied to the cold fuel shell and alpha particle equilibration problem of inertial confinement fusion.


An enhanced Immersed Structural Potential Method for fluid–structure interaction
Within the group of immersed boundary methods employed for the numerical simulation of fluid–structure interaction problems, the Immersed Structural Potential Method (ISPM) was recently introduced (Gil et al., 2010) [1] in order to overcome some of the shortcomings of existing immersed methodologies. In the ISPM, an incompressible immersed solid is modelled as a deviatoric strain energy functional whose spatial gradient defines a fluid–structure interaction force field in the Navier–Stokes equations used to resolve the underlying incompressible Newtonian viscous fluid. In this paper, two enhancements of the methodology are presented. First, the introduction of a new family of spline-based kernel functions for the transfer of information between both physics. In contrast to classical IBM kernels, these new kernels are shown not to introduce spurious oscillations in the solution. Second, the use of tensorised Gaussian quadrature rules that allow for accurate and efficient numerical integration of the immersed structural potential. A series of numerical examples will be presented in order to demonstrate the capabilities of the enhanced methodology and to draw some key comparisons against other existing immersed methodologies in terms of accuracy, preservation of the incompressibility constraint and computational speed.


Fluid simulations with atomistic resolution: a hybrid multiscale method with field-wise coupling
We present a new hybrid method for simulating dense fluid systems that exhibit multiscale behaviour, in particular, systems in which a Navier–Stokes model may not be valid in parts of the computational domain. We apply molecular dynamics as a local microscopic refinement for correcting the Navier–Stokes constitutive approximation in the bulk of the domain, as well as providing a direct measurement of velocity slip at bounding surfaces. Our hybrid approach differs from existing techniques, such as the heterogeneous multiscale method (HMM), in some fundamental respects. In our method, the individual molecular solvers, which provide information to the macro model, are not coupled with the continuum grid at nodes (i.e. point-wise coupling), instead coupling occurs over distributed heterogeneous fields (here referred to as field-wise coupling). This affords two major advantages. Whereas point-wise coupled HMM is limited to regions of flow that are highly scale-separated in all spatial directions (i.e. where the state of non-equilibrium in the fluid can be adequately described by a single strain tensor and temperature gradient vector), our field-wise coupled HMM has no such limitations and so can be applied to flows with arbitrarily-varying degrees of scale separation (e.g. flow from a large reservoir into a nano-channel). The second major advantage is that the position of molecular elements does not need to be collocated with nodes of the continuum grid, which means that the resolution of the microscopic correction can be adjusted independently of the resolution of the continuum model. This in turn means the computational cost and accuracy of the molecular correction can be independently controlled and optimised. The macroscopic constraints on the individual molecular solvers are artificial body-force distributions, used in conjunction with standard periodicity. We test our hybrid method on the Poiseuille flow problem for both Newtonian (Lennard-Jones) and non-Newtonian (FENE) fluids. The multiscale results are validated with expensive full-scale molecular dynamics simulations of the same case. Very close agreement is obtained for all cases, with as few as two micro elements required to accurately capture both the Newtonian and non-Newtonian flowfields. Our multiscale method converges very quickly (within 3–4 iterations) and is an order of magnitude more computationally efficient than the full-scale simulation.


A numerical modelling of gas exchange mechanisms between air and turbulent water with an aquarium chemical reaction
This paper proposes a new numerical modelling to examine environmental chemodynamics of a gaseous material exchanged between the air and turbulent water phases across a gas–liquid interface, followed by an aquarium chemical reaction. This study uses an extended concept of a two-compartment model, and assumes two physicochemical substeps to approximate the gas exchange processes. The first substep is the gas–liquid equilibrium between the air and water phases, A(g)⇌A(aq), with Henryʼs law constant H. The second is a first-order irreversible chemical reaction in turbulent water, A(aq)+H2O→B(aq)+H+ with a chemical reaction rate κA. A direct numerical simulation (DNS) technique has been employed to obtain details of the gas exchange mechanisms and the chemical reaction in the water compartment, while zero velocity and uniform concentration of A is considered in the air compartment. The study uses the different Schmidt numbers between 1 and 8, and six nondimensional chemical reaction rates between 10−∞(≈0) to 101 at a fixed Reynolds number. It focuses on the effects of the Schmidt number and the chemical reaction rate on fundamental mechanisms of the gas exchange processes across the interface.


Hybrid continuum–molecular modelling of multiscale internal gas flows
We develop and apply an efficient multiscale method for simulating a large class of low-speed internal rarefied gas flows. The method is an extension of the hybrid atomistic–continuum approach proposed by Borg et al. (2013) [28] for the simulation of micro/nano flows of high-aspect ratio. The major new extensions are: (1) incorporation of fluid compressibility; (2) implementation using the direct simulation Monte Carlo (DSMC) method for dilute rarefied gas flows, and (3) application to a broader range of geometries, including periodic, non-periodic, pressure-driven, gravity-driven and shear-driven internal flows. The multiscale method is applied to micro-scale gas flows through a periodic converging–diverging channel (driven by an external acceleration) and a non-periodic channel with a bend (driven by a pressure difference), as well as the flow between two eccentric cylinders (with the inner rotating relative to the outer). In all these cases there exists a wide variation of Knudsen number within the geometries, as well as substantial compressibility despite the Mach number being very low. For validation purposes, our multiscale simulation results are compared to those obtained from full-scale DSMC simulations: very close agreement is obtained in all cases for all flow variables considered. Our multiscale simulation is an order of magnitude more computationally efficient than the full-scale DSMC for the first and second test cases, and two orders of magnitude more efficient for the third case.


High-order spectral/hp element discretisation for reaction–diffusion problems on surfaces: Application to cardiac electrophysiology
We present a numerical discretisation of an embedded two-dimensional manifold using high-order continuous Galerkin spectral/hp elements, which provide exponential convergence of the solution with increasing polynomial order, while retaining geometric flexibility in the representation of the domain. Our work is motivated by applications in cardiac electrophysiology where sharp gradients in the solution benefit from the high-order discretisation, while the computational cost of anatomically-realistic models can be significantly reduced through the surface representation and use of high-order methods. We describe and validate our discretisation and provide a demonstration of its application to modelling electrochemical propagation across a human left atrium.


Multiscale simulation of non-isothermal microchannel gas flows
This paper describes the development and application of an efficient hybrid continuum-molecular approach for simulating non-isothermal, low-speed, internal rarefied gas flows, and its application to flows in Knudsen compressors. The method is an extension of the hybrid continuum-molecular approach presented by Patronis et al. (2013) [4], which is based on the framework originally proposed by Borg et al. (2013) [3] for the simulation of micro/nano flows of high aspect ratio. The extensions are: 1) the ability to simulate non-isothermal flows; 2) the ability to simulate low-speed flows by implementing a molecular description of the gas provided by the low-variance deviational simulation Monte Carlo (LVDSMC) method; and 3) the application to three-dimensional geometries. For the purposes of validation, the multiscale method is applied to rarefied gas flow through a periodic converging-diverging channel (driven by an external acceleration). For this flow problem it is computationally feasible to obtain a solution by the direct simulation Monte Carlo (DSMC) method for comparison: very close agreement is observed.The efficiency of the multiscale method, allows the investigation of alternative Knudsen-compressor channel configurations to be undertaken. We characterise the effectiveness of the single-stage Knudsen-compressor channel by the pressure drop that can be achieved between two connected reservoirs, for a given temperature difference. Our multiscale simulations indicate that the efficiency is surprisingly robust to modifications in streamwise variations of both temperature and cross-sectional geometry.


The Galerkin finite element method for a multi-term time-fractional diffusion equation
We consider the initial/boundary value problem for a diffusion equation involving multiple time-fractional derivatives on a bounded convex polyhedral domain. We analyze a space semidiscrete scheme based on the standard Galerkin finite element method using continuous piecewise linear functions. Nearly optimal error estimates for both cases of initial data and inhomogeneous term are derived, which cover both smooth and nonsmooth data. Further we develop a fully discrete scheme based on a finite difference discretization of the time-fractional derivatives, and discuss its stability and error estimate. Extensive numerical experiments for one- and two-dimensional problems confirm the theoretical convergence rates.


Finite element approximation of the radiative transport equation in a medium with piece-wise constant refractive index
The radiative transport equation can be used as a light transport model in a medium with scattering particles, such as biological tissues. In the radiative transport equation, the refractive index is assumed to be constant within the medium. However, in biomedical media, changes in the refractive index can occur between different tissue types. In this work, light propagation in a medium with piece-wise constant refractive index is considered. Light propagation in each sub-domain with a constant refractive index is modeled using the radiative transport equation and the equations are coupled using boundary conditions describing Fresnel reflection and refraction phenomena on the interfaces between the sub-domains. The resulting coupled system of radiative transport equations is numerically solved using a finite element method. The approach is tested with simulations. The results show that this coupled system describes light propagation accurately through comparison with the Monte Carlo method. It is also shown that neglecting the internal changes of the refractive index can lead to erroneous boundary measurements of scattered light.


A WENO-solver combined with adaptive momentum discretization for the Wigner transport equation and its application to resonant tunneling diodes
We present a novel numerical scheme for the deterministic solution of the Wigner transport equation, especially suited to deal with situations in which strong quantum effects are present. The unique feature of the algorithm is the expansion of the Wigner function in local basis functions, similar to finite element or finite volume methods. This procedure yields a discretization of the pseudo-differential operator that conserves the particle density on arbitrarily chosen grids. The high flexibility in refining the grid spacing together with the weighted essentially non-oscillatory (WENO) scheme for the advection term allows for an accurate and well-resolved simulation of the phase space dynamics. A resonant tunneling diode is considered as test case and a detailed convergence study is given by comparing the results to a non-equilibrium Green's functions calculation. The impact of the considered domain size and of the grid spacing is analyzed. The obtained convergence of the results towards a quasi-exact agreement of the steady state Wigner and Green's functions computations demonstrates the accuracy of the scheme, as well as the high flexibility to adjust to different physical situations.


Asynchronous coupling of hybrid models for efficient simulation of multiscale systems
We present a new coupling approach for the time advancement of multi-physics models of multiscale systems. This extends the method of E et al. (2009) [5] to deal with an arbitrary number of models. Coupling is performed asynchronously, with each model being assigned its own timestep size. This enables accurate long timescale predictions to be made at the computational cost of the short timescale simulation. We propose a method for selecting appropriate timestep sizes based on the degree of scale separation that exists between models. A number of example applications are used for testing and benchmarking, including a comparison with experimental data of a thermally driven rarefied gas flow in a micro capillary. The multiscale simulation results are in very close agreement with the experimental data, but are produced almost 50,000 times faster than from a conventionally-coupled simulation.


Three dimensional thermal-solute phase field simulation of binary alloy solidification
We employ adaptive mesh refinement, implicit time stepping, a nonlinear multigrid solver and parallel computation to solve a multi-scale, time dependent, three dimensional, nonlinear set of coupled partial differential equations for three scalar field variables. The mathematical model represents the non-isothermal solidification of a metal alloy into a melt substantially cooled below its freezing point at the microscale. Underlying physical molecular forces are captured at this scale by a specification of the energy field. The time rate of change of the temperature, alloy concentration and an order parameter to govern the state of the material (liquid or solid) are controlled by the diffusion parameters and variational derivatives of the energy functional. The physical problem is important to material scientists for the development of solid metal alloys and, hitherto, this fully coupled thermal problem has not been simulated in three dimensions, due to its computationally demanding nature. By bringing together state of the art numerical techniques this problem is now shown here to be tractable at appropriate resolution with relatively moderate computational resources.


A hybrid particle-mesh method for incompressible active polar viscous gels
We present a hybrid particle-mesh method for numerically solving the hydrodynamic equations of incompressible active polar viscous gels. These equations model the dynamics of polar active agents, embedded in a viscous medium, in which stresses are induced through constant consumption of energy. The numerical method is based on Lagrangian particles and staggered Cartesian finite-difference meshes. We show that the method is second-order and first-order accurate with respect to grid and time-step sizes, respectively. Using the present method, we simulate the hydrodynamics in rectangular geometries, of a passive liquid crystal, of an active polar film and of active gels with topological defects in polarization. We show the emergence of spontaneous flow due to Fréedericksz transition, and transformation in the nature of topological defects by tuning the activity of the system.


Boundary element based multiresolution shape optimisation in electrostatics
We consider the shape optimisation of high-voltage devices subject to electrostatic field equations by combining fast boundary elements with multiresolution subdivision surfaces. The geometry of the domain is described with subdivision surfaces and different resolutions of the same geometry are used for optimisation and analysis. The primal and adjoint problems are discretised with the boundary element method using a sufficiently fine control mesh. For shape optimisation the geometry is updated starting from the coarsest control mesh with increasingly finer control meshes. The multiresolution approach effectively prevents the appearance of non-physical geometry oscillations in the optimised shapes. Moreover, there is no need for mesh regeneration or smoothing during the optimisation due to the absence of a volume mesh. We present several numerical experiments and one industrial application to demonstrate the robustness and versatility of the developed approach.


TVD differencing on three-dimensional unstructured meshes with monotonicity-preserving correction of mesh skewness
Total variation diminishing (TVD) schemes are a widely applied group of monotonicity-preserving advection differencing schemes for partial differential equations in numerical heat transfer and computational fluid dynamics. These schemes are typically designed for one-dimensional problems or multidimensional problems on structured equidistant quadrilateral meshes. Practical applications, however, often involve complex geometries that cannot be represented by Cartesian meshes and, therefore, necessitate the application of unstructured meshes, which require a more sophisticated discretisation to account for their additional topological complexity. In principle, TVD schemes are applicable to unstructured meshes, however, not all the data required for TVD differencing is readily available on unstructured meshes, and the solution suffers from considerable numerical diffusion as a result of mesh skewness. In this article we analyse TVD differencing on unstructured three-dimensional meshes, focusing on the non-linearity of TVD differencing and the extrapolation of the virtual upwind node. Furthermore, we propose a novel monotonicity-preserving correction method for TVD schemes that significantly reduces numerical diffusion caused by mesh skewness. The presented numerical experiments demonstrate the importance of accounting for the non-linearity introduced by TVD differencing and of imposing carefully chosen limits on the extrapolated virtual upwind node, as well as the efficacy of the proposed method to correct mesh skewness.


Dealiasing techniques for high-order spectral element methods on regular and irregular grids
High-order methods are becoming increasingly attractive in both academia and industry, especially in the context of computational fluid dynamics. However, before they can be more widely adopted, issues such as lack of robustness in terms of numerical stability need to be addressed, particularly when treating industrial-type problems where challenging geometries and a wide range of physical scales, typically due to high Reynolds numbers, need to be taken into account. One source of instability is aliasing effects which arise from the nonlinearity of the underlying problem. In this work we detail two dealiasing strategies based on the concept of consistent integration. The first uses a localised approach, which is useful when the nonlinearities only arise in parts of the problem. The second is based on the more traditional approach of using a higher quadrature. The main goal of both dealiasing techniques is to improve the robustness of high order spectral element methods, thereby reducing aliasing-driven instabilities. We demonstrate how these two strategies can be effectively applied to both continuous and discontinuous discretisations, where, in the latter, both volumetric and interface approximations must be considered. We show the key features of each dealiasing technique applied to the scalar conservation law with numerical examples and we highlight the main differences in terms of implementation between continuous and discontinuous spatial discretisations.


Adaptive Haar wavelets for the angular discretisation of spectral wave models
A new framework for applying anisotropic angular adaptivity in spectral wave modelling is presented. The angular dimension of the action balance equation is discretised with the use of Haar wavelets, hierarchical piecewise-constant basis functions with compact support, and an adaptive methodology for anisotropically adjusting the resolution of the angular mesh is proposed. This work allows a reduction of computational effort in spectral wave modelling, through a reduction in the degrees of freedom required for a given accuracy, with an automated procedure and minimal cost.


Incompressible–compressible flows with a transient discontinuous interface using smoothed particle hydrodynamics (SPH)
A new two-phase incompressible–compressible Smoothed Particle Hydrodynamics (SPH) method has been developed where the interface is discontinuous in density. This is applied to water–air problems with a large density difference. The incompressible phase requires surface pressure from the compressible phase and the compressible phase requires surface velocity from the incompressible phase. Compressible SPH is used for the air phase (with the isothermal stiffened ideal gas equation of state for low Mach numbers) and divergence-free (projection based) incompressible SPH is used for the water phase, with the addition of Fickian shifting to produce sufficiently homogeneous particle distributions to enable stable, accurate, converged solutions without noise in the pressure field. Shifting is a purely numerical particle regularisation device. The interface remains a true material discontinuity at a high density ratio with continuous pressure and velocity at the interface. This approach with the physics of compressibility and incompressibility represented is novel within SPH and is validated against semi-analytical results for a two-phase elongating and oscillating water drop, analytical results for low amplitude inviscid standing waves, the Kelvin–Helmholtz instability, and a dam break problem with high interface distortion and impact on a vertical wall where experimental and other numerical results are available.


Eigensolution analysis of spectral/hp continuous Galerkin approximations to advection–diffusion problems: Insights into spectral vanishing viscosity
This study addresses linear dispersion–diffusion analysis for the spectral/hp continuous Galerkin (CG) formulation in one dimension. First, numerical dispersion and diffusion curves are obtained for the advection–diffusion problem and the role of multiple eigencurves peculiar to spectral/hp methods is discussed. From the eigencurves' behaviour, we observe that CG might feature potentially undesirable non-smooth dispersion/diffusion characteristics for under-resolved simulations of problems strongly dominated by either convection or diffusion. Subsequently, the linear advection equation augmented with spectral vanishing viscosity (SVV) is analysed. Dispersion and diffusion characteristics of CG with SVV-based stabilization are verified to display similar non-smooth features in flow regions where convection is much stronger than dissipation or vice-versa, owing to a dependency of the standard SVV operator on a local Péclet number. First a modification is proposed to the traditional SVV scaling that enforces a globally constant Péclet number so as to avoid the previous issues. In addition, a new SVV kernel function is suggested and shown to provide a more regular behaviour for the eigencurves along with a consistent increase in resolution power for higher-order discretizations, as measured by the extent of the wavenumber range where numerical errors are negligible. The dissipation characteristics of CG with the SVV modifications suggested are then verified to be broadly equivalent to those obtained through upwinding in the discontinuous Galerkin (DG) scheme. Nevertheless, for the kernel function proposed, the full upwind DG scheme is found to have a slightly higher resolution power for the same dissipation levels. These results show that improved CG-SVV characteristics can be pursued via different kernel functions with the aid of optimization algorithms.


Point defect formation and migration in Ga stabilised δ-Pu
The energetics of point defects in Ga stabilised δ-Pu are investigated through calculations of formation energies, migration pathways and through on-the-fly kinetic Monte Carlo (OTF-KMC) calculations. Using the Modified Embedded Atom Method as the interatomic potential, defect formation energies are found to depend greatly on both the specie of the defect and the surrounding local environment. Ga vacancies are found to have considerably larger formation energies than Pu vacancies, due to the change in the nearest neighbour Pu–Ga ordering. Point vacancy and point interstitial migration involving Ga atoms or Pu atoms in regions close to substitutional Ga, results in much higher energy barriers than for migration in pure Pu. OTF-KMC calculations show that this leads to defect migration pathways confined to areas of high Pu concentration, with the degree of confinement dependent on the location and ordering of the substitutional Ga. Vacancy migration takes place only through displacing Pu atoms and split Ga interstitials become almost instantaneously substitutional, displacing a Pu atom. The results indicate that the presence of Ga within the Pu matrix has a significant effect on the recovery of point defects.


1D kinetic modelling of the JET SOL with tungsten divertor plates
In this work a fully kinetic model of the JET SOL with tungsten divertor plates has been developed. It includes the dynamics of main-ions (D+) and electrons, the neutrals (D, C, W) and the impurity particles (C+m, W+n). Our simulations show extremely low concentration of W impurity. We identify two reasons which are responsible for this effect: (1) for low temperature divertor plasma the energy of most of the main-ions and the impurities in a low-ionization state impinging the divertor plates is below the W-sputtering threshold energy; (2) with increasing temperature the W-sputtering increases, but the potential drop across the divertor plasma increases too, so that most of the W ions are reabsorbed at the divertors.


Mechanism for radiation damage resistance in yttrium oxide dispersion strengthened steels
ODS steels based on yttrium oxide have been suggested as potential fusion reactor wall materials due to their observed radiation resistance properties. Presumably this radiation resistance can be related to the interaction of the particle with vacancies, self-interstitial atoms (SIAs) and other radiation damage debris. Density functional theory has been used to investigate this at the atomic scale. Four distinct interfaces, some based on HRTEM observations, between iron and yttrium oxide were investigated. It is been shown that the Y2O3–Fe interface acts as a strong trap with long-range attraction for both interstitial and vacancy defects, allowing recombination without altering the interface structure. The catalytic elimination of defects without change to the microstructure explains the improved behaviour of ODS steels with respect to radiation creep and swelling.


Recent advances in the study of the UO2–PuO2 phase diagram at high temperatures
Recently, novel container-less laser heating experimental data have been published on the melting behaviour of pure PuO2 and PuO2-rich compositions in the uranium dioxide–plutonium dioxide system. Such data showed that previous data obtained by more traditional furnace heating techniques were affected by extensive interaction between the sample and its containment. It is therefore paramount to check whether data so far used by nuclear engineers for the uranium-rich side of the pseudo-binary dioxide system can be confirmed or not. In the present work, new data are presented both in the UO2-rich part of the phase diagram, most interesting for the uranium–plutonium dioxide based nuclear fuel safety, and in the PuO2 side. The new results confirm earlier furnace heating data in the uranium-dioxide rich part of the phase diagram, and more recent laser-heating data in the plutonium-dioxide side of the system. As a consequence, it is also confirmed that a minimum melting point must exist in the UO2–PuO2 system, at a composition between x(PuO2)=0.4 and x(PuO2)=0.7 and 2900K⩽T⩽3000K. Taking into account that, especially at high temperature, oxygen chemistry has an effect on the reported phase boundary uncertainties, the current results should be projected in the ternary U–Pu–O system. This aspect has been extensively studied here by X-ray diffraction and X-ray absorption spectroscopy. The current results suggest that uncertainty bands related to oxygen behaviour in the equilibria between condensed phases and gas should not significantly affect the qualitative trend of the current solid–liquid phase boundaries.


Effects of thermal treatment on the mechanical integrity of silicon carbide in HTR fuel up to 2200°C
Achieving inherent safety of the High Temperature Reactor relies on the exceptional performance of its fuel. The design foresees complete encapsulation of all fissionable material by layers of carbon and silicon carbide (SiC) forming the tristructural-isotropic fuel particle. Its mechanical integrity and ability to fully retain fission products even in the event of an accident is a vital safety concern. The present study investigates the effect of post-deposition annealing on the SiC coating at design-based accident temperatures and beyond. Therefore, samples of simulated fuel have been fabricated by fluidized bed chemical vapour deposition and thermally treated in inert atmosphere up to 2200°C. Nanoindentation and crush test measurements showed only minor reductions of elastic modulus and fracture strength up to 2000°C. Substantial weight loss and crystal growth were observed at annealing temperatures of 2100°C and above. Raman spectroscopy identified the formation of a multi-layered graphene film covering the SiC grains after annealing and scanning electron microscopy revealed significant porosity formation within the coating from 1800°C onwards. These observations were attributed towards an evaporation–precipitation mechanism of SiC at very elevated temperatures that only slightly diminishes the hardness, elastic modulus or fracture strength, but might still be problematic in respect to fission product retention of the SiC layer.


Finite element analysis of the tetragonal to monoclinic phase transformation during oxidation of zirconium alloys
Corrosion is a key limiting factor in the degradation of zirconium alloys in light water reactors. Developing a mechanistic understanding of the corrosion process offers a route towards improving safety and efficiency as demand increases for higher burn-up of fuel. Oxides formed on zirconium alloys are composed of both monoclinic and meta-stable tetragonal phases, and are subject to a number of potential mechanical degradation mechanisms. The work presented investigates the link between the tetragonal to monoclinic oxide phase transformation and degradation of the protective character of the oxide layer. To achieve this, Abaqus finite element analysis of the oxide phase transformation has been carried out. Study of the change in transformation strain energy shows how relaxation of oxidation induced stress and fast fracture at the metal–oxide interface could destabilise the tetragonal phase. Central to this is the identification of the transformation variant most likely to form, and understanding why twinning of the transformed grain is likely to occur. Development of transformation strain tensors and analysis of the strain components allows some separation of dilatation and shear effects. Maximum principal stress is used as an indication of fracture in the surrounding oxide layer. Study of the stress distributions shows the way oxide fracture is likely to occur and the differing effects of dilatation and shape change. Comparison with literature provides qualitative validation of the finite element simulations.


Computer simulation of defect clusters in UO2 and their dependence on composition
It is recognised that point defects play a key role in the behaviour and properties of many technologically significant oxides. What is less well understood is how these defects cluster together and, crucially, the extent to which the clusters change with composition. We chose to investigate this phenomenon by considering UO2, a nuclear fuel material for which there is contradictory data in the literature concerning defect clustering as a function of oxygen content. Early studies of fluorite UO2+x proposed a model based on 2:2:2 Willis clusters whilst more recent research suggests cuboctahedral or split quad-interstitial defect clustering. Here we use the PBE+U functional to simulate defective UO2+x and find for 0.125<x<0.25, chains of edge-sharing 2:2:2 Willis clusters to be most stable. Below x=0.125 these chains destabilise, transforming in to split di-interstitial clusters, demonstrating that the type of oxygen cluster present is dependent on local environment and stoichiometry.


Helium bubbles in bcc Fe and their interactions with irradiation
The properties of helium bubbles in a body-centred cubic (bcc) Fe lattice have been examined. The atomic configurations and formation energies of different He–vacancy complexes were determined. The 0K results show that the most energetically favourable He to Fe vacancy ratio increases from about 1:1 for approximately 5 vacancies up to about 4:1 for 36 vacancies. The formation mechanisms for small He clusters have also been considered. Isolated interstitials and small clusters can diffuse quickly through the lattice. MD simulations of randomly placed interstitial He atoms at 500K showed clustering over the time scale of nanoseconds with He clusters containing up to 4 atoms being mobile over this time scale. He clusters containing 4 or 5 atoms were shown to eject an Fe dumbbell interstitial which could then detach from the He cluster and diffuse with the remaining He–vacancy complex being effectively immobile. Collision cascades initiated near larger bubbles showed that Fe vacancies produced by the cascades readily become part of the He–vacancy complexes. Energy barriers for He to join an existing bubble as a function of the He–vacancy ratio are also calculated. These can be larger than the diffusion barrier in the pristine lattice, but are lower when the bubbles contain excess vacancies, thus indicating that bubble growth may be kinetically constrained.


Small-scale characterisation of irradiated nuclear materials: Part I – Microstructure
The behaviour of nanometre-scale precipitates in oxide dispersion strengthened (ODS) ferritic alloys and tungsten–rhenium alloys for nuclear applications has been examined by atom probe tomography (APT). Low Re content tungsten alloys showed no evidence of Re clustering following self-ion irradiation whereas the 25at.% Re resulted in cluster formation. The size and composition of clusters varied depending on the material form during irradiation (pre-sharpened needle or bulk). These results highlight the care that must be taken in interpreting data from ion irradiated pre-sharpened needles due to the presence of free surfaces. Self-ion irradiation of the ODS ferritic alloy resulted in a change in the composition of the clusters, indicating a transition from a near-stoichiometric Y2Ti2O7 composition towards a Ti2YO5.


A study into the impact of interface roughness development on mechanical degradation of oxides formed on zirconium alloys
As a cladding material used to encapsulate nuclear fuel pellets, zirconium alloys are the primary barrier separating the fuel and a pressurised steam or lithiated water environment. Degradation mechanisms such as oxidation can be the limiting factor in the life-time of the fuel assembly. Key to controlling oxidation, and therefore allowing increased burn-up of fuel, is the development of a mechanistic understanding of the corrosion process. In an autoclave, the oxidation kinetics for zirconium alloys are typically cyclical, with periods of accelerated kinetics being observed in steps of ∼2μm oxide growth. These periods of accelerated oxidation are immediately preceded by the development of a layer of lateral cracks near the metal-oxide interface, which may be associated with the development of interface roughness. The present work uses scanning electron microscopy to carry out a statistical analysis of changes in the metal-oxide interface roughness between three different alloys at different stages of autoclave oxidation. The first two alloys are Zircaloy-4 and ZIRLO™ for which analysis is carried out at stages before, during and after first transition. The third alloy is an experimental low tin alloy, which under the same oxidation conditions and during the same time period does not appear to go through transition. Assessment of the metal-oxide interface roughness is primarily carried out based on the root mean square of the interface slope known as the Rdq parameter. Results show clear trends with relation to transition points in the corrosion kinetics. Discussion is given to how this relates to the existing mechanistic understanding of the corrosion process, and the components required for possible future modelling approaches.


Processing and microstructure characterisation of oxide dispersion strengthened Fe–14Cr–0.4Ti–0.25Y2O3 ferritic steels fabricated by spark plasma sintering
Ferritic steels strengthened with Ti–Y–O nanoclusters are leading candidates for fission and fusion reactor components. A Fe–14Cr–0.4Ti+0.25Y2O3 (14YT) alloy was fabricated by mechanical alloying and subsequently consolidated by spark plasma sintering (SPS). The densification of the 14YT alloys significantly improved with an increase in the sintering temperature. Scanning electron microscopy and electron backscatter diffraction revealed that 14YT SPS-sintered at 1150°C under 50MPa for 5min had a high density (99.6%), a random grain orientation and a bimodal grain size distribution (<500nm and 1–20μm). Synchrotron X-ray diffraction patterns showed bcc ferrite, Y2Ti2O7, FeO, and chromium carbides, while transmission electron microscopy and atom probe tomography showed uniformly dispersed Y2Ti2O7 nanoclusters of <5nm diameter and number density of 1.04×1023m−3. Due to the very much shorter consolidation times and lower pressures used in SPS compared with the more usual hot isostatic pressing routes, SPS is shown to be a cost-effective technique for oxide dispersion strengthened (ODS) alloy manufacturing with microstructural features consistent with the best-performing ODS alloys.


Following the electroreduction of uranium dioxide to uranium in LiCl–KCl eutectic in situ using synchrotron radiation
The electrochemical reduction of uranium dioxide to metallic uranium has been investigated in lithium chloride–potassium chloride eutectic molten salt. Laboratory based electrochemical studies have been coupled with in situ energy dispersive X-ray diffraction, for the first time, to deduce the reduction pathway. No intermediate phases were identified using the X-ray diffraction before, during or after electroreduction to form α-uranium. This suggests that the electrochemical reduction occurs via a single, 4-electron-step, process. The rate of formation of α-uranium is seen to decrease during electrolysis and could be a result of a build-up of oxygen anions in the molten salt. Slow transport of O2− ions away from the UO2 working electrode could impede the electrochemical reduction.


Critical assessment of finite element analysis applied to metal–oxide interface roughness in oxidising zirconium alloys
As a nuclear fuel cladding material, zirconium alloys act as a barrier between the fuel and pressurised steam or lithiated water environment. Controlling degradation mechanisms such as oxidation is essential to extending the in-service lifetime of the fuel. At temperatures of ∼360°C zirconium alloys are known to exhibit cyclical, approximately cubic corrosion kinetics. With acceleration in the oxidation kinetics occurring every ∼2μm of oxide growth, and being associated with the formation of a network of lateral cracks. Finite element analysis has been used previously to explain the lateral crack formation by the development of localised out-of-plane tensile stresses at the metal–oxide interface. This work uses the Abaqus finite element code to assess critically current approaches to representing the oxidation of zirconium alloys, with relation to undulations at the metal–oxide interface and localised stress generation. This includes comparison of axisymmetric and 3D quartered modelling approaches, and investigates the effect of interface geometry and plasticity in the metal substrate. Particular focus is placed on the application of the anisotropic strain tensor used to represent the oxidation mechanism, which is typically applied with a fixed coordinate system. Assessment of the impact of the tensor showed that 99% of the localised tensile stresses originated from the out-of-plane component of the strain tensor, rather than the in-plane expansion as was previously thought. Discussion is given to the difficulties associated with this modelling approach and the requirements for future simulations of the oxidation of zirconium alloys.


Evaluation of the interfacial shear strength and residual stress of TiAlN coating on ZIRLO™ fuel cladding using a modified shear-lag model approach
This paper investigates the residual stresses and interfacial shear strength of a TiAlN coating on Zr–Nb–Sn–Fe alloy (ZIRLO™) substrate designed to improve corrosion resistance of fuel cladding used in water-cooled nuclear reactors, both during normal and exceptional conditions, e.g. a loss of coolant event (LOCA). The distribution and maximum value of the interfacial shear strength has been estimated using a modified shear-lag model. The parameters critical to this analysis were determined experimentally. From these input parameters the interfacial shear strength between the TiAlN coating and ZIRLO™ substrate was inferred to be around 120 MPa. It is worth noting that the apparent strength of the coating is high (∼3.4 GPa). However, this is predominantly due to the large compressive residuals stress (3 GPa in compression), which must be overcome for the coating to fail in tension, which happens at a load just 150 MPa in excess of this.


Utilising DualEELS to probe the nanoscale mechanisms of the corrosion of Zircaloy-4 in 350 °C pressurised water
Characterisation of materials utilised for fuel cladding in nuclear reactors prior to service is integral in order to understand corrosion mechanisms which would take place in reactor. Zircaloy-4 is one such material of choice for nuclear fuel containment in Pressurised Water Reactors (PWRs). In particular, the metal-oxide interface has been a predominant focus of previous research, however, due to the complex oxidation process of zirconium cladding, there is still no clear understanding of what is present at the interface. Using Scanning Transmission Electron Microscopy (STEM) and Dual Electron Energy Loss Spectroscopy (DualEELS), we have studied the corrosion of this material under conditions similar to those that could be encountered in service. It is shown that under all conditions, whether during faster oxidation in the early stages, slow growth just prior to the transition to a new growth regime, or in the faster growth that happens after this transition, the surface of the metal below the scale is loaded with oxygen up to around 33 at%. Approaching transition, in conditions of slow growth and slow oxygen supply, an additional metastable suboxide is apparent with a thickness of tens of nm. By studying changes in both chemical composition and dielectric function of the material at the oxide scale – metal interface with nanometre resolution, quantitative mapping could be achieved, clearly showing that this is a suboxide composition of ZrO and a Zr oxidation state close to +2.


Heat capacity of Bi2UO6
In the frame of the safety of lead–bismuth eutectic cooled fast reactors, the thermal behaviour of bismuth(III) uranate(VI) was studied as a possible interaction product of the coolant and mixed oxide fuel. The heat capacity of Bi2UO6 were measured and presented here for the first time. The thermodynamic functions derived at T = 298.15 K are Cp(298.15 K) = 185.1 J K−1 mol−1, S°(298.15 K) = 238.8 J K−1 mol−1, and {H°(298.15 K)−H°(0 K)} = 34863 J mol−1.


The behaviour under irradiation of molybdenum matrix for inert matrix fuel containing americium oxide (CerMet concept)
Americium is a strong contributor to the long term radiotoxicity of high activity nuclear waste. Transmutation by irradiation in nuclear reactors or Accelerator Driven System (ADS, subcritical reactors dedicated to transmutation) of long-lived nuclides like 241Am is therefore an option for the reduction of radiotoxicity of waste packages to be stored in a repository. In order to safely burn americium in a fast reactor or ADS, it must be incorporated in a matrix that could be metallic (CerMet target) or ceramic (CerCer target). One of the most promising matrix to incorporate Am is molybdenum. In order to address the issues (swelling, stability under irradiation, gas retention and release) of using Mo as matrix to transmute Am, two irradiation experiments have been conducted recently at the High Flux Reactor (HFR) in Petten (The Netherland) namely HELIOS and BODEX. The BODEX experiment is a separate effect test, where the molybdenum behaviour is studied without the presence of fission products using 10B to “produce” helium, the HELIOS experiment included a more representative fuel target with the presence of Am and fission product. This paper covers the results of Post Irradiation Examination (PIE) of the two irradiation experiments mentioned above where molybdenum behaviour has been deeply investigated as possible matrix to transmute americium (CerMet fuel target). The behaviour of molybdenum looks satisfying at operating temperature but at high temperature (above 1000 °C) more investigation should be performed.


Xe diffusion and bubble nucleation around edge dislocations in UO2
Recently it has been suggested that dislocations, generated by radiation damage, may increase the rate of fission gas diffusion from the fuel grains, an affect which is at present not incorporated into fuel performance codes. Therefore, we perform molecular dynamics simulations employing empirical potentials to investigate the diffusion of Xe atoms around edge dislocations in UO2 to establish the importance of this pathway for fission gas release. The results suggest that for isolated atoms near the dislocation the activation energy for Xe diffusion is dramatically reduced relative to the bulk. However, Xe atoms diffusing along the dislocation cluster together to form small bubbles, these bubbles incorporate all of the isolated mobile Xe atoms thereby inhibiting fast diffusion of Xe along the dislocation core.


Inert gas bubbles in bcc Fe
The properties of inert gas bubbles in bcc Fe is examined using a combination of static energy minimisation, molecular dynamics and barrier searching methods with empirical potentials. Static energy minimisation techniques indicate that for small Ar and Xe bubbles, the preferred gas to vacancy ratio at 0 K is about 1:1 for Ar and varies between 0.5:1 and 0.9:1 for Xe. In contrast to interstitial He atoms and small He interstitial clusters, which are highly mobile in the lattice, Ar and Xe atoms prefer to occupy substitutional sites and any interstitials present in the lattice soon displace Fe atoms and become substitutional. If a pre-existing bubble is present then there is a capture radius around a bubble which extends up to the 6th neighbour position. Collision cascades can also enlarge an existing bubble by the capture of vacancies. Ar and Xe can diffuse through the lattice through vacancy driven mechanisms but with relatively high energy barriers of 1.8 and 2.0 eV respectively. This indicates that Ar and Xe bubbles are much harder to form than bubbles of He and that such gases produced in a nuclear reaction would more likely be dispersed at substitutional sites without the help of increased temperature or radiation-driven mechanisms.


Code assessment and modelling for Design Basis Accident analysis of the European Sodium Fast Reactor design. Part II: Optimised core and representative transients analysis
The new reactor concepts proposed in the Generation IV International Forum require the development and validation of computational tools able to assess their safety performance. In the first part of this paper the models of the ESFR design developed by several organisations in the framework of the CP-ESFR project were presented and their reliability validated via a benchmarking exercise. This second part of the paper includes the application of those tools for the analysis of design basis accident (DBC) scenarios of the reference design. Further, this paper also introduces the main features of the core optimisation process carried out within the project with the objective to enhance the core safety performance through the reduction of the positive coolant density reactivity effect. The influence of this optimised core design on the reactor safety performance during the previously analysed transients is also discussed. The conclusion provides an overview of the work performed by the partners involved in the project towards the development and enhancement of computational tools specifically tailored to the evaluation of the safety performance of the Generation IV innovative nuclear reactor designs.


SPHERE: Irradiation of sphere-pac fuel of UPuO2−x containing 3% Americium
Americium is a strong contributor to the long term radiotoxicity of high activity nuclear waste. Transmutation by irradiation in nuclear reactors of long-lived nuclides like 241Am is therefore an option for the reduction of radiotoxicity of waste packages to be stored in a repository. The SPHERE irradiation experiment is the latest of a series of European experiments on americium transmutation (e.g. EFTTRA-T4, EFTTRA-T4bis, HELIOS, MARIOS) performed in the HFR (High Flux Reactor). The SPHERE experiment is carried out in the framework of the 4-year project FAIRFUELS of the EURATOM 7th Framework Programme (FP7). During the past years of experimental works in the field of transmutation and tests of innovative nuclear fuels, the release or trapping of helium as well as helium induced fuel swelling have been shown to be the key issues for the design of Am-bearing targets. The main objective of the SPHERE experiment is to study the in-pile behaviour of fuel containing 3% of americium and to compare the behaviour of sphere-pac fuel to pellet fuel, in particular the role of microstructure and temperature on fission gas release (mainly He) and on fuel swelling.The SPHERE experiment is being irradiated since September 2013 in the HFR in Petten (The Netherlands) and is expected to be terminated in spring 2015. The experiment has been designed to last up to 18 reactor cycles (corresponding to 18 months) but may reach its target earlier.This paper discusses the rationale and objective of the SPHERE experiment and provides a general description of its design.


Jerks abound: An analysis of geomagnetic observatory data from 1957 to 2008
We present a two-step method for the removal of external field signals and the identification of geomagnetic jerks in magnetic observatory monthly mean data, providing quantitative uncertainty estimates on jerk occurrence times and amplitudes with minimal a priori information. We apply the method to the complete time series of X-, Y- and Z-components at up to 103 observatory locations in the period of 1957–2008. We find features fitting the definition of jerks in individual components to be frequent and not globally contemporaneous. Identified regional jerks have no consistent occurrence pattern and the most widespread in any given year is identified at <30% of observatories worldwide. Whilst we identify jerks throughout the period of study, relative peaks in the global number of jerk occurrences are found in 1968–71, 1973–74, 1977–79, 1983–85, 1989–93, 1995–98 and 2002–03 with the suggestion of further poorly sampled events in the early 1960s and late 2000s. The mean uncertainties on individual jerk occurrence times and amplitudes are found to be ±0.3yrs and ±2.1nT/yr2, respectively, for all field components. Jerk amplitudes suggest possible periodic trends across Europe and North America, which may be related to the 6-yr periods detected independently in the secular variation and length-of-day.


Seismic imaging of the deep structure under the Chinese volcanoes: An overview
The rapid development of provincial seismic networks and portable seismic arrays has provided a good opportunity to image the detailed 3-D seismic structure of the upper mantle under the active volcanoes in the Chinese continent. Under the Changbaishan (Tianchi) volcano prominent low-velocity (low-V) anomalies are imaged above 400km depth, and high-velocity (high-V) anomalies are detected within the mantle transition zone, suggesting that the Changbaishan volcano is a back-arc volcano related to the dehydration of the subducted Pacific slab that is stagnant in the mantle transition zone. Seismic structures under the Tengchong volcano are similar to those under the Changbaishan volcano, whereas the subducted slab under the Tengchong volcano is the continental Indian slab. Regional and global tomographic models illustrate that obvious low-V anomalies are visible under the Hainan volcano from the crust down to the lower mantle, suggesting that the Hainan volcano is a hotspot. A recent local tomographic model shows that the Hainan plume is imaged as a southeast tilted low-V anomaly with depth in the upper mantle. A high-resolution upper-mantle tomographic model under the North China Craton shows a significantly Y-shaped low-V anomaly under the Datong volcano and Bohai Sea extending down to the lower mantle, which, for the first time, is inferred using precise teleseismic arrival times hand-picked from high-quality seismograms recorded at densely spaced stations from the Chinese provincial networks. The results indicate the possibility of a mantle plume beneath the region. These models suggest that the Changbaishan and Tengchong volcanoes share the history of deep mantle origin, whereas the Datong and Hainan volcanoes are comparable. All these results provide a better understanding of the dynamics of East Asia, and also call for future volcanic hazard mitigation.


From the glassy state to ordered polymer structures: A microhardness study
Graphical abstract


Transmission electron microtomography in polymer research
Graphical abstract


Chain statistics in polyethylene crystallization
Graphical abstract


Computer modeling of polymer crystallization – Toward computer-assisted materials' design
Graphical abstract


How atomic force microscopy has contributed to our understanding of polymer crystallization
Graphical abstract


Atom transfer radical polymerization in inverse miniemulsion: A versatile route toward preparation and functionalization of microgels/nanogels for targeted drug delivery applications
Graphical abstract


Nanotubes as polymers
Graphical abstract


“Recombinamers” as advanced materials for the post-oil age
Graphical abstract


Sulfonated aromatic hydrocarbon polymers as proton exchange membranes for fuel cells
Graphical abstract


Miniemulsion polymerization for synthesis of structured clay/polymer nanocomposites: Short review and recent advances
Graphical abstract


Precise synthesis of polymers containing functional end groups by living ring-opening metathesis polymerization (ROMP): Efficient tools for synthesis of block/graft copolymers
Graphical abstract


The ROMP toolbox upgraded
Graphical abstract


Fluorinated poly(meth)acrylate: Synthesis and properties
Graphical abstract


Experimental characterisation of a Fresnel lens photovoltaic concentrating system
An extensive indoor experimental characterisation program to investigate the heat loss from a point focus Fresnel lens PV Concentrator (FPVC) with a concentration ratio of 100× was performed for a range of simulated solar radiation intensities between 200 and 1000W/m2, different ambient air temperatures, and natural and forced convection. From the experimental program it was found that the solar cell temperature increased proportionally with the increase in simulated solar radiation for all experimental tests, indicating that conductive and convective heat transfer were significantly larger than the long wave radiative heat transfer within and from the FPVC system. For the simulated worst case scenario, in which the FPVC system was tested under a simulated solar radiation intensity of 1000W/m2 and ambient air temperature of 50°C with no forced convection, the predicted silicon solar cell efficiency in the FPVC system was reduced to approximately half that at standard test conditions.


Smart windows: Thermal modelling and evaluation
A numerical investigation of the performance of a multi paned smart window integrated with water-cooled high efficiency third generation GaAsP/InGaAs QWSC (∼32% efficiency) solar cells illuminated by two-axis tracking solar concentrators at 500× in the inter pane space is presented. Optimising system parameters such as optical concentration ratio and coolant (water) flow rate is essential in order to avoid degradation in system performance due to high cell temperatures and thermal stresses. Detailed modelling of the thermo-fluid characteristics of the smart windows system was undertaken using a finite volume CFD package. Results of this analysis which considered the conductive, convective and radiative heat exchange processes taking place in the interior of the smart window system as well as the heat exchange to the internal and external ambient environment are presented.


Irradiance modelling for individual cells of shaded solar photovoltaic arrays
Developments in Photovoltaic (PV) design software have progressed to modelling the string or even the module as the smallest system unit but current methods lack computational efficiency to fully consider cell mismatch effects due to partial shading. This paper presents a more efficient shading loss algorithm which generates an irradiance map of the array for each time step for individual cells or cell portions. Irradiance losses are calculated from both near and far obstructions which might cause shading of both beam and diffuse irradiance in a three-dimensional reference field. The irradiance map output from this model could be used to calculate the performance of each solar cell individually as part of an overarching energy yield model. A validation demonstrates the calculation of shading losses due to a chimney with less than one percent error when compared with measured values.


Progressive photon mapping for daylight redirecting components
Daylight redirecting components (DRCs) are characterised by complex transmissive and reflective behaviour that is difficult to predict accurately largely due to their highly directional scattering, and the caustics this produces. This paper examines the application of progressive photon mapping as a state of the art forward raytracing technique to efficiently simulate the behaviour of such DRCs, and how this approach can support architects in assessing their performance.Progressive photon mapping is an iterative variant of static photon mapping that effects noise reduction through accumulation of results, as well as a reduction in bias inherent to all density estimation methods by reducing the associated bandwidth at a predetermined rate. This not only results in simplified parametrisation for the user, but also provides a preview of the progressively refined simulation, thus making the tool accessible to non-experts as well.We demonstrate the effectiveness of this technique with an implementation based on the Radiancephoton mapping extension and a case study involving retroreflecting prismatic blinds as a representative DRC.


Large scale PV systems under non-uniform and fault conditions
Current codes of practice for PV systems lack detailed guidance regarding circuit mismatch, over or reverse current protection and unbalanced operational conditions in large PV systems. Experimental work in this field is expensive and limited by hardware and environmental resources. The available commercial simulation tools do not rigorously model the complex behaviour of PV systems operating under non-uniform conditions. In this paper a detailed cell-by-cell model of large scale PV systems is developed. The parameter set used for simulations is based on real PV modules power tolerance data and the variance in its principal parameters, thus representing a realistic power frequency distribution. The model is used to estimate and analyse losses due to circuit mismatch, analyse the causes of reverse current in the system’s strings and its consequences in the system performance and to estimate energy losses due to string’s fuses failures.


Role of image forces in non-contact scanning force microscope images of ionic surfaces
We consider the effect of the image interaction on the force acting between tip and surface in non-contact scanning force microscope experiments. This interaction is relevant when a conducting tip interacts with either a polar bulk sample or with a thick film grown on a conducting substrate. We compare the atomistic contribution due to the interaction between the microscopic tip apex and the sample with the macroscopic van der Waals and image contributions to the force on the tip for several representative NaCl clusters adsorbed on a metal substrate. We show that the microscopic force dominates above the plain (001) terrace sites and is solely responsible for image contrast. However, the image force becomes comparable to the microscopic force above the surface di-vacancy and dominates the interaction above a charged step.We consider the effect of the image interaction on the force acting between tip and surface in non-contact scanning force microscope experiments. This interaction is relevant when a conducting tip interacts with either a polar bulk sample or with a thick film grown on a conducting substrate. We compare the atomistic contribution due to the interaction between the microscopic tip apex and the sample with the macroscopic van der Waals and image contributions to the force on the tip for several representative NaCl clusters adsorbed on a metal substrate. We show that the microscopic force dominates above the plain (001) terrace sites and is solely responsible for image contrast. However, the image force becomes comparable to the microscopic force above the surface di-vacancy and dominates the interaction above a charged step.


Isogeometric analysis and domain decomposition methods
In the present work we use the mortar finite element method for the coupling of nonconforming discretized sub-domains in the framework of nonlinear elasticity. The mortar method has been shown to preserve optimal convergence rates (see Laursen (2002) [25] for details) and is variationally consistent. We show that the method can be applied to isogeometric analysis with little effort, once the framework of NURBS based shape functions has been implemented. Furthermore, a specific coordinate augmentation technique allows the design of an energy–momentum scheme for the constrained mechanical system under consideration. The excellent performance of the redesigned mortar method as well as the energy–momentum scheme is illustrated in representative numerical examples.In the present work we use the mortar finite element method for the coupling of nonconforming discretized sub-domains in the framework of nonlinear elasticity. The mortar method has been shown to preserve optimal convergence rates (see Laursen (2002) [25] for details) and is variationally consistent. We show that the method can be applied to isogeometric analysis with little effort, once the framework of NURBS based shape functions has been implemented. Furthermore, a specific coordinate augmentation technique allows the design of an energy–momentum scheme for the constrained mechanical system under consideration. The excellent performance of the redesigned mortar method as well as the energy–momentum scheme is illustrated in representative numerical examples.


Reliability-based optimization of maintenance scheduling of mechanical components under fatigue
This study presents the optimization of the maintenance scheduling of mechanical components under fatigue loading. The cracks of damaged structures may be detected during non-destructive inspection and subsequently repaired. Fatigue crack initiation and growth show inherent variability, and as well the outcome of inspection activities. The problem is addressed under the framework of reliability based optimization. The initiation and propagation of fatigue cracks are efficiently modeled using cohesive zone elements. The applicability of the method is demonstrated by a numerical example, which involves a plate with two holes subject to alternating stress.


IETI – Isogeometric Tearing and Interconnecting
Finite Element Tearing and Interconnecting (FETI) methods are a powerful approach to designing solvers for large-scale problems in computational mechanics. The numerical simulation problem is subdivided into a number of independent sub-problems, which are then coupled in appropriate ways. NURBS- (Non-Uniform Rational B-spline) based isogeometric analysis (IGA) applied to complex geometries requires to represent the computational domain as a collection of several NURBS geometries. Since there is a natural decomposition of the computational domain into several subdomains, NURBS-based IGA is particularly well suited for using FETI methods.This paper proposes the new IsogEometric Tearing and Interconnecting (IETI) method, which combines the advanced solver design of FETI with the exact geometry representation of IGA. We describe the IETI framework for two classes of simple model problems (Poisson and linearized elasticity) and discuss the coupling of the subdomains along interfaces (both for matching interfaces and for interfaces with T-joints, i.e. hanging nodes). Special attention is paid to the construction of a suitable preconditioner for the iterative linear solver used for the interface problem. We report several computational experiments to demonstrate the performance of the proposed IETI method.


Multigrid methods for isogeometric discretization
We present (geometric) multigrid methods for isogeometric discretization of scalar second order elliptic problems. The smoothing property of the relaxation method, and the approximation property of the intergrid transfer operators are analyzed. These properties, when used in the framework of classical multigrid theory, imply uniform convergence of two-grid and multigrid methods. Supporting numerical results are provided for the smoothing property, the approximation property, convergence factor and iterations count for V-, W- and F-cycles, and the linear dependence of V-cycle convergence on the smoothing steps. For two dimensions, numerical results include the problems with variable coefficients, simple multi-patch geometry, a quarter annulus, and the dependence of convergence behavior on refinement levels ℓ, whereas for three dimensions, only the constant coefficient problem in a unit cube is considered. The numerical results are complete up to polynomial order p=4, and for C0 and Cp-1 smoothness.


Coupling systems biology with multiscale mechanics, for computer simulations of bone remodeling
Bone remodeling is a process involving removal of mature bone tissue and subsequent formation of new bone tissue. This process is driven by complex actions of biological cells and biochemical factors, and it is sensitive to the loads applied onto the skeleton. Herein, we develop a mathematical framework describing this process at the (macroscopic) level of cortical bone, by combining, for the first time, bone cell population kinetics with multiscale bone mechanics. Key variables are concentrations of biological cells (osteoclasts, osteoblasts and their progenitors) and biochemical factors (RANK, RANKL, OPG, PTH, and TGF-β), as well as mechanical strains, both at the (“macroscopic”) level of cortical bone and at the (“microscopic”) level of the extravascular bone matrix. Multiscale bone mechanics delivers, as a function of the vascular porosity, the relation between the macroscopic strains resulting from the loads, and the microscopic strains, which are known to modulate, either directly, or via poromechanical couplings such as hydrostatic pressure or fluid flow, the expression or proliferation behavior of the biological cells residing in, or attached to the extravascular bone matrix. Hence, these microscopic strains enter the biochemical kinetics laws governing cell expression, proliferation, differentiation, and apoptosis. Without any additional phenomenologically motivated paradigm, this novel approach is able to explain the experimentally observed evolutions of bone mass in postmenopausal osteoporosis and under microgravity conditions: namely, a decrease of bone loss over time.


Asynchronous variational integration using continuous assumed gradient elements
Asynchronous variational integration (AVI) is a tool which improves the numerical efficiency of explicit time stepping schemes when applied to finite element meshes with local spatial refinement. This is achieved by associating an individual time step length to each spatial domain. Furthermore, long-term stability is ensured by its variational structure. This article presents AVI in the context of finite elements based on a weakened weak form (W2) Liu (2009) [1], exemplified by continuous assumed gradient elements Wolff and Bucher (2011) [2]. The article presents the main ideas of the modified AVI, gives implementation notes and a recipe for estimating the critical time step.


Distance fields on unstructured grids: Stable interpolation, assumed gradients, collision detection and gap function
This article presents a novel approach to collision detection based on distance fields. A novel interpolation ensures stability of the distances in the vicinity of complex geometries. An assumed gradient formulation is introduced leading to a C1-continuous distance function. The gap function is re-expressed allowing penalty and Lagrange multiplier formulations. The article introduces a node-to-element integration for first order elements, but also discusses signed distances, partial updates, intermediate surfaces, mortar methods and higher order elements. The algorithm is fast, simple and robust for complex geometries and self contact. The computed tractions conserve linear and angular momentum even in infeasible contact. Numerical examples illustrate the new algorithm in three dimensions.


Mixed and Galerkin finite element approximation of flow in a linear viscoelastic porous medium
We propose two fully discrete mixed and Galerkin finite element approximations to a system of equations describing the slow flow of a slightly compressible single phase fluid in a viscoelastic porous medium. One of our schemes is the natural one for the backward Euler time discretization but, due to the viscoelasticity, seems to be stable only for small enough time steps. The other scheme contains a lagged term in the viscous stress and pressure evolution equations and this is enough to prove unconditional stability. For this lagged scheme we prove an optimal order a priori error estimate under ideal regularity assumptions and demonstrate the convergence rates by using a model problem with a manufactured solution. The model and numerical scheme that we present are a natural extension to ‘poroviscoelasticity’ of the poroelasticity equations and scheme studied by Philips and Wheeler in (for example) [Philip Joseph Philips, Mary F.Wheeler, Comput. Geosci. 11 (2007) 145–158] although — importantly — their algorithms and codes would need only minor modifications in order to include the viscous effects. The equations and algorithms presented here have application to oil reservoir simulations and also to the condition of hydrocephalus — ‘water on the brain’. An illustrative example is given demonstrating that even small viscoelastic effects can produce noticeable differences in long-time response. To the best of our knowledge this is the first time a mixed and Galerkin scheme has been analysed and implemented for viscoelastic porous media.We propose two fully discrete mixed and Galerkin finite element approximations to a system of equations describing the slow flow of a slightly compressible single phase fluid in a viscoelastic porous medium. One of our schemes is the natural one for the backward Euler time discretization but, due to the viscoelasticity, seems to be stable only for small enough time steps. The other scheme contains a lagged term in the viscous stress and pressure evolution equations and this is enough to prove unconditional stability. For this lagged scheme we prove an optimal order a priori error estimate under ideal regularity assumptions and demonstrate the convergence rates by using a model problem with a manufactured solution. The model and numerical scheme that we present are a natural extension to ‘poroviscoelasticity’ of the poroelasticity equations and scheme studied by Philips and Wheeler in (for example) [Philip Joseph Philips, Mary F.Wheeler, Comput. Geosci. 11 (2007) 145–158] although — importantly — their algorithms and codes would need only minor modifications in order to include the viscous effects. The equations and algorithms presented here have application to oil reservoir simulations and also to the condition of hydrocephalus — ‘water on the brain’. An illustrative example is given demonstrating that even small viscoelastic effects can produce noticeable differences in long-time response. To the best of our knowledge this is the first time a mixed and Galerkin scheme has been analysed and implemented for viscoelastic porous media.


Incompressible smoothed particle hydrodynamics (SPH) with reduced temporal noise and generalised Fickian smoothing applied to body–water slam and efficient wave–body interaction
Incompressible smoothed particle hydrodynamics generally requires particle distribution smoothing to give stable and accurate simulations with noise-free pressures. The diffusion-based smoothing algorithm of Lind et al. (J. Comp. Phys. 231 (2012) 1499–1523) has proved effective for a range of impulsive flows and propagating waves. Here we apply this to body–water slam and wave–body impact problems and discover that temporal pressure noise can occur for these applications (while spatial noise is effectively eliminated). This is due to the free-surface treatment as a discontinuous boundary. Treating this as a continuous very thin boundary within the pressure solver is shown to effectively cure this problem. The particle smoothing algorithm is further generalised so that a non-dimensional diffusion coefficient is applied which suits a given time step and particle spacing.We model the particular problems of cylinder and wedge slam into still water. We also model wave-body impact by setting up undisturbed wave propagation within a periodic domain several wavelengths long and inserting the body. In this case, the loads become cyclic after one wave period and are in good agreement with experiment. This approach is more efficient than the conventional wave flume approach with a wavemaker which requires many wavelengths and a beach absorber.Results are accurate and virtually noise-free, spatially and temporally. Convergence is demonstrated. Although these test cases are two-dimensional with simple geometries, the approach is quite general and may be readily extended to three dimensions.


A Laplacian-based algorithm for non-isothermal atomistic-continuum hybrid simulation of micro and nano-flows
We propose a new hybrid algorithm for incompressible micro and nanoflows that applies to non-isothermal steady-state flows and does not require the calculation of the Irving–Kirkwood stress tensor or heat flux vector. The method is validated by simulating the flow in a channel under the effect of a gravity-like force with bounding walls at two different temperatures and velocities. The model shows very accurate results compared to benchmark full MD simulations. In the temperature results, in particular, the contribution of viscous dissipation is correctly evaluated.


Computational homogenization of liquid-phase sintering with seamless transition from macroscopic compressibility to incompressibility
Liquid phase sintering of particle agglomerates is modeled on the mesoscale as the viscous deformation of particle–particle contact, whereby the single driving force is the surface tension on the particle/pore interface. On the macroscale, a quasistatic equilibrium problem allows for the prediction of the shrinkage of the sintering body. The present paper presents a novel FE2 formulation of the two-scale sintering problem allowing for the transition to zero porosity, implying macroscale incompressibility. The seamless transition from compressibility to incompressibility on the macroscale is accomplished by introducing a mixed variational format. This has consequences also for the formulation of the mesoscale problem, that is complemented with an extra constraint equation regarding the prolongation of the volumetric part of the macroscopic rate-of-deformation. The numerical examples shows the sintering of a single representative volume element (RVE) which is sheared beyond the point where the porosity vanishes while subjected to zero macroscopic pressure.


A displacement-based finite element formulation for incompressible and nearly-incompressible cardiac mechanics
The Lagrange Multiplier (LM) and penalty methods are commonly used to enforce incompressibility and compressibility in models of cardiac mechanics. In this paper we show how both formulations may be equivalently thought of as a weakly penalized system derived from the statically condensed Perturbed Lagrangian formulation, which may be directly discretized maintaining the simplicity of penalty formulations with the convergence characteristics of LM techniques. A modified Shamanskii–Newton–Raphson scheme is introduced to enhance the nonlinear convergence of the weakly penalized system and, exploiting its equivalence, modifications are developed for the penalty form. Focusing on accuracy, we proceed to study the convergence behavior of these approaches using different interpolation schemes for both a simple test problem and more complex models of cardiac mechanics. Our results illustrate the well-known influence of locking phenomena on the penalty approach (particularly for lower order schemes) and its effect on accuracy for whole-cycle mechanics. Additionally, we verify that direct discretization of the weakly penalized form produces similar convergence behavior to mixed formulations while avoiding the use of an additional variable. Combining a simple structure which allows the solution of computationally challenging problems with good convergence characteristics, the weakly penalized form provides an accurate and efficient alternative to incompressibility and compressibility in cardiac mechanics.


An impulse-based energy tracking method for collision resolution
Discrete element methods can be based on either penalties or impulses to resolve collisions. A generic impulse based method, the energy tracking method (ETM), is described to resolve collisions between multiple non-convex bodies in three dimensions. As opposed to the standard sequential impulse method (SQM) and simultaneous impulse method (SMM), which also apply impulses to avoid penetration, the energy tracking method changes the relative velocity between two colliding bodies iteratively yet simultaneously. Its main novelty is that impulses are applied gradually at multi-point contacts, and energy changes at the contact points are tracked to ensure conservation. Three main steps are involved in the propagation of the impulses during the single- and multi-contact resolution: compression, restitution-related energy loss, and separation. Numerical tests show that the energy tracking method captures the energy conservation property of perfectly elastic single- and multi-point collisions. ETM exhibits improved angular velocity estimation, as compared to SMM and SQM, as demonstrated by two numerical examples that model multi-point contact between box-shaped objects. Angles of repose estimated for multi-object pack repositioning of spheres, cubes, and crosses are in good agreement with the reported experimental values.


An isoparametric approach to high-order curvilinear boundary-layer meshing
The generation of high-order curvilinear meshes for complex three-dimensional geometries is presently a challenging topic, particularly for meshes used in simulations at high Reynolds numbers where a thin boundary layer exists near walls and elements are highly stretched in the direction normal to flow. In this paper, we present a conceptually simple but very effective and modular method to address this issue. We propose an isoparametric approach, whereby a mesh containing a valid coarse discretization comprising of high-order triangular prisms near walls is refined to obtain a finer prismatic or tetrahedral boundary-layer mesh. The validity of the prismatic mesh provides a suitable mapping that allows one to obtain very fine mesh resolutions across the thickness of the boundary layer. We describe the method in detail for a high-order approximation using modal basis functions, discuss the requirements for the splitting method to produce valid prismatic and tetrahedral meshes and provide a sufficient criterion of validity in both cases. By considering two complex aeronautical configurations, we demonstrate how highly stretched meshes with sufficient resolution within the laminar sublayer can be generated to enable the simulation of flows with Reynolds numbers of 106 and above.


A sequential-adaptive strategy in space–time with application to consolidation of porous media
Issues related to space–time adaptivity for a class of nonlinear and time-dependent problems are discussed. The dG(k)-methods are adopted for the time integration, and the a posteriori error control is based on the appropriate dual problem in space–time. One key ingredient is to decouple the error generation in space and time with a hierarchical decomposition of the discrete space of dual solutions. The main idea put forward in the paper is to increase the computational efficiency of the adaptive scheme by avoiding recursive adaptations of the whole time-mesh; rather, the space-mesh and the time-step defining each finite space–time slab are defined in a truly sequential fashion.The proposed adaptive strategy is applied to the coupled consolidation problem in geomechanics involving large deformations. Its performance is investigated with the aid of a numerical example in 2D.Issues related to space–time adaptivity for a class of nonlinear and time-dependent problems are discussed. The dG(k)-methods are adopted for the time integration, and the a posteriori error control is based on the appropriate dual problem in space–time. One key ingredient is to decouple the error generation in space and time with a hierarchical decomposition of the discrete space of dual solutions. The main idea put forward in the paper is to increase the computational efficiency of the adaptive scheme by avoiding recursive adaptations of the whole time-mesh; rather, the space-mesh and the time-step defining each finite space–time slab are defined in a truly sequential fashion.The proposed adaptive strategy is applied to the coupled consolidation problem in geomechanics involving large deformations. Its performance is investigated with the aid of a numerical example in 2D.


Reliable and efficient a posteriori error estimation for adaptive IGA boundary element methods for weakly-singular integral equations
We consider the Galerkin boundary element method (BEM) for weakly-singular integral equations of the first-kind in 2D. We analyze some residual-type a posteriori error estimator which provides a lower as well as an upper bound for the unknown Galerkin BEM error. The required assumptions are weak and allow for piecewise smooth parametrizations of the boundary, local mesh-refinement, and related standard piecewise polynomials as well as NURBS. In particular, our analysis gives a first contribution to adaptive BEM in the frame of isogeometric analysis (IGABEM), for which we formulate an adaptive algorithm which steers the local mesh-refinement and the multiplicity of the knots. Numerical experiments underline the theoretical findings and show that the proposed adaptive strategy leads to optimal convergence.


Multiwavelet discontinuous Galerkin h-adaptive shallow water model
This paper presents a Godunov-type numerical formulation that is local, conservative and scalable in both accuracy and resolution. The keystone of the framework is to recast a local multi-resolution discontinuous Galerkin formulation and, combine it with multiwavelets (MWDG) to adaptively determine local resolution level by manipulating multiwavelet coefficients driven by one threshold value set by the user. Recent advances in discontinuous Galerkin modelling of the shallow water equations with topography source term are directly transferred to the MWDG framework. The adaptive MWDG model is tested for simulation of transient and steady shallow flow test cases demonstrating ability to model compound flows with appropriate level resolutions, and with comparable predictive quality as uniform mesh counterpart corresponding to highest resolution available.


An extended range of stable-symmetric-conservative Flux Reconstruction correction functions
The Flux Reconstruction (FR) approach offers an efficient route to achieving high-order accuracy on unstructured grids. Additionally, FR offers a flexible framework for defining a range of numerical schemes in terms of so-called FR correction functions. Recently, a one-parameter family of FR correction functions were identified that lead to stable schemes for 1D linear advection problems. In this study we develop a procedure for identifying an extended range of stable, symmetric, and conservative FR correction functions. The procedure is applied to identify ranges of such correction functions for various orders of accuracy. Numerical experiments are undertaken, and the results found to be in agreement with the theoretical findings.


A spectral element formulation of the immersed boundary method for Newtonian fluids
A spectral element formulation of the immersed boundary method (IBM) is presented. The spectral element formulation (SE-IBM) is a generalisation of the finite element immersed boundary method (FE-IBM) based on high-order approximations of the fluid variables. Several schemes for tracking the movement of the immersed boundary are considered and a semi-implicit Euler scheme is shown to offer advantages in terms of accuracy and efficiency. High-order spectral element approximations provide improved area conservation properties of the IBM due to the incompressibility constraint being more accurately satisfied. Superior orders of convergence are obtained for SE-IBM compared with FE-IBM in both L2 and H1 norms. The area conservation and convergence properties of the scheme are demonstrated on a series of benchmark problems.


Shape optimisation with multiresolution subdivision surfaces and immersed finite elements
We develop a new optimisation technique that combines multiresolution subdivision surfaces for boundary description with immersed finite elements for the discretisation of the primal and adjoint problems of optimisation. Similar to wavelets, multiresolution surfaces represent the domain boundary using a coarse control mesh and a sequence of detail vectors. Based on the multiresolution decomposition efficient and fast algorithms are available for reconstructing control meshes of varying fineness. During shape optimisation the vertex coordinates of control meshes are updated using the computed shape gradient information. By virtue of the multiresolution editing semantics, updating the coarse control mesh vertex coordinates leads to large-scale geometry changes and, conversely, updating the fine control mesh coordinates leads to small-scale geometry changes. In our computations we start by optimising the coarsest control mesh and refine it each time the cost function reaches a minimum. This approach effectively prevents the appearance of non-physical boundary geometry oscillations and control mesh pathologies, like inverted elements. Independent of the fineness of the control mesh used for optimisation, on the immersed finite element grid the domain boundary is always represented with a relatively fine control mesh of fixed resolution. With the immersed finite element method there is no need to maintain an analysis suitable domain mesh. In some of the presented two and three-dimensional elasticity examples the topology derivative is used for introducing new holes inside the domain. The merging or removing of holes is not considered.


Nanowires sheathed inside nanotubes: Manipulation, properties and applications
Since the discovery of metals encapsulated into multi-walled carbon nanotubes (CNTs), such sheathed structures attracted extensive interest with respect to the development of various synthetic strategies for producing the unique structure of nanowires sheathed inside nanotubes. The nanowire materials varied from metals to alloys, from semiconductors to insulators, and even metal–semiconductor heterojunctions were tried. In recent years, the studies on these nanostructures have been mainly focused on in-situ manipulation, property analysis and applications. Exploration of on-demand nano-engineering of the regarded structures toward practical device design and fabrication was mainly guided by high-resolution transmission electron microscopy (TEM) technique combining new capabilities of implementation of atomic force (AFM) or scanning tunneling microscopy (STM) holders, and heating/cooling holders. Such novel in-situ TEM techniques have rapidly developed to a stage where they truly become a very powerful tool for the studies of core/shell nanowire heterostructures. In this review, we summarize the significant developments and achievements in regards of manipulation, property measurements and device applications of inorganic nanowires sheathed inside nanotubes according to different categories of the filling materials, i.e., metals, alloys, compounds and semiconductor–metal heterojunction nanowires. We also highlight the irreplaceable value of in-situ TEM technology in this field, compare different fillings for so-called nanothermometers, discuss mass transportation mechanism in nanotubes, and conclude with an outlook of future developments and challenging issues that are still in the premature stage.


MINERAL: A program for the propagation of analytical uncertainty through mineral formula recalculations
Highlights► Mineral formula recalculations are rarely reported with the associated error. ► MINERAL propagates of analytical uncertainties through recalculation steps. ► Calculated error is reported on formula unit cations and mol end members. ► Program supports 9 common rock-forming minerals plus a generic routine. ► Fast, simple method to help assess the quality of data in a quantitative manner.


WASI-2D: A software tool for regionally optimized analysis of imaging spectrometer data from deep and shallow waters
Graphical abstract


Geological mapping using remote sensing data: A comparison of five machine learning algorithms, their response to variations in the spatial distribution of training data and the use of explicit spatial information
Machine learning algorithms (MLAs) are a powerful group of data-driven inference tools that offer an automated means of recognizing patterns in high-dimensional data. Hence, there is much scope for the application of MLAs to the rapidly increasing volumes of remotely sensed geophysical data for geological mapping problems. We carry out a rigorous comparison of five MLAs: Naive Bayes, k-Nearest Neighbors, Random Forests, Support Vector Machines, and Artificial Neural Networks, in the context of a supervised lithology classification task using widely available and spatially constrained remotely sensed geophysical data. We make a further comparison of MLAs based on their sensitivity to variations in the degree of spatial clustering of training data, and their response to the inclusion of explicit spatial information (spatial coordinates). Our work identifies Random Forests as a good first choice algorithm for the supervised classification of lithology using remotely sensed geophysical data. Random Forests is straightforward to train, computationally efficient, highly stable with respect to variations in classification model parameter values, and as accurate as, or substantially more accurate than the other MLAs trialed. The results of our study indicate that as training data becomes increasingly dispersed across the region under investigation, MLA predictive accuracy improves dramatically. The use of explicit spatial information generates accurate lithology predictions but should be used in conjunction with geophysical data in order to generate geologically plausible predictions. MLAs, such as Random Forests, are valuable tools for generating reliable first-pass predictions for practical geological mapping applications that combine widely available geophysical data.Machine learning algorithms (MLAs) are a powerful group of data-driven inference tools that offer an automated means of recognizing patterns in high-dimensional data. Hence, there is much scope for the application of MLAs to the rapidly increasing volumes of remotely sensed geophysical data for geological mapping problems. We carry out a rigorous comparison of five MLAs: Naive Bayes, k-Nearest Neighbors, Random Forests, Support Vector Machines, and Artificial Neural Networks, in the context of a supervised lithology classification task using widely available and spatially constrained remotely sensed geophysical data. We make a further comparison of MLAs based on their sensitivity to variations in the degree of spatial clustering of training data, and their response to the inclusion of explicit spatial information (spatial coordinates). Our work identifies Random Forests as a good first choice algorithm for the supervised classification of lithology using remotely sensed geophysical data. Random Forests is straightforward to train, computationally efficient, highly stable with respect to variations in classification model parameter values, and as accurate as, or substantially more accurate than the other MLAs trialed. The results of our study indicate that as training data becomes increasingly dispersed across the region under investigation, MLA predictive accuracy improves dramatically. The use of explicit spatial information generates accurate lithology predictions but should be used in conjunction with geophysical data in order to generate geologically plausible predictions. MLAs, such as Random Forests, are valuable tools for generating reliable first-pass predictions for practical geological mapping applications that combine widely available geophysical data.


Computed reconstruction of spatial ammonoid-shell orientation captured from digitized grinding and landmark data
Graphical abstract


Geographically distributed real-time digital simulations using linear prediction
Real-time (RT) simulator is a powerful tool for analyzing operational and control algorithms in electric power systems engineering. For understanding the dynamic and transient behavior of a power systems, significant RT computation capabilities are essential. A single unit of RT simulator has limited simulation capabilities. The most common way of augmenting simulation capability is using a bank of locally connected RT simulators. However, creating a large-sized bank of RT simulators involves significant financial investments and hence may not be feasible at all research facilities. Power and energy systems research facilities that use RT simulators are at diverse physical locations. In addition to RT simulators, research facilities around the world house an array of facilities with unique power, energy, and control systems for innovative research. To leverage these unique research facilities, geographically distributed RT simulation based on Wide Area Network (WAN) is required. Typical RT simulators perform simulations with time-steps in the order of milliseconds to microseconds, whereas data latency for communication on WAN may be as high as a few hundred milliseconds. Such communication latency between RT simulators may lead to inaccuracies and instabilities in geographically distributed RT simulations. In this paper, the effect of communication latency on geographically distributed RT simulation is discussed and analyzed. In order to reduce the effect of the communication latency, a Real-Time Predictor (RTP), based on linear curve fitting is developed and integrated into the distributed RT simulation environment. Two geographically distributed digital RT simulators are used to perform dynamic simulations of an electric power system with a fixed communication latency and the predictor. Empirical results demonstrate the effects of communication latency on the simulation and the performance of the RTP to improve the accuracy of simulations.


Robust indoor speaker recognition in a network of audio and video sensors
Situational awareness is achieved naturally by the human senses of sight and hearing in combination. Automatic scene understanding aims at replicating this human ability using microphones and cameras in cooperation. In this paper, audio and video signals are fused and integrated at different levels of semantic abstractions. We detect and track a speaker who is relatively unconstrained, i.e., free to move indoors within an area larger than the comparable reported work, which is usually limited to round table meetings. The system is relatively simple: consisting of just 4 microphone pairs and a single camera. Results show that the overall multimodal tracker is more reliable than single modality systems, tolerating large occlusions and cross-talk. System evaluation is performed on both single and multi-modality tracking. The performance improvement given by the audio–video integration and fusion is quantified in terms of tracking precision and accuracy as well as speaker diarisation error rate and precision–recall (recognition). Improvements vs. the closest works are evaluated: 56% sound source localisation computational cost over an audio only system, 8% speaker diarisation error rate over an audio only speaker recognition unit and 36% on the precision–recall metric over an audio–video dominant speaker recognition method.Situational awareness is achieved naturally by the human senses of sight and hearing in combination. Automatic scene understanding aims at replicating this human ability using microphones and cameras in cooperation. In this paper, audio and video signals are fused and integrated at different levels of semantic abstractions. We detect and track a speaker who is relatively unconstrained, i.e., free to move indoors within an area larger than the comparable reported work, which is usually limited to round table meetings. The system is relatively simple: consisting of just 4 microphone pairs and a single camera. Results show that the overall multimodal tracker is more reliable than single modality systems, tolerating large occlusions and cross-talk. System evaluation is performed on both single and multi-modality tracking. The performance improvement given by the audio–video integration and fusion is quantified in terms of tracking precision and accuracy as well as speaker diarisation error rate and precision–recall (recognition). Improvements vs. the closest works are evaluated: 56% sound source localisation computational cost over an audio only system, 8% speaker diarisation error rate over an audio only speaker recognition unit and 36% on the precision–recall metric over an audio–video dominant speaker recognition method.


A model of acoustic absorption in fluids based on a continuous distribution of relaxation times
Highlights► Sound absorption theory in fluid with continuous distribution of relaxations is given. ► The generalization of the discrete relaxation theory of sound absorption is given. ► The fractional dynamics equation for sound waves in bio-tissue is its special case. ► A method to reconstruct equations of motion from experimental data is given.


Flow and geometry induced scattering of high frequency acoustic duct modes
Highlights► This paper examines sound propagation in slowly varying ducts with flow at high frequency. ► Two scattering mechanisms are identified that allow neighbouring modes to interact. ► Scattering occurs at significantly lower frequencies when a mean flow is present. ► An exchange of energy between mean flow and acoustic field occurs during scattering.


One-dimensional reflection by a semi-infinite periodic row of scatterers
Three methods are described in order to solve the canonical problem of the one-dimensional reflection by a semi-infinite periodic row of identical scatterers. The exact reflection coefficient R is determined. The first method is associated with shifting the domain by a single period and subsequently considering two scatterers, one being a single scatterer and the second being the entire semi-infinite array. The second method determines the reflection coefficient RN associated with a finite array of N scatterers. The limit as N→∞ is then taken. In general RN does not converge to R in this limit, although we summarize various arguments that can be made to ensure the correct limit is achieved. The third method considers direct approaches. In particular, for point masses, the governing inhomogeneous ordinary differential equation is solved using the discrete Wiener–Hopf technique.


On the integer max-linear programming problem
Max-linear programs have been used to describe optimisation problems for multiprocessor interactive systems. In some instances the variables used in this model are required to be integer; however, no method seems to exist for finding integer solutions to max-linear programs.For a generic class of matrices, we show that integer solutions to two-sided max-linear systems and programs can be found in polynomial time. For general matrices, we adapt the existing methods for finding real solutions to obtain algorithms for finding integer solutions.Max-linear programs have been used to describe optimisation problems for multiprocessor interactive systems. In some instances the variables used in this model are required to be integer; however, no method seems to exist for finding integer solutions to max-linear programs.For a generic class of matrices, we show that integer solutions to two-sided max-linear systems and programs can be found in polynomial time. For general matrices, we adapt the existing methods for finding real solutions to obtain algorithms for finding integer solutions.
[1] X. Allamigeon S. Gaubert É. Goubault The tropical double description method J.-Y. Marion Th. Schwentick Proceedings of the 27th International Symposium on Theoretical Aspects of Computer Science STACS 2010 Leibniz International Proceedings in Informatics (LIPIcs) vol. 5 2010 Schloss Dagstuhl-Leibniz-Zentrum fuer Informatik Dagstuhl, Germany 47 58 [2] P. Butkovič Max-algebra: the linear algebra of combinatorics? Linear Algebra and its Applications 367 2003 313 335 [3] P. Butkovič Max-Linear Systems: Theory and Algorithms 2010 Springer-Verlag London [4] P. Butkovič A. Aminu Max-linear programming IMA Journal of Management Mathematics 20 3 2009 233 249 [5] P. Butkovič G. Hegedüs An elimination method for finding all solutions of the system of linear equations over an extremal algebra Ekonomicko-Matematický Obzor 20 1984 203 215 [6] P. Butkovič, M. MacCaig, The alternating method for finding integer solutions to two-sided systems, University of Birmingham, School of Mathematics, 2012/08. [7] P. Butkovič M. MacCaig On integer eigenvectors and subeigenvectors in the max-plus algebra Linear Algebra and its Applications 438 2013 3408 3424 [8] R.A. Cuninghame-Green Minimax Algebra Lecture Notes in Economics and Math. Systems vol. 166 1979 Springer Berlin [9] R.A. Cuninghame-Green P. Butkovič The equation  A x = B y  over  ( max , + ) Theoretical Computer Science 293 2003 3 12 [10] S. Gaubert R.D. Katz S. Sergeev Tropical linear-fractional programming and parametric mean-payoff games Journal of Symbolic Computation 47 2012 1447 1478 [11] R.M. Karp A characterization of the minimum cycle mean in a digraph Discrete Mathematics 23 1978 309 311 [12] E.A. Walkup, G. Boriello, a general linear max-plus solution technique, in: J. Gunawardena (Ed.), Idempotency, Cambridge, 1988, pp. 406–415,.

Generalizations of bounds on the index of convergence to weighted digraphs
We study sequences of optimal walks of a growing length in weighted digraphs, or equivalently, sequences of entries of max-algebraic matrix powers with growing exponents. It is known that these sequences are eventually periodic when the digraphs are strongly connected. The transient of such periodicity depends, in general, both on the size of digraph and on the magnitude of the weights. In this paper, we show that some bounds on the indices of periodicity of (unweighted) digraphs, such as the bounds of Wielandt, Dulmage–Mendelsohn, Schwarz, Kim and Gregory–Kirkland–Pullman, apply to the weights of optimal walks when one of their ends is a critical node.We study sequences of optimal walks of a growing length in weighted digraphs, or equivalently, sequences of entries of max-algebraic matrix powers with growing exponents. It is known that these sequences are eventually periodic when the digraphs are strongly connected. The transient of such periodicity depends, in general, both on the size of digraph and on the magnitude of the weights. In this paper, we show that some bounds on the indices of periodicity of (unweighted) digraphs, such as the bounds of Wielandt, Dulmage–Mendelsohn, Schwarz, Kim and Gregory–Kirkland–Pullman, apply to the weights of optimal walks when one of their ends is a critical node.


Exploring microstructural changes associated with oxidation in Ni–YSZ SOFC electrodes using high resolution X-ray computed tomography
Highlights► X-ray nano-CT provides a technique for SOFC electrode microstructure characterisation. ► It is non-destructive enabling successful quantification of microstructural evolution. ► Here we demonstrate its application to explore the effects of oxidation on Ni-YSZ electrodes. ► We successfully characterise the growth of porous NiO film during step-wise oxidation. ► The method has wider implications for studies of microstructural change in a range of applications.


A combinatorial nanoprecursor route for direct solid state chemistry: Discovery and electronic properties of new iron-doped lanthanum nickelates up to La4Ni2FeO10−δ
Highlights► A new high-throughput combinatorial process for materials discovery is described. ► Layered lanthanum nickelates are formed directly, without the need for comminution. ► Fe is doped into Ruddlesden Popper type La4Ni3−xFexO10 to a maximum of x=1. ► DC electrical conductivity of all phase pure materials is reported.


Variable temperature neutron diffraction study of crystal structure and transport pathways in oxide ion conductors Bi12.5Ln1.5ReO24.5 (Ln=Lu, Er)
Samples of highly conducting Bi12.5Lu1.5ReO24.5 and Bi12.5Er1.5ReO24.5 have been studied by neutron powder diffraction at room temperature for both phases and at 25°C≤T≤500°C in the case of Bi12.5Er1.5ReO24.5. Both materials crystallize in the cubic δ-Bi2O3 related system, space group Fm-3m. Changes in the oxygen sublattice at 25°C≤T≤500°C have been investigated by the Rietveld and maximum entropy methods.


Electrochemical properties of La0.6Sr0.4CoO3−δ thin films investigated by complementary impedance spectroscopy and isotope exchange depth profiling
The oxygen exchange and diffusion properties of La0.6Sr0.4CoO3−δ thin films on yttria stabilized zirconia were analyzed by impedance spectroscopy and 18O tracer experiments. The investigations were performed on the same thin film samples and at the same temperature (400°C) in order to get complementary information by the two methods. Electrochemical impedance spectroscopy can reveal resistive and capacitive contributions of such systems, but an exact interpretation of the spectra of complex oxide electrodes is often difficult from impedance data alone. It is shown that additional isotope exchange depth profiling can significantly help interpreting impedance spectra by giving reliable information on the individual contribution and exact location of resistances (surface, electrode bulk, interface). The measurements also allowed quantitative comparison of electrode polarization resistances obtained by different methods.


Mapping electrochemically driven gas exchange of mixed conducting SrTi0.7Fe0.3O3−δ and Ce0.8Gd0.2O1.9 thin films by 18O tracer incorporation under reducing atmosphere
Thermally and electrochemically driven 18O tracer exchange experiments in H2/H218O atmosphere were performed on SrTi0.7Fe0.3O3−δ and Ce0.8Gd0.2O2−δ thin films on single crystalline YSZ substrates. Noble metal current collectors were deposited on both films and electrochemically polarized during the exchange experiment. The resulting tracer distribution was analyzed by spatially resolved secondary ion mass spectrometry. Increased tracer fraction near the current collectors was found under cathodic polarization and decreased tracer fraction under anodic polarization. High cathodic bias leads to enhanced n-type electronic conductivity, which increases the extent of the electrochemically active zone.


Oxygen reduction via grain boundary transport in thin film platinum electrodes on yttria stabilized zirconia
Model-type sputter deposited platinum microelectrodes with different grain sizes were investigated on single crystalline yttria stabilized zirconia (YSZ) by means of impedance spectroscopy. Measurements on single platinum microelectrodes could be continuously performed for >100h and from 250 to 800°C without losing contact. From the temperature dependence, two parallel reaction pathways for oxygen reduction could be identified. Above 450°C, a surface path with a rate determining step located at the three phase boundary is predominant. Its polarization resistance is independent of the Pt grain size and exhibits an activation energy of ca. 1.8eV. In the low temperature regime (<450°C) a bulk path through Pt was verified, with an electrode polarization resistance depending on the Pt grain size. This resistance is only slightly thermally activated and the rate limiting step is most probably oxygen diffusion along Pt grain boundaries.


Nickel nanocatalyst exsolution from (La,Sr) (Cr,M,Ni)O3 (MMn,Fe) perovskites for the fuel oxidation layer of Oxygen Transport Membranes
La0.75Sr0.25Cr0.5Mn0.5O3 (LSCM) and La0.75Sr0.25Cr0.5Fe0.5O3 (LSCF) perovskites with partial substitution of the B-site by 5mol% of Ni were synthesised and characterised for the fuel oxidation layer of Oxygen Transport Membranes (OTMs). X-ray diffraction showed that single phase compounds were obtained at 1300°C. LSCM exhibits a rhombohedral structure and LSCF an orthorhombic structure. Both materials retain their structures, after doping the B site with Ni, with small changes on the unit cell parameters. Thermal analysis under reducing conditions was used to investigate the reducibility of these perovskites up to 900°C, which appears to be enhanced by doping with Ni. The formation of Ni nanoparticles (30–50nm) on the LSCMNi and LSCFNi grains was observed by scanning electron microscopy, after reducing the samples in 5% H2/Ar at 900°C, indicating possible enhanced catalytic activity and potential benefits for the development of the OTMs. DC conductivity measurements conducted under a redox cycle, indicate that LSCFNi presents a better redox stability than LSCMNi.


Magnetically interacting low dimensional Ni-nanostructures within porous silicon
Electrodeposition of ferromagnetic metals, a common method to fabricate magnetic nanostructures, is used for the incorporation of Ni structures into the pores of porous silicon templates. The porous silicon is fabricated in various morphologies with average pore-diameters between 40 and 95nm and concomitant pore-distances between 60 and 40nm. The metal nanostructures are deposited with different geometries as spheres, ellipsoids or wires influenced by the deposition process parameters. Furthermore small Ni-particles with diameters between 3 and 6nm can be deposited on the walls of the porous silicon template forming a metal tube. Analysis of this tube-like arrangement by transmission electron microscopy (TEM) shows that the distribution of the Ni-particles is quite narrow, which means that the distance between the particles is smaller than 10nm. Such a close arrangement of the Ni-particles assures magnetic interactions between them. Due to their size these small Ni-particles are superparamagnetic but dipolar coupling between them results in a ferromagnetic behavior of the whole system. Thus a semiconducting/ferromagnetic hybrid material with a broad range of magnetic properties can be fabricated. Furthermore this composite is an interesting candidate for silicon based applications and the compatibility with today’s process technology.


High aspect ratio silicon and polyimide nanopillars by combination of nanosphere lithography and intermediate mask pattern transfer
Silicon and polymer nanopillar structures with sub-100nm diameter and high aspect ratios were fabricated using a modified nanosphere lithography process. A thin silicon film was sputtered onto spin-coated polyimide films. A self-assembled layer of nanospheres was then formed on the silicon. Reactive ion etching with SF6/C4F8 was used to transfer the nanosphere pattern to the silicon. Oxygen plasma etching then transferred the silicon pattern into the polymer to create nanopillars. The nanopillar diameter could be finely tuned by oxygen plasma thinning of the nanospheres and the conditions for silicon mask etching. In the last step the polyimide pillars served as etch masks to transfer the structures back into the silicon substrate to give well-ordered pillars of 1.3μm height and 75nm diameter.


Design and fabrication of densely integrated silicon quantum dots using a VLSI compatible hydrogen silsesquioxane electron beam lithography process
Hydrogen silsesquioxane (HSQ) is a high resolution negative-tone electron beam resist allowing for direct transfer of nanostructures into silicon-on-insulator. Using this resist for electron beam lithography, we fabricate high density lithographically defined Silicon double quantum dot (QD) transistors. We show that our approach is compatible with very large scale integration, allowing for parallel fabrication of up to 144 scalable devices. HSQ process optimisation allowed for realisation of reproducible QD dimensions of 50nm and tunnel junction down to 25nm. We observed that 80% of the fabricated devices had dimensional variations of less than 5nm. These are the smallest high density double QD transistors achieved to date. Single electron simulations combined with preliminary electrical characterisations justify the reliability of our device and process.


Fullerene-based spin-on-carbon hardmask
As feature sizes have diminished the need for extremely thin photoresist films has grown. Given the poor selectivity of typical resists with respect to silicon during plasma etching, it has become common to use an intermediate hardmask to transfer the pattern. Furthermore the use of trilayer etch stacks to amplify the achievable etch aspect ratio is becoming increasingly popular for critical layers. Here we introduce a new fullerene based spin-on-carbon layer for use in a multilayer etch stack. Carbon films of between 20 and 1270nm were prepared by spin coating. Thin silicon films were deposited on the carbon layer and patterned using a thin photoresist. Patterns were transferred to the carbon layer with high anisotropy at resolutions down to 40nm using an oxygen plasma, and then subsequently etched into the silicon substrate using an SF6/C4F8 etch with high aspect ratio.


Atomic resolution top-down nanofabrication with low-current focused-ion-beam thinning
Techniques for scalable fabrication of one-dimensional or quasi-one-dimensional nanowires are of great importance to observe quantum size effects and build quantum information devices. In this work, we developed a technique for size reduction of both lateral and freestanding tungsten composite nanostructures using focused-ion-beam (FIB) thinning. Different exposure times and ion-beam currents were used to control the final size and the thinning rate and accuracy of a group of nanowires, an individual nanowire and a portion of a nanowire by low-current site-specific milling. A transmission electron microscope image of a thinned superconducting tungsten composite nanowire with width reduced from 80nm to 50nm shows uniform shrinking along the length of the wire and high resolution image shows no obvious changes of the morphology after thinning. The variation of the superconducting critical current density upon thinning is insignificant; it is 1.7×105 and 1.4×105A/cm2 at 4.26K for the as-deposited and wire with width reduced to 50nm, respectively. These results suggest that FIB-milling is a potential approach for controllable size reduction enabling the observation of size- and quantum effects.


Identification of intrinsic electron trapping sites in bulk amorphous silica from ab initio calculations
Using ab initio calculations we demonstrate that extra electrons in pure amorphous SiO2 can be trapped in deep band gap states. Classical potentials were used to generate amorphous silica models and density functional theory to characterise the geometrical and electronic structures of trapped electrons. Extra electrons can trap spontaneously on pre-existing structural precursors in amorphous SiO2 and produce ≈3.2eV deep states in the band gap. These precursors comprise wide (⩾130°) O–Si–O angles and elongated Si–O bonds at the tails of corresponding distributions. The electron trapping in amorphous silica structure results in an opening of the O–Si–O angle (up to almost 180°). We estimate the concentration of these electron trapping sites to be ≈5×1019cm-3.


A computational study of Si–H bonds as precursors for neutral E′ centres in amorphous silica and at the Si/SiO2 interface
Using computational modelling we investigate whether Si–H Bonds can serve as precursors for neutral E′ centre formation in amorphous silica and at the Si/SiO2 interface. Classical inter-atomic potentials are used to construct models of a-SiO2 containing Si–H bonds. We then investigate the mechanism of dissociation of a Si–H bond to create a neutral E′ defect, that is a 3-coordinated silicon with an unpaired electron localised on it. We show that the Si–H bond is extremely stable, but as a result of hole injection it is significantly weakened and may dissociate, creating a neutral E′ centre and a proton attached to one of the nearby oxygen atoms. The proton can diffuse around the E′ centre and has a profound effect on the defect levels. We show that at a Si/SiO2 interface, the position of the proton can facilitate electron transfer from the Si substrate onto the defect, making it negatively charged.


Low EOT GeO2/Al2O3/HfO2 on Ge substrate using ultrathin Al deposition
High-κ dielectric gate stacks comprising HfO2 were fabricated on Ge with alumina as the barrier level. This was achieved by thermal annealing in an ultra high vacuum to remove the native oxide followed by deposition of aluminium by molecular beam epitaxy. After in situ oxidation at ambient temperature, HfO2 was deposited by atomic layer deposition. The devices underwent physical and electrical characterisation and show low EOT down to 1.3nm, low leakage current of less than 10−7Acm−2 at ±1V, and CV hysteresis of ∼10mV.


Self-folding nano- and micropatterned hydrogel tissue engineering scaffolds by single step photolithographic process
Current progress in tissue engineering is focused on the creation of environments in which cultures of relevant cells can adhere, grow and form functional tissue. We propose a method for controlled chemical and topographical cues through surface patterning of self-folding hydrogel films. This provides a conversion of 2D patterning techniques into a viable method of manufacturing a 3D scaffold. While similar bilayers have previously been demonstrated, here we present a faster and high throughput process for fabricating self-folding hydrogel devices incorporating controllable surface nanotopographies by serial hot embossing of sacrificial layers and photolithography.


SU-8 etching in inductively coupled oxygen plasma
Structuring or removal of the epoxy based, photo sensitive polymer SU-8 by inductively coupled plasma reactive ion etching (ICP-RIE) was investigated as a function of plasma chemistry, bias power, temperature, and pressure. In a pure oxygen plasma, surface accumulation of antimony from the photo-initiator introduced severe roughness and reduced etch rate significantly. Addition of SF6 to the plasma chemistry reduced the antimony surface concentration with lower roughness and higher etch rate as an outcome. Furthermore the etch anisotropy could be tuned by controlling the bias power. Etch rates up to 800nmmin−1 could be achieved with low roughness and high anisotropy.


Increased efficiency of direct nanoimprinting on planar and curved bulk titanium through surface modification
In this work the direct transfer of nanopatterns into titanium is demonstrated. The nanofeatures are imprinted at room temperature using diamond stamps in a single step. We also show that the imprint properties of the titanium surface can be altered by anodisation yielding a significant reduction in the required imprint force for pattern transfer. The anodisation process is also utilised for curved titanium surfaces where a reduced imprint force is preferable to avoid sample deformation and damage. We finally demonstrate that our process can be applied directly to titanium rods.


Numerical modeling and experimental verification of through silicon via (TSV) filling in presence of additives
Copper electro-chemical deposition (ECD) of through silicon via (TSV) is a key challenge of 3D integration. This paper presents a numerical modeling of TSV filling concerning the influence of the accelerator and the suppressor. The diffusion–adsorption model was used in the simulation and effects of the additives were incorporated in the model. The boundary conditions were derived from a set of experimental Tafel curves with different concentrations of additives, which provided a quick and accurate way for copper ECD process prediction without complicated surface kinetic parameters fitting. The level set method (LSM) was employed to track the copper and electrolyte interface. The simulation results were in good agreement with the experiments. For a given feature size, the current density for superfilling could be predicted, which provided a guideline for ECD process optimization.


Growth assay of individual pollen tubes arrayed by microchannel device
To restrict pollen tube growth to a single focal plane is an important subject to enable their accurate growth analysis under microscopic observation. In the conventional method to assay pollen tube growth, the pollen tubes grow in a disorderly manner on solid medium, rendering it impossible to observe their growth in detail. Here, we present a new method to assay pollen tube growth using poly-dimethylsiloxane microchannel device to isolate individual pollen tubes. The growth of the pollen tube is confined to the microchannel and to the same focal plane, allowing accurate microscopic observations. This methodology has the potential for analyses of pollen tube growth in microfluidic environments in response to chemical products and signaling molecules, which paves the way for various experiments on plant reproduction.


Measuring electro-mechanical properties of thin films on polymer substrates
In order to advance flexible electronic technologies it is important to study the electrical properties of thin metal films on polymer substrates under mechanical load. At the same time, the observation of film deformation and fracture as well as the stresses that are present in the films during straining are also crucial to investigate. To address both the electromechanical and deformation behavior of metal films supported by polymer substrates, in-situ 4 point probe resistance measurements were performed with in-situ atomic force microscopy imaging of the film surface during straining. The 4 point probe resistance measurements allow for the examination of the changes in resistance with strain, while the surface imaging permits the visualization of localized thinning and crack formation. Furthermore, in-situ synchrotron tensile tests provide information about the stresses in the film and show the yield stress where the deformation initiates and the relaxation of the film during imaging. A thin 200nm Cu film on 23μm thick PET substrate will be used to illustrate the combined techniques. The combination of electrical measurements, surface imaging, and stress measurements allow for a better understanding of electromechanical behavior needed for the improvement and future success of flexible electronic devices.


Lab-on-a-chip devices: How to close and plug the lab?
Lab-on-a-chip (LOC) devices are broadly used for research in the life sciences and diagnostics and represent a very fast moving field. LOC devices are designed, prototyped and assembled using numerous strategies and materials but some fundamental trends are that these devices typically need to be (1) sealed, (2) supplied with liquids, reagents and samples, and (3) often interconnected with electrical or microelectronic components. In general, closing and connecting to the outside world these miniature labs remain a challenge irrespectively of the type of application pursued. Here, we review methods for sealing and connecting LOC devices using standard approaches as well as recent state-of-the-art methods. This review provides easy-to-understand examples and targets the microtechnology/engineering community as well as researchers in the life sciences.


Biochemical engineering nerve conduits using peptide amphiphiles
Graphical abstract


Novel phage display-derived neuroblastoma-targeting peptides potentiate the effect of drug nanocarriers in preclinical settings
Graphical abstractNovel phage display-derived neuroblastoma-targeting peptides potentiate the effect of drug nanocarriers in preclinical settings.


In vivo targeting of adoptively transferred T-cells with antibody- and cytokine-conjugated liposomes
Graphical abstract


Uptake and transport of B12-conjugated nanoparticles in airway epithelium
Graphical abstractThe vitamin B12 endocytic system is present in the airways, being able to transport B12-functionalized nanoparticles transepithelially. B12-nanoparticles display enhanced apical-to-basolateral transport, and a different trafficking behaviour to soluble B12.


A novel emulsion-type adjuvant containing CpG oligodeoxynucleotides enhances CD8+ T-cell-mediated anti-tumor immunity
Graphical abstract


PEGylation improves the receptor-mediated transfection efficiency of peptide-targeted, self-assembling, anionic nanocomplexes
Graphical abstract


Modelling the failure of reinforced concrete with nonlocal and crack band approaches using the damage-plasticity model CDPM2
A nonlocal extension of the damage-plasticity model CDPM2 is proposed. The performance of this extension is evaluated in comparison with a crack band version of the same model for describing the failure of reinforced concrete. In particular, the influence of mesh size on the structural response in the form of load–displacement curves and strain distributions is studied for a reinforced concrete beam subjected to four point bending. The nonlocal model provides mesh independent load–displacement curves and strain profiles, whereas the peak loads and strain profiles obtained with the crack band model depend on the element size.A nonlocal extension of the damage-plasticity model CDPM2 is proposed. The performance of this extension is evaluated in comparison with a crack band version of the same model for describing the failure of reinforced concrete. In particular, the influence of mesh size on the structural response in the form of load–displacement curves and strain distributions is studied for a reinforced concrete beam subjected to four point bending. The nonlocal model provides mesh independent load–displacement curves and strain profiles, whereas the peak loads and strain profiles obtained with the crack band model depend on the element size.


A theoretical and experimental exploration of the mechanism of microwave assisted 1,3-dipolar cycloaddition of pyridinium ylides to single walled carbon nanotubes
Graphical abstract


Investigation into the use of CaZrO3 as a facecoat material in the investment casting of TiAl alloys
Research was carried out to determine the interactions between the filler and stucco materials in CaZrO3 based facecoats during shell firing as well as between the facecoat and a TiAl alloy during the casting process. A ‘flash re-melting’ technique, which gives a similar heating profile to the actual investment casting process, was used to study the phase transformations in the shell moulds. The chemical inertness of the facecoat was then investigated using a sessile drop test using a Ti–45Al–2Nb–2Mn–0.2TiB alloy. In this study, the facecoat compositions and the interaction products between metal and shells were characterized using x-ray diffraction, scanning electron microscopy (SEM) and transmission electron microscopy (TEM). A severe interaction was found between CaZrO3 filler and Al2O3 stucco, which rapidly damaged the shell surface. As well as oxygen, zirconium and silicon ions from the shell moulds were also observed to penetrate into the TiAl metal to form (Ti, Zr)5(Al, Si)3 phases in the metal/shell interfacial areas.


On the effect of Nb-based compounds on the microstructure of Al–12Si alloy
Cast Al alloys are important structural materials for the lightweighting of cars and, consequently, reduction of greenhouse gases emission and pollution. The microstructure and properties of cast Al alloys could be further improved by means of grain refinement, practise which cannot efficiently be performed with common Al–Ti–B grain refiners used for wrought Al alloys. In this work we proposed the employment of Nb+B inoculation as an alternative for the refinement of the primary α-Al dendrites of cast Al–Si alloy by studying the grain refinement induced by the Nb+B inoculants as a function of key aspects such as cooling rate, fading behaviour and simulated recyclability tests. It is found that the grain size of the Nb+B inoculated material is noticeably less sensitive to the cooling rate. Nb+B inoculants are still present and promote the refinement of the Al–12Si alloy even after few hours of contact time, although some fading is detected. Furthermore, Nb+B inoculants are also still effective for enhancing heterogeneous nucleation after three remelting of the inoculated alloy. The fading behaviour and ability to retain grain refining potency after remelting are highly relevant to industrial scale applications.


Conductivity and redox stability of double perovskite oxide SrCaFe1+xMo1–xO6–δ (x = 0.2, 0.4, 0.6)
A series of new double perovskite oxides SrCaFe1+xMo1–xO6–δ (x = 0.2, 0.4, 0.6) were synthesised by solid state reaction method. Synthesis of SrCaFe1+xMo1–xO6–δ (x = 0.2, 0.4, 0.6) were achieved above 700 °C in 5% H2/Ar, albeit with the formation of impurity phases. Introduction of calcium to Sr2Fe1+xMo1–xO6–δ (x = 0.2, 0.4, 0.6) was not successful in simultaneously improving the conductivity of these compounds, with a significant reduction in the formability observed with increasing calcium content. Phase stability upon redox cycling was not observed for SrCaFe1+xMo1–xO6–δ (x = 0.2, 0.4, 0.6). Redox cycling of SrCaFe1+xMo1–xO6–δ (x = 0.2, 0.4, 0.6) demonstrates a strong dependence on high temperature reduction to achieve high conductivities, with re-reduction at lower temperatures attaining between 0.1% and 58.4% of the initial conductivity observed after high temperature reduction. The conductivity of SrCaFe1.2Mo0.8O6–δ in 5%H2/Ar between 300 °C and 500 °C was around 73.5 Scm−1. The reliance of these compounds on high temperature reduction is expected to limit their utility as SOFC anode materials, as the vulnerability to oxidation can have disastrous consequence for fuel cell durability.


The interaction factor method for energy pile groups
Prior to this study, no simplified yet rational methods were available for estimating the vertical displacements of energy pile groups subjected to thermal loads. Observing such a challenge, the goal of this study has been threefold: (i) to extend the interaction factor concept from the framework of conventional pile groups to that of energy pile groups, (ii) to present charts for the analysis of the displacement interaction between two identical energy piles over a broad range of design conditions, and (iii) to propose, apply and validate the interaction factor method for the displacement analysis of energy pile groups.Prior to this study, no simplified yet rational methods were available for estimating the vertical displacements of energy pile groups subjected to thermal loads. Observing such a challenge, the goal of this study has been threefold: (i) to extend the interaction factor concept from the framework of conventional pile groups to that of energy pile groups, (ii) to present charts for the analysis of the displacement interaction between two identical energy piles over a broad range of design conditions, and (iii) to propose, apply and validate the interaction factor method for the displacement analysis of energy pile groups.


Excited electronic states of MnO4−: Challenges for wavefunction and density functional response theories
The lowest excited electronic states of the permanganate ion MnO4− are calculated using a hierarchy of coupled cluster response approaches, as well as time-dependent density functional theory. It is shown that while full linear response coupled cluster with singles and doubles (or higher) performs well, that permanganate represents a stern test for approximate coupled cluster response models, and that problems can be traced to very large orbital relaxation effects. TD-DFT is reasonably robust although errors around 0.6eV are still observed. In order to further investigate the strong correlations prevalent in the electronic ground state large-scale RASSCF calculations were also performed. Again very large orbital relaxation in the correlated wavefunction is observed. Although the system can qualitatively be described by a single configuration, multi-reference diagnostic values show that care must be taken in this and similar metal complexes.


Fabrication and simulation of organic transistors and functional circuits
We report the development of a vacuum-evaporation route for the roll-to-roll fabrication of functioning organic circuits. A number of key findings and observations are highlighted which influenced the eventual fabrication protocol adopted. Initially, the role of interface roughness in determining carrier mobility in thin film transistors (TFTs) is investigated. Then it is shown that TFT yield is higher for devices fabricated on a flash-evaporated-plasma-polymerised tri(propyleneglycol) diacrylate (TPGDA) gate dielectric than for TFTs based on a spin-coated polystyrene (PS) dielectric. However, a degradation in mobility is observed which is attributed to the highly polar TPGDA surface. It is shown that high mobility, low gate-leakage currents and excellent stability are restored when the surface of TPGDA was buffered with a thin, spin-coated PS film. The resulting baseline process allowed arrays of functional circuits such as ring oscillators, NOR/NAND logic gates and S–R latches to be fabricated with high yield and their performance to be simulated.


Generating symmetry-adapted bases for non-Abelian point groups to be used in vibronic coupling Hamiltonians
The vibronic coupling Hamiltonian is a standard model used to describe the potential energy surfaces of systems in which non-adiabatic coupling is a key feature. This includes Jahn–Teller and Renner–Teller systems. The model approximates diabatic potential energy functions as polynomials expanded about a point of high symmetry. One must ensure the model Hamiltonian belongs to the totally symmetric irreducible representation of this point group. Here, a simple approach is presented to generate functions that form a basis for totally symmetric irreducible representations of non-Abelian groups and apply it to D∞h (2D) and O (3D). For the O group, the use of a well known basis-generating operator is also required. The functions generated for D∞h are then used to construct a ten state, four coordinate model of acetylene. The calculated absorption spectrum is compared to the experimental spectrum to serve as a validation of the approach.


Study of gas-sheared liquid film in horizontal rectangular duct using high-speed LIF technique: Three-dimensional wavy structure and its relation to liquid entrainment
The flow of a liquid film sheared by high velocity gas stream in a horizontal rectangular duct was investigated using a high-speed laser-induced fluorescence technique. Measurements of local film thickness were resolved in both longitudinal and transverse coordinates with high spatial and temporal resolution. It was found that the generation of fast and slow ripples by the disturbance waves was qualitatively the same as it was observed earlier in completely different conditions. The transverse size and curvature of the disturbance waves and ripples were measured. A relationship between the three-dimensional structure of ripples on top of disturbance waves and the two mechanisms of liquid entrainment, known as ‘bag break-up’ and ‘ligament break-up’, is proposed.


An experimental characterization of liquid films in downwards co-current gas–liquid annular flow by particle image and tracking velocimetry
The hydrodynamics of downwards gas–liquid annular flows and falling films in a pipe were studied experimentally using simultaneous planar laser-induced fluorescence and a combination of particle image and particle tracking velocimetry techniques. The investigated conditions covered the range of liquid and gas Reynolds numbers: ReL=306–1532 and ReG=0–84600. The results presented in this paper concern: (i) information on the local and instantaneous velocity fields underneath the interfacial waves and the appearance of recirculation zones within the liquid films under certain conditions, and (ii) mean velocity, velocity fluctuation rms and kinetic energy profiles within the liquid films. The results indicate that large waves contain multiple recirculation zones, which may play an important role in the gas and liquid phase entrainment mechanisms as well as in the mass and momentum transfer from the near-wall region towards the gas–liquid interface.


Structures in gas–liquid churn flow in a large diameter vertical pipe
Graphical abstractImage, graphical abstract


Stochastic programming analysis and solutions to schedule overcrowded operating rooms in China
As a result of the growing demand for health services, China's large city hospitals have become markedly overstretched, resulting in delicate and complex operating room scheduling problems. While the operating rooms are struggling to meet demand, they face idle times because of (human) resources being pulled away for other urgent demands, and cancellations for economic and health reasons. In this research we analyze the resulting stochastic operating room scheduling problems, and the improvements attainable by scheduled cancellations to accommodate the large demand while avoiding the negative consequences of excessive overtime work. We present a three-stage recourse model which formalizes the scheduled cancellations and is anticipative to further uncertainty. We develop a solution method for this three-stage model which relies on the sample average approximation and the L-shaped method. The method exploits the structure of optimal solutions to speed up the optimization. Scheduled cancellations can significantly and substantially improve the operating room schedule when the costs of cancellations are close to the costs of overtime work. Moreover, the proposed methods illustrate how the adverse impact of cancellations (by patients) for economic and health reasons can be largely controlled. The (human) resource unavailability however is shown to cause a more than proportional loss of solution value for the surgery scheduling problems occurring in China's large city hospitals, even when applying the proposed solution techniques, and requires different management measures.As a result of the growing demand for health services, China's large city hospitals have become markedly overstretched, resulting in delicate and complex operating room scheduling problems. While the operating rooms are struggling to meet demand, they face idle times because of (human) resources being pulled away for other urgent demands, and cancellations for economic and health reasons. In this research we analyze the resulting stochastic operating room scheduling problems, and the improvements attainable by scheduled cancellations to accommodate the large demand while avoiding the negative consequences of excessive overtime work. We present a three-stage recourse model which formalizes the scheduled cancellations and is anticipative to further uncertainty. We develop a solution method for this three-stage model which relies on the sample average approximation and the L-shaped method. The method exploits the structure of optimal solutions to speed up the optimization. Scheduled cancellations can significantly and substantially improve the operating room schedule when the costs of cancellations are close to the costs of overtime work. Moreover, the proposed methods illustrate how the adverse impact of cancellations (by patients) for economic and health reasons can be largely controlled. The (human) resource unavailability however is shown to cause a more than proportional loss of solution value for the surgery scheduling problems occurring in China's large city hospitals, even when applying the proposed solution techniques, and requires different management measures.


On modeling context-aware social collaboration processes
Modeling collaboration processes is a challenging task. Existing modeling approaches are not capable of expressing the unpredictable, non-routine nature of human collaboration, which is influenced by the social context of involved collaborators. We propose a modeling approach which considers collaboration processes as the evolution of a network of collaborative documents along with a social network of collaborators. Our modeling approach, accompanied by a graphical notation and formalization, allows to capture the influence of complex social structures formed by collaborators, and therefore facilitates such activities as the discovery of socially coherent teams, social hubs, or unbiased experts. We demonstrate the applicability and expressiveness of our approach and notation, and discuss their strengths and weaknesses.Modeling collaboration processes is a challenging task. Existing modeling approaches are not capable of expressing the unpredictable, non-routine nature of human collaboration, which is influenced by the social context of involved collaborators. We propose a modeling approach which considers collaboration processes as the evolution of a network of collaborative documents along with a social network of collaborators. Our modeling approach, accompanied by a graphical notation and formalization, allows to capture the influence of complex social structures formed by collaborators, and therefore facilitates such activities as the discovery of socially coherent teams, social hubs, or unbiased experts. We demonstrate the applicability and expressiveness of our approach and notation, and discuss their strengths and weaknesses.


Nonlinear dynamics of cardiovascular ageing
The application of methods drawn from nonlinear and stochastic dynamics to the analysis of cardiovascular time series is reviewed, with particular reference to the identification of changes associated with ageing. The natural variability of the heart rate (HRV) is considered in detail, including the respiratory sinus arrhythmia (RSA) corresponding to modulation of the instantaneous cardiac frequency by the rhythm of respiration. HRV has been intensively studied using traditional spectral analyses, e.g. by Fourier transform or autoregressive methods, and, because of its complexity, has been used as a paradigm for testing several proposed new methods of complexity analysis. These methods are reviewed. The application of time–frequency methods to HRV is considered, including in particular the wavelet transform which can resolve the time-dependent spectral content of HRV. Attention is focused on the cardio-respiratory interaction by introduction of the respiratory frequency variability signal (RFV), which can be acquired simultaneously with HRV by use of a respiratory effort transducer. Current methods for the analysis of interacting oscillators are reviewed and applied to cardio-respiratory data, including those for the quantification of synchronization and direction of coupling. These reveal the effect of ageing on the cardio-respiratory interaction through changes in the mutual modulation of the instantaneous cardiac and respiratory frequencies. Analyses of blood flow signals recorded with laser Doppler flowmetry are reviewed and related to the current understanding of how endothelial-dependent oscillations evolve with age: the inner lining of the vessels (the endothelium) is shown to be of crucial importance to the emerging picture. It is concluded that analyses of the complex and nonlinear dynamics of the cardiovascular system can illuminate the mechanisms of blood circulation, and that the heart, the lungs and the vascular system function as a single entity in dynamical terms. Clear evidence is found for dynamical ageing.


Modified gravity and cosmology
In this review we present a thoroughly comprehensive survey of recent work on modified theories of gravity and their cosmological consequences. Amongst other things, we cover General Relativity, scalar–tensor, Einstein–æther, and Bimetric theories, as well as TeVeS, f(R), general higher-order theories, Hořava–Lifschitz gravity, Galileons, Ghost Condensates, and models of extra dimensions including Kaluza–Klein, Randall–Sundrum, DGP, and higher co-dimension braneworlds. We also review attempts to construct a Parameterised Post-Friedmannian formalism, that can be used to constrain deviations from General Relativity in cosmology, and that is suitable for comparison with data on the largest scales. These subjects have been intensively studied over the past decade, largely motivated by rapid progress in the field of observational cosmology that now allows, for the first time, precision tests of fundamental physics on the scale of the observable Universe. The purpose of this review is to provide a reference tool for researchers and students in cosmology and gravitational physics, as well as a self-contained, comprehensive and up-to-date introduction to the subject as a whole.


Discerning non-autonomous dynamics
Structure and function go hand in hand. However, while a complex structure can be relatively safely broken down into the minutest parts, and technology is now delving into nanoscales, the function of complex systems requires a completely different approach. Here the complexity clearly arises from nonlinear interactions, which prevents us from obtaining a realistic description of a system by dissecting it into its structural component parts. At best, the result of such investigations does not substantially add to our understanding or at worst it can even be misleading. Not surprisingly, the dynamics of complex systems, facilitated by increasing computational efficiency, is now readily tackled in the case of measured time series. Moreover, time series can now be collected in practically every branch of science and in any structural scale—from protein dynamics in a living cell to data collected in astrophysics or even via social networks. In searching for deterministic patterns in such data we are limited by the fact that no complex system in the real world is autonomous. Hence, as an alternative to the stochastic approach that is predominantly applied to data from inherently non-autonomous complex systems, theory and methods specifically tailored to non-autonomous systems are needed. Indeed, in the last decade we have faced a huge advance in mathematical methods, including the introduction of pullback attractors, as well as time series methods that cope with the most important characteristic of non-autonomous systems—their time-dependent behaviour. Here we review current methods for the analysis of non-autonomous dynamics including those for extracting properties of interactions and the direction of couplings. We illustrate each method by applying it to three sets of systems typical for chaotic, stochastic and non-autonomous behaviour. For the chaotic class we select the Lorenz system, for the stochastic the noise-forced Duffing system and for the non-autonomous the Poincaré oscillator with quasi-periodic forcing. In this way we not only discuss and review each method, but also present properties which help to clearly distinguish the three classes of systems when analysed in an inverse approach—from measured, or numerically generated data. In particular, this review provides a framework to tackle inverse problems in these areas and clearly distinguish non-autonomous dynamics from chaos or stochasticity.


Isomeric lepton mass matrices and bi-large neutrino mixing
We show that there exist six parallel textures of the charged lepton and neutrino mass matrices with six vanishing entries, whose phenomenological consequences are exactly the same. These isomeric lepton mass matrices are compatible with current experimental data at the 3σ level. If the seesaw mechanism and the Fukugita–Tanimoto–Yanagida hypothesis are taken into account, it will be possible to fit the experimental data at or below the 2σ level. In particular, the maximal atmospheric neutrino mixing can be reconciled with a strong neutrino mass hierarchy in the seesaw case.We show that there exist six parallel textures of the charged lepton and neutrino mass matrices with six vanishing entries, whose phenomenological consequences are exactly the same. These isomeric lepton mass matrices are compatible with current experimental data at the 3σ level. If the seesaw mechanism and the Fukugita–Tanimoto–Yanagida hypothesis are taken into account, it will be possible to fit the experimental data at or below the 2σ level. In particular, the maximal atmospheric neutrino mixing can be reconciled with a strong neutrino mass hierarchy in the seesaw case.


A note on partition functions of Gepner model orientifolds
In this note we generalize the description of simple current extended Gepner model orientifolds as presented in hep-th/0401148 on the case of even levels and non-trivial dressings of the parity transformation. We provide a comprehensive list of all the important ingredients for the construction of such orientifolds. Namely we present explicit expressions for the Klein-bottle, annulus and Möbius strip amplitudes and derive the general tadpole cancellation conditions. As an example we construct a supersymmetric Pati–Salam like model.In this note we generalize the description of simple current extended Gepner model orientifolds as presented in hep-th/0401148 on the case of even levels and non-trivial dressings of the parity transformation. We provide a comprehensive list of all the important ingredients for the construction of such orientifolds. Namely we present explicit expressions for the Klein-bottle, annulus and Möbius strip amplitudes and derive the general tadpole cancellation conditions. As an example we construct a supersymmetric Pati–Salam like model.


νe(ν̄e)–40Ar absorption cross sections for supernova neutrinos
The calculations for the neutrino absorption cross sections for supernova neutrinos in 40Ar have been done in the local density approximation (LDA) taking into account Pauli blocking and Fermi motion effects. The renormalization of weak transition strengths in the nuclear medium and the effect of Coulomb distortion of the lepton produced in charged current reactions are taken into account. The expected event rates for electrons (positrons) have been calculated for a 3 kT liquid argon detector for a supernova occurring at 10 kpc from earth.The calculations for the neutrino absorption cross sections for supernova neutrinos in 40Ar have been done in the local density approximation (LDA) taking into account Pauli blocking and Fermi motion effects. The renormalization of weak transition strengths in the nuclear medium and the effect of Coulomb distortion of the lepton produced in charged current reactions are taken into account. The expected event rates for electrons (positrons) have been calculated for a 3 kT liquid argon detector for a supernova occurring at 10 kpc from earth.


Non-local charges and quantum integrability of sigma models on the symmetric spaces SO(2n)/SO(n)×SO(n) and Sp(2n)/Sp(n)×Sp(n)
Non-local conserved charges in two-dimensional sigma models with target spaces SO(2n)/SO(n)×SO(n) and Sp(2n)/Sp(n)×Sp(n) are shown to survive quantization, unspoiled by anomalies; these theories are therefore integrable at the quantum level. Local, higher-spin, conserved charges are also shown to survive quantization in the SO(2n)/SO(n)×SO(n) models.Non-local conserved charges in two-dimensional sigma models with target spaces SO(2n)/SO(n)×SO(n) and Sp(2n)/Sp(n)×Sp(n) are shown to survive quantization, unspoiled by anomalies; these theories are therefore integrable at the quantum level. Local, higher-spin, conserved charges are also shown to survive quantization in the SO(2n)/SO(n)×SO(n) models.
[1] H. Eichenherr M. Forger Nucl. Phys. B 155 1978 381 H. Eichenherr M. Forger Nucl. Phys. B 164 1980 528 H. Eichenherr M. Forger Nucl. Phys. B 282 1987 745 Erratum [2] H. Eichenherr M. Forger Commun. Math. Phys. 82 1981 227 [3] N.J. MacKay Phys. Lett. B 281 1992 90 N.J. MacKay Phys. Lett. B 308 1993 444 Erratum [4] J.M. Evans M. Hassan N.J. MacKay A.J. Mountain Nucl. Phys. B 561 1999 385 hep-th/9902008 J.M. Evans Nucl. Phys. B 608 2001 591 hep-th/0101231 [5] J.M. Evans A.J. Mountain Phys. Lett. B 483 2000 290 hep-th/0003264 [6] M. Lüscher Nucl. Phys. B 135 1978 1 [7] E. Abdalla M. Forger M. Gomes Nucl. Phys. B 210 1982 181 [8] D. Bernard Commun. Math. Phys. 137 1991 191 [9] E. Abdalla M.C.B. Abdalla M. Gomes Phys. Rev. D 23 1981 1800 E. Abdalla M. Forger A. Lima Santos Nucl. Phys. B 256 1985 145 [10] P. Fendley Phys. Rev. B 63 2001 104429 cond-mat/0008372 [11] P. Fendley JHEP 0105 2001 050 hep-th/0101034 [12] A. Babichenko Phys. Lett. B 554 2003 96 hep-th/0211114 [13] S. Helgason Differential Geometry, Lie Groups, and Symmetric Spaces 1978 Academic Press New York [14] Y.Y. Goldschmidt E. Witten Phys. Lett. B 91 1980 392 [15] N.J. MacKay C.A.S. Young hep-th/0402182 Phys. Lett. B, in press

Aharonov–Bohm effect and nucleon–nucleon phase shifts on the lattice
We propose a method for the lattice QCD computation of nucleon–nucleon low-energy interactions. It consists in simulating QCD in the background of a “electromagnetic” field whose potential is non-vanishing, but whose field strength is zero. By tuning the background field, phase-shifts at any (but small) momenta can be determined by measuring the shift of the ground state energy. Lattice sizes as small as 5 Fermi can be sufficient for the calculation of phase shifts up to momenta of order of mπ/2.We propose a method for the lattice QCD computation of nucleon–nucleon low-energy interactions. It consists in simulating QCD in the background of a “electromagnetic” field whose potential is non-vanishing, but whose field strength is zero. By tuning the background field, phase-shifts at any (but small) momenta can be determined by measuring the shift of the ground state energy. Lattice sizes as small as 5 Fermi can be sufficient for the calculation of phase shifts up to momenta of order of mπ/2.


Renormalisability of gauge invariant extensions of the squared gauge potential
We show that gauge invariant extensions of the local functional O=12∫d4xA2 have long range non-localities which can only be “renormalised” with reference to a specific gauge. Consequently, there is no gauge independent way of claiming the perturbative renormalisability of these extensions. In particular, they are not renormalisable in the modern sense of Weinberg and Gomis. Critically, our study does not support the view that ghost fields play an indispensable role in the extension of a local operator into a non-local one as claimed recently in the literature.We show that gauge invariant extensions of the local functional O=12∫d4xA2 have long range non-localities which can only be “renormalised” with reference to a specific gauge. Consequently, there is no gauge independent way of claiming the perturbative renormalisability of these extensions. In particular, they are not renormalisable in the modern sense of Weinberg and Gomis. Critically, our study does not support the view that ghost fields play an indispensable role in the extension of a local operator into a non-local one as claimed recently in the literature.
[1] M.J. Lavelle M. Schaden Phys. Lett. B 208 1988 297 [2] F.V. Gubarev L. Stodolsky V.I. Zakharov Phys. Rev. Lett. 86 2001 2220 hep-ph/0010057 F.V. Gubarev V.I. Zakharov Phys. Lett. B 501 2001 28 hep-ph/0010096 [3] A.M. Polyakov Phys. Lett. B 59 1975 82 [4] K.I. Kondo Phys. Lett. B 514 2001 335 hep-th/0105299 K.I. Kondo T. Murakami T. Shinohara T. Imai Phys. Rev. D 65 2002 085034 hep-th/0111256 [5] D. Dudal H. Verschelde V.E.R. Lemes M.S. Sarandy R.F. Sobreiro S.P. Sorella J.A. Gracey Phys. Lett. B 574 2003 325 hep-th/0308181 D. Dudal H. Verschelde J.A. Gracey V.E.R. Lemes M.S. Sarandy R.F. Sobreiro S.P. Sorella JHEP 0401 2004 044 hep-th/0311194 [6] P. Boucaud A. Le Yaouanc J.P. Leroy J. Micheli O. Pene J. Rodriguez-Quintero Phys. Rev. D 63 2001 114003 hep-ph/0101302 [7] M. Esole F. Freire Phys. Rev. D 69 2004 041701 hep-th/0305152 [8] J. Gomis S. Weinberg Nucl. Phys. B 469 1996 473 hep-th/9510087 [9] I.A. Batalin G.A. Vilkovisky Phys. Lett. B 102 1981 27 I.A. Batalin G.A. Vilkovisky Phys. Rev. D 28 1983 2567 I.A. Batalin G.A. Vilkovisky Phys. Rev. D 30 1984 508 Erratum [10] G. Barnich F. Brandt M. Henneaux Phys. Rep. 338 2000 439 hep-th/0002245 [11] M. Henneaux Phys. Lett. B 367 1996 163 hep-th/9510116 G. Barnich M. Henneaux T. Hurth K. Skenderis Phys. Lett. B 492 2000 376 hep-th/9910201 G. Barnich T. Hurth K. Skenderis hep-th/0306127 Phys. Lett. B 2004 in press [12] K.I. Kondo Phys. Lett. B 572 2003 210 hep-th/0306195 [13] M. Henneaux C. Teitelboim Quantization of Gauge Systems 1992 Princeton, NJ [14] G. Barnich M. Henneaux Phys. Rev. Lett. 72 1994 1588 hep-th/9312206 [15] G. Barnich F. Brandt M. Henneaux Commun. Math. Phys. 174 1995 93 hep-th/9405194 [16] O. Piguet S.P. Sorella Algebraic Renormalization: Perturbative Renormalization, Symmetries and Anomalies 1995 Springer Berlin [17] M.A. Shifman Nucl. Phys. B 173 1980 13 G. Barnich V. Husain Class. Quantum Grav. 14 1997 1043 gr-qc/9611030 [18] G. Curci R. Ferrari Nuovo Cimento A 32 1976 151 [19] F. Brandt J. Math. Phys. 40 1999 1023 hep-th/9804153

A simple model of neutrino masses from supersymmetry breaking
We analyze a class of supersymmetric models first introduced by Arkani-Hamed et al. and Borzumati et al. in which the light neutrino masses result from higher-dimensional supersymmetry-breaking terms in the MSSM super-potentials and Kahler potentials. The mechanism is closely related to the Giudice–Masiero mechanism for the MSSM μ parameter, and leads to TeV-scale right-handed neutrino and sneutrino states, that are in principle accessible to direct experimental study. The dominant contribution to the light neutrino (Majorana) mass matrix is a one-loop term induced by a lepton-number violating B-term for the sneutrino states that is naturally present. We focus upon the simplification and analysis of the flavour structure of this general class of models, finding that simple and novel origins for the light neutrino mass matrix are possible. We find that a subdominant tree-level ‘see-saw’ contribution may lead to interesting perturbations of the leading one-loop-induced flavour structure, possibly generating the small ratio Δmsolar2/Δmatm2 dynamically.We analyze a class of supersymmetric models first introduced by Arkani-Hamed et al. and Borzumati et al. in which the light neutrino masses result from higher-dimensional supersymmetry-breaking terms in the MSSM super-potentials and Kahler potentials. The mechanism is closely related to the Giudice–Masiero mechanism for the MSSM μ parameter, and leads to TeV-scale right-handed neutrino and sneutrino states, that are in principle accessible to direct experimental study. The dominant contribution to the light neutrino (Majorana) mass matrix is a one-loop term induced by a lepton-number violating B-term for the sneutrino states that is naturally present. We focus upon the simplification and analysis of the flavour structure of this general class of models, finding that simple and novel origins for the light neutrino mass matrix are possible. We find that a subdominant tree-level ‘see-saw’ contribution may lead to interesting perturbations of the leading one-loop-induced flavour structure, possibly generating the small ratio Δmsolar2/Δmatm2 dynamically.


Lepton dipole moments in extended technicolor models
We analyze the diagonal and transition magnetic and electric dipole moments of charged leptons in extended technicolor (ETC) models, taking account of the multiscale nature of the ETC gauge symmetry breaking, conformal (walking) behavior of the technicolor theory, and mixing in the charged-lepton mass matrix. We show that mixing effects dominate the ETC contributions to charged lepton electric dipole moments and that these can yield a value of |de| comparable to the current limit. The rate for μ→eγ can also be close to its limit. From these and other processes we derive constraints on the charged lepton mixing angles. The constraints are such that the ETC contribution to the muon anomalous magnetic moment, which includes a significant lepton mixing term, can approach, but does not exceed, the current sensitivity level.We analyze the diagonal and transition magnetic and electric dipole moments of charged leptons in extended technicolor (ETC) models, taking account of the multiscale nature of the ETC gauge symmetry breaking, conformal (walking) behavior of the technicolor theory, and mixing in the charged-lepton mass matrix. We show that mixing effects dominate the ETC contributions to charged lepton electric dipole moments and that these can yield a value of |de| comparable to the current limit. The rate for μ→eγ can also be close to its limit. From these and other processes we derive constraints on the charged lepton mixing angles. The constraints are such that the ETC contribution to the muon anomalous magnetic moment, which includes a significant lepton mixing term, can approach, but does not exceed, the current sensitivity level.
[1] T Appelquist J Terning Phys. Rev. D 50 1994 2116 [2] T Appelquist R Shrock Phys. Lett. B 548 2002 204 [3] T Appelquist R Shrock Phys. Rev. Lett. 90 2003 201801 [4] T Appelquist M Piai R Shrock Phys. Rev. D 69 2004 015002 [5] S Weinberg Phys. Rev. D 19 1979 1277 L Susskind Phys. Rev. D 20 1979 2619 [6] S Dimopoulos L Susskind Nucl. Phys. B 155 1979 23 E Eichten K Lane Phys. Lett. B 90 1980 125 [7] B Holdom Phys. Lett. B 150 1985 301 K Yamawaki M Bando K Matumoto Phys. Rev. Lett. 56 1986 1335 T Appelquist D Karabali L.C.R Wijewardhana Phys. Rev. Lett. 57 1986 957 T Appelquist L.C.R Wijewardhana Phys. Rev. D 35 1987 774 [8] For a discussion of CP violation in the ETC context, see K Lane hep-ph/0202255 [9] We use Bjorken–Drell conventions. Normalizations relative to the  ψ ̄ γ μ ψA μ  term are as in, e.g., Eq. (2.20) in B.W Lee R Shrock Phys. Rev. D 16 1977 1444 [10] T Appelquist G.-H Wu Phys. Rev. D 51 1995 240 [11] See http://pdg.lbl.gov (limits are 90% CL) [12] B Regan E Commins C Schmidt D DeMille Phys. Rev. Lett. 88 2002 071805 [13] D DeMille Phys. Rev. A 61 2000 052507 D Kawall hep-ex/0309079 S Lamoreaux nucl-ex/0109014 [14] Some reviews of EDM's are W Bernreuther M Suzuki Rev. Mod. Phys. 71 1991 1463 S Barr Int. J. Mod. Phys. A 8 1993 209 I Khriplovich S Lamoreaux CP Violation without Strangeness 1997 Springer New York [15] Some recent reviews of experimental searches for neutron and atomic EDM's are J Pendlebury E Hinds Nucl. Instrum. Methods A 440 2000 471 E.N. Fortson, P. Sandars, S. Barr, Phys. Today, submitted for publication Y Semertzidis hep-ex/0401016 [16] A future search for  μ + → e + γ  projects sensitivity to branching ratios ∼10 −14 , see T Mori Nucl. Phys. B (Proc. Suppl.) 111 2002 194 [17] Belle Collaboration K Abe hep-ex/0310029 [18] A treatment neglecting mixing in A Czarnecki W Marciano Phys. Rev. D 64 2001 013014 observed that  a μ ∝( m μ / M ) 2 , where  M = scale of new physics See also K Lane Phys. Scr. 23 1981 1005 [19] G Bennett Phys. Rev. Lett. 89 2002 101804 G Bennett hep-ph/0401008 [20] J Feng K Matchev Y Shadmi Nucl. Phys. B 613 2001 366 [21] Y Semertzidis hep-ph/0012087

Coulomb interaction from the interplay between confinement and screening
It has been noticed that confinement effects can be described by the addition of a −FμνaFaμν term in the Lagrangian density. We now study the combined effect of such “confinement term” and that of a mass term. The surprising result is that the interplay between these two terms gives rise to a Coulomb interaction. Our picture has a certain correspondence with the quasiconfinement picture described by Giles, Jaffe and de Rujula for QCD with symmetry breaking.It has been noticed that confinement effects can be described by the addition of a −FμνaFaμν term in the Lagrangian density. We now study the combined effect of such “confinement term” and that of a mass term. The surprising result is that the interplay between these two terms gives rise to a Coulomb interaction. Our picture has a certain correspondence with the quasiconfinement picture described by Giles, Jaffe and de Rujula for QCD with symmetry breaking.
[1] P Gaete E.I Guendelman hep-th/0308025 P Gaete E.I Guendelman hep-th/0401018 [2] E.I Guendelman hep-th/0306162 [3] H.B Nielsen P Olesen Nucl. Phys. B 57 1973 367 [4] A Aurilia A Smilga E Spallucci Phys. Rev. D 47 1993 2536 N Amer E.I Guendelman Int. J. Mod. Phys. A 15 2000 4407 [5] R Benguria P Cordero C Teitelboim Nucl. Phys. B 122 1977 61 [6] P Gaete Phys. Lett. B 582 2004 270 [7] P Gaete I Schmidt hep-th/0306296 Int. J. Mod. Phys. A 2004 in press [8] A De Rujula R.C Giles R.L Jaffe Phys. Rev. D 17 1978 285 [9] A Chodos R.L Jaffe K Johnson C.B Thorn Phys. Rev. D 10 1974 2599 [10] H Georgi Phys. Rev. D 22 1980 225 [11] C Wotzasek Int. J. Mod. Phys. A 5 1990 1123 [12] N Banerjee R Banerjee Mod. Phys. Lett. A 11 1996 1919 [13] P.A.M Dirac The Principles of Quantum Mechanics 1958 Oxford Univ. Press Oxford P.A.M Dirac Can. J. Phys. 33 1955 650

Can MSSM particle be the inflaton?
We consider the possibility of using one of the D-flat directions in the minimal supersymmetric standard model (MSSM) as the inflaton. We show that the flat direction consisting of (first generation) left- and right-handed up-squarks as well as the up-type Higgs boson may play the role of the inflaton if dominant part of the up-quark mass is radiatively generated from supersymmetric loop diagrams. We also point out that, if the R-parity violating Yukawa coupling is of O(10−7), R-odd D-flat directions may be another possible candidate of the inflaton. Such inflation models using D-flat directions in the MSSM are not only testable with collider experiments but also advantageous to resolve the problem how the inflaton reheats the Universe.We consider the possibility of using one of the D-flat directions in the minimal supersymmetric standard model (MSSM) as the inflaton. We show that the flat direction consisting of (first generation) left- and right-handed up-squarks as well as the up-type Higgs boson may play the role of the inflaton if dominant part of the up-quark mass is radiatively generated from supersymmetric loop diagrams. We also point out that, if the R-parity violating Yukawa coupling is of O(10−7), R-odd D-flat directions may be another possible candidate of the inflaton. Such inflation models using D-flat directions in the MSSM are not only testable with collider experiments but also advantageous to resolve the problem how the inflaton reheats the Universe.


Optimal-observable analysis of possible new physics using the b-quark in γγ→tt̄→bX
We study possible anomalous top-quark couplings generated by SU(2)×U(1) gauge-invariant dimension-6 effective operators, using the final b-quark momentum distribution in γγ→tt̄→bX. Taking into account non-standard tt̄γ, tbW and γγH couplings, we perform an optimal-observable analysis in order to estimate the precision for the determination of all relevant non-standard couplings.We study possible anomalous top-quark couplings generated by SU(2)×U(1) gauge-invariant dimension-6 effective operators, using the final b-quark momentum distribution in γγ→tt̄→bX. Taking into account non-standard tt̄γ, tbW and γγH couplings, we perform an optimal-observable analysis in order to estimate the precision for the determination of all relevant non-standard couplings.
[1] D. Atwood S. Bar-Shalom G. Eilam A. Soni Phys. Rep. 347 2001 1 hep-ph/0006032 [2] ACFA Linear Collider Working Group Collaboration K. Abe Particle physics experiments at JLC KEK report 2001-11 hep-ph/0109166 [3] I.F. Ginzburg G.L. Kotkin V.G. Serbo V.I. Telnov Nucl. Instrum. Methods 205 1983 47 [4] D.L. Borden, D. Bauer, D.O. Caldwell, SLAC-PUB-5715, UCSB-HEP-92-01 [5] B. Grzadkowski J.F. Gunion Phys. Lett. B 294 1992 361 hep-ph/9206262 [6] H. Anlauf W. Bernreuther A. Brandenburg Phys. Rev. D 52 1995 3803 H. Anlauf W. Bernreuther A. Brandenburg Phys. Rev. D 53 1995 1725 Erratum hep-ph/9504424 [7] G.J. Gounaris G.P. Tsirigoti Phys. Rev. D 56 1997 3030 G.J. Gounaris G.P. Tsirigoti Phys. Rev. D 58 1998 059901 Erratum hep-ph/9703446 [8] E. Asakawa J. Kamoshita A. Sugamoto I. Watanabe Eur. Phys. J. C 14 2000 335 hep-ph/9912373 [9] E. Asakawa S.Y. Choi K. Hagiwara J.S. Lee Phys. Rev. D 62 2000 115005 hep-ph/0005313 [10] R.M. Godbole S.D. Rindani R.K. Singh Phys. Rev. D 67 2003 095009 hep-ph/0211136 [11] E. Asakawa K. Hagiwara Eur. Phys. J. C 31 2003 351 hep-ph/0305323 [12] S.Y. Choi K. Hagiwara Phys. Lett. B 359 1995 369 hep-ph/9506430 [13] M.S. Baek S.Y. Choi C.S. Kim Phys. Rev. D 56 1997 6835 hep-ph/9704312 [14] P. Poulose S.D. Rindani Phys. Rev. D 57 1998 5444 P. Poulose S.D. Rindani Phys. Rev. D 61 1998 119902 Erratum hep-ph/9709225 [15] B. Grzadkowski Z. Hioki K. Ohkuma J. Wudka Nucl. Phys. B 689 2004 108 hep-ph/0310159 [16] W. Buchmüller D. Wyler Nucl. Phys. B 268 1986 621 [17] T. Takahashi K. Ikematsu Int. J. Mod. Phys. A 15 2000 2599 [18] C. Arzt M.B. Einhorn J. Wudka Nucl. Phys. B 433 1995 41 hep-ph/9405214 [19] Y.S. Tsai Phys. Rev. D 4 1971 2821 Y.S. Tsai Phys. Rev. D 13 1976 771 Erratum S. Kawasaki T. Shirafuji S.Y. Tsai Prog. Theor. Phys. 49 1973 1656 [20] J.A.M. Vermaseren Symbolic Manipulation with FORM version 2, Tutorial and Reference Manual 1991 CAN Amsterdam ISBN 90-74116-01-9 [21] D. Atwood A. Soni Phys. Rev. D 45 1992 2405 M. Davier L. Duflot F. Le Diberder A. Rouge Phys. Lett. B 306 1993 411 M. Diehl O. Nachtmann Z. Phys. C 62 1994 397 J.F. Gunion B. Grzadkowski X.G. He Phys. Rev. Lett. 77 1996 5172 hep-ph/9605326 [22] B. Grzadkowski Z. Hioki Phys. Lett. B 557 2003 55 hep-ph/0208079 See also B. Grzadkowski Z. Hioki Phys. Lett. B 476 2000 87 hep-ph/9911505 B. Grzadkowski Z. Hioki Phys. Lett. B 529 2002 82 hep-ph/0112361 S.D. Rindani Pramana 54 2000 791 hep-ph/0002006 [23] L. Brzezinski B. Grzadkowski Z. Hioki Int. J. Mod. Phys. A 14 1999 1261 hep-ph/9710358 [24] D. Chang W.Y. Keung I. Phillips Nucl. Phys. B 408 1993 286 hep-ph/9301259 D. Chang W.Y. Keung I. Phillips Nucl. Phys. B 429 1994 255 Erratum W. Bernreuther A. Brandenburg P. Overmann Report PITHA-96-02 hep-ph/9602273 [25] B. Grzadkowski Z. Hioki Nucl. Phys. B 484 1997 17 hep-ph/9604301

Production of Θ+(1540) and Ξ pentaquark states in proton–proton interactions
The production of strange pentaquark states (e.g., Theta baryons and Ξ−− states) in hadronic interactions within a Gribov–Regge approach is explored. In this approach the Θ+(1540) and the Ξ are produced by disintegration of remnants formed by the exchange of pomerons between the two protons. We predict the rapidity and transverse momentum distributions as well as the 4π multiplicity of the Θ+, Ξ−−, Ξ−, Ξ0 and Ξ+ for s=17 GeV (SPS) and 200 GeV (RHIC). For both energies more than 10−3 Θ+ and more than 10−5 Ξ per pp event should be observed by the present experiments.The production of strange pentaquark states (e.g., Theta baryons and Ξ−− states) in hadronic interactions within a Gribov–Regge approach is explored. In this approach the Θ+(1540) and the Ξ are produced by disintegration of remnants formed by the exchange of pomerons between the two protons. We predict the rapidity and transverse momentum distributions as well as the 4π multiplicity of the Θ+, Ξ−−, Ξ−, Ξ0 and Ξ+ for s=17 GeV (SPS) and 200 GeV (RHIC). For both energies more than 10−3 Θ+ and more than 10−5 Ξ per pp event should be observed by the present experiments.


Dark energy and the nature of the graviton
Does the existence of dark energy suggest that there is more to the graviton than we think we know?Does the existence of dark energy suggest that there is more to the graviton than we think we know?
[1] S. Weinberg Rev. Mod. Phys. 61 1989 1 [2] A.G. Riess Astron. J. 116 1998 1009 [3] S. Perlmutter Astrophys. J. 517 1999 565 [4] X.G. He A. Zee hep-ph/0302201 [5] T. Banks Nucl. Phys. B 249 1985 332 [6] S. Weinberg Phys. Rev. Lett. 59 1987 2607 S. Weinberg Phys. Rev. D 61 2000 103505 [7] A. Vilenkin Phys. Rev. Lett. 74 1995 846 [8] See p. 440 in: A. Zee Quantum Field Theory in a Nutshell 2003 Princeton Univ. Press Princeton, NJ [9] F. Wilczek, A. Zee, unpublished A. Zee Remarks on the Cosmological Constant Paradox S.L. Mintz A. Perlmutter High Energy Physics in Honor of P.A.M. Dirac in his Eightieth Year Proceedings of the 20th Orbis Scientiae 1983 Plenum New York 211 This possibility was analyzed further in Section VI of  [1] [10] A. Zee Phys. Rev. Lett. 55 1985 2379 [11] C. Montonen D. Olive Phys. Lett. B 72 1977 117

Hadron formation and attenuation in deep inelastic lepton scattering off nuclei
We investigate hadron formation in deep inelastic lepton scattering on N, Kr and Xe nuclei in the kinematic regime of the HERMES experiment. The elementary electron–nucleon interaction is described within the event generator PYTHIA while a full coupled-channel treatment of the final state interactions is included by means of a BUU transport model. We find a good agreement with the measured charged hadron multiplicity ratio RMh for N and Kr targets by accounting for the deceleration and absorption of the primarily produced particles as well as for the creation of secondary hadrons in the final state interactions.We investigate hadron formation in deep inelastic lepton scattering on N, Kr and Xe nuclei in the kinematic regime of the HERMES experiment. The elementary electron–nucleon interaction is described within the event generator PYTHIA while a full coupled-channel treatment of the final state interactions is included by means of a BUU transport model. We find a good agreement with the measured charged hadron multiplicity ratio RMh for N and Kr targets by accounting for the deceleration and absorption of the primarily produced particles as well as for the creation of secondary hadrons in the final state interactions.


Quantum-mechanical stability of fermion–soliton systems
Topological objects resulting from symmetry breakdown may be either stable or metastable depending on the pattern of symmetry breaking. However, if they acquire zero-energy modes of fermions, and in the process acquire non-integer fermionic charge, the metastable configurations also get stabilized. In the case of Dirac fermions the spectrum of the number operator shifts by 1/2. In the case of Majorana fermions it becomes useful to assign negative values of fermion number to a finite number of states occupying the zero-energy level, constituting a Majorana pond. We determine the parities of these states and prove a superselection rule. Thus decay of objects with half-integer fermion number is not possible in isolation or by scattering with ordinary particles. The result has important bearing on cosmology as well as condensed matter physics.Topological objects resulting from symmetry breakdown may be either stable or metastable depending on the pattern of symmetry breaking. However, if they acquire zero-energy modes of fermions, and in the process acquire non-integer fermionic charge, the metastable configurations also get stabilized. In the case of Dirac fermions the spectrum of the number operator shifts by 1/2. In the case of Majorana fermions it becomes useful to assign negative values of fermion number to a finite number of states occupying the zero-energy level, constituting a Majorana pond. We determine the parities of these states and prove a superselection rule. Thus decay of objects with half-integer fermion number is not possible in isolation or by scattering with ordinary particles. The result has important bearing on cosmology as well as condensed matter physics.


Scalar charmonium and glueball mixing in e+e−→J/ψX
We study the possibility of the scalar charmonium and glueball mixing in e+e− annihilation at s=10.6 GeV. The effects can be used to explain the unexpected large cross section (12±4 fb) and the anomalous angular distribution (α=−1.1+0.8−0.6) of the exclusive e+e−→J/ψχc0 process observed by Belle experiments at KEKB. We calculate the helicity amplitudes for the process e+e−→J/ψH(0++) in NRQCD, where H(0++) is the mixed state. We present a detailed analysis on the total cross section and various angular asymmetries which could be useful to reveal the existence of the scalar glueball state.We study the possibility of the scalar charmonium and glueball mixing in e+e− annihilation at s=10.6 GeV. The effects can be used to explain the unexpected large cross section (12±4 fb) and the anomalous angular distribution (α=−1.1+0.8−0.6) of the exclusive e+e−→J/ψχc0 process observed by Belle experiments at KEKB. We calculate the helicity amplitudes for the process e+e−→J/ψH(0++) in NRQCD, where H(0++) is the mixed state. We present a detailed analysis on the total cross section and various angular asymmetries which could be useful to reveal the existence of the scalar glueball state.


Exotic meson production in the f1(1285)π− system observed in the reaction π−p→ηπ+π−π−p at 18 GeV/c
This Letter reports results from the partial wave analysis of the π−π−π+η final state in π−p collisions at 18GeV/c. Strong evidence is observed for production of two mesons with exotic quantum numbers of spin, parity and charge conjugation, JPC=1−+ in the decay channel f1(1285)π−. The mass M=1709±24±41MeV/c2 and width Γ=403±80±115MeV/c2 of the first state are consistent with the parameters of the previously observed π1(1600). The second resonance with mass M=2001±30±92MeV/c2 and width Γ=333±52±49MeV/c2 agrees very well with predictions from theoretical models. In addition, the presence of π2(1900) is confirmed with mass M=2003±88±148MeV/c2 and width Γ=306±132±121MeV/c2 and a new state, a1(2096), is observed with mass M=2096±17±121MeV/c2 and width Γ=451±41±81MeV/c2. The decay properties of these last two states are consistent with flux tube model predictions for hybrid mesons with non-exotic quantum numbers.This Letter reports results from the partial wave analysis of the π−π−π+η final state in π−p collisions at 18GeV/c. Strong evidence is observed for production of two mesons with exotic quantum numbers of spin, parity and charge conjugation, JPC=1−+ in the decay channel f1(1285)π−. The mass M=1709±24±41MeV/c2 and width Γ=403±80±115MeV/c2 of the first state are consistent with the parameters of the previously observed π1(1600). The second resonance with mass M=2001±30±92MeV/c2 and width Γ=333±52±49MeV/c2 agrees very well with predictions from theoretical models. In addition, the presence of π2(1900) is confirmed with mass M=2003±88±148MeV/c2 and width Γ=306±132±121MeV/c2 and a new state, a1(2096), is observed with mass M=2096±17±121MeV/c2 and width Γ=451±41±81MeV/c2. The decay properties of these last two states are consistent with flux tube model predictions for hybrid mesons with non-exotic quantum numbers.


Charm quark–antiquark correlations in photon–proton scattering
Correlation of charm-quark–charm-antiquark in γp scattering are calculated in the kt-factorization approach. We apply different unintegrated gluon distributions (uGDF) used in the literature. The results of our calculations are compared with very recent experimental results from the FOCUS Collaboration. The CCFM uGDF developed recently by Kwieciński et al. gives a good description of the data. New observables are suggested for future studies. Predictions and perspectives for the HERA energies are presented.Correlation of charm-quark–charm-antiquark in γp scattering are calculated in the kt-factorization approach. We apply different unintegrated gluon distributions (uGDF) used in the literature. The results of our calculations are compared with very recent experimental results from the FOCUS Collaboration. The CCFM uGDF developed recently by Kwieciński et al. gives a good description of the data. New observables are suggested for future studies. Predictions and perspectives for the HERA energies are presented.


New data on tensor analyzing power Ayy of the relativistic deuteron breakup as additional test of deuteron structure at small distances
New data on the tensor analyzing power Ayy of the 9Be(d,p)X reaction at an initial deuteron momentum of 5 GeV/c and a proton detection angle of 178 mr have been obtained at the JINR Synchrophasotron. The data obtained are compared with the relativistic calculations of the deuteron breakup process made in the framework of the light-front dynamics. We have managed to explain the new data with Karmanov's relativistic deuteron wave function without invoking degrees of freedom additional to nucleon ones.New data on the tensor analyzing power Ayy of the 9Be(d,p)X reaction at an initial deuteron momentum of 5 GeV/c and a proton detection angle of 178 mr have been obtained at the JINR Synchrophasotron. The data obtained are compared with the relativistic calculations of the deuteron breakup process made in the framework of the light-front dynamics. We have managed to explain the new data with Karmanov's relativistic deuteron wave function without invoking degrees of freedom additional to nucleon ones.


Almost degenerate neutrinos and bi-large lepton mixing
A scenario is proposed for bi-large lepton mixing in the framework of nearly threefold degenerate Majorana neutrinos. In our proposal, we impose Z3 symmetry in the neutrino sector at a high energy scale to account for the threefold degenerate neutrinos and the maximal mixing between νμ and ντ. In order to obtain the atmospheric neutrino mass splitting while keeping the maximal mixing between νμ and ντ, we introduce a small perturbation to the neutrino mass matrix without breaking Z3 symmetry. On the other hand, the solar neutrino mixing arises due to the non-diagonal charged lepton mass matrix, and the desirable large mixing and mass splitting for the solar neutrino oscillation can be obtained by radiative corrections.A scenario is proposed for bi-large lepton mixing in the framework of nearly threefold degenerate Majorana neutrinos. In our proposal, we impose Z3 symmetry in the neutrino sector at a high energy scale to account for the threefold degenerate neutrinos and the maximal mixing between νμ and ντ. In order to obtain the atmospheric neutrino mass splitting while keeping the maximal mixing between νμ and ντ, we introduce a small perturbation to the neutrino mass matrix without breaking Z3 symmetry. On the other hand, the solar neutrino mixing arises due to the non-diagonal charged lepton mass matrix, and the desirable large mixing and mass splitting for the solar neutrino oscillation can be obtained by radiative corrections.
[1] Super-Kamiokande Collaboration Y. Fukuda Phys. Rev. Lett. 81 1998 1562 [2] Super-Kamiokande Collaboration S. Hukuda Phys. Rev. Lett. 86 2001 5656 Super-Kamiokande Collaboration S. Hukuda Phys. Lett. B 539 2002 179 [3] SNO Collaboration Q. Ahmad Phys. Rev. Lett. 87 2001 071301 SNO Collaboration Q. Ahmad Phys. Rev. Lett. 89 2002 011301 SNO Collaboration S. Ahmed nucl-ex/0309004 [4] G.L. Fogli E. Lisi A. Marrone D. Montanino A. Palazzo A.M. Rotunno hep-ph/0310012 A. Bandyopadhyay S. Choubey S. Goswami S.T. Petcov D.P. Roy hep-ph/0309174 [5] CHOOZ Collaboration M. Apollonio Phys. Lett. B 420 1998 397 [6] For example, see C. Giunti M. Tanimoto Phys. Rev. D 66 2002 053013 [7] F. Vissani hep-ph/9708483 V. Barger S. Pakvasa T.J. Weiler K. Whisnant Phys. Lett. B 437 1998 107 A. Baltz A. Goldhaber M. Goldhaber Phys. Rev. Lett. 81 1998 5730 M. Tanimoto Phys. Rev. D 59 1999 017304 C. Jarlskog M. Mastuda S. Skadhauge M. Tanimoto Phys. Lett. B 449 1999 240 S.K. Kang C.S. Kim Phys. Rev. D 59 1999 091302 S. Barr I. Dorsner Nucl. Phys. B 585 2000 79 G. Altarelli F. Feruglio hep-ph/0206077 Z.Z. Xing Int. J. Mod. Phys. A 19 2004 1 and references therein [8] D.N. Sperger astro-ph/0302209 [9] T. Fukuyama H. Nishiura hep-ph/9702253 E. Ma M. Raidal Phys. Rev. Lett. 87 2001 011802 C.S. Lam Phys. Lett. B 507 2001 214 M. Fujii K. Hamaguchi T. Yanagida Phys. Rev. D 65 2002 115012 C. Low R. Volkas Phys. Rev. D 68 2003 033007 [10] K.S. Babu E. Ma J.W.F. Valle Phys. Lett. B 552 2003 207 M. Hirsh J.C. Romao S. Skadhauge J.W.F. Valle A. Moral hep-ph/0312244 E. Ma Mod. Phys. Lett. A 17 2002 2361 E. Ma hep-ph/0211393 E. Ma hep-ph/0203223 E. Ma hep-ph/0308282 E. Ma hep-ph/0311215 E. Ma Phys. Rev. Lett. 90 2003 221802 E. Ma G. Rajasekaran Phys. Rev. D 64 2001 113012 E. Ma G. Rajasekaran Phys. Rev. D 68 2003 071302 [11] J. Kubo A. Mondragon M. Mondragon E. Rodriguez-Jauregui Prog. Theor. Phys. 109 2003 795 W. Grimus L. Lavoura JHEP 0107 2001 045 W. Grimus L. Lavoura Acta Phys. Pol. B 32 2001 3719 W. Grimus L. Lavoura hep-ph/0305046 W. Grimus L. Lavoura hep-ph/0305309 W. Krolikowski Acta Phys. Pol. B 34 2003 4157 W. Krolikowski Acta Phys. Pol. B 34 2003 4125 W. Krolikowski Phys. Rev. D 64 2001 113012 W. Krolikowski Phys. Rev. D 68 2003 071302 [12] E. Ma Phys. Lett. B 456 1999 48 [13] P. Kaus S. Meshkov Phys. Lett. B 580 2004 236 [14] See, for example M. Bando T. Kugo hep-ph/0308258 [15] E. Ma hep-ph/0308282 E. Ma hep-ph/0312192 [16] E. Ma Phys. Rev. Lett. 83 1999 2514 E.J. Chun S.K. Kang hep-ph/9912524 E.J. Chun S.K. Kang Phys. Rev. D 63 2001 097902 M. Frigerio A.Yu. Smirnov JHEP 0302 2003 004 [17] See also J. Ellis S. Lola Phys. Lett. B 458 1999 310 N. Haba Y. Matsui N. Okamura M. Sugiura Eur. Phys. J. C 10 1999 677 N. Haba Y. Matsui N. Okamura M. Sugiura hep-ph/9906481 N. Haba Y. Matsui N. Okamura M. Sugiura hep-ph/9911481 J.A. Casas J.R. Espinosa A. Ibarra I. Navarro Nucl. Phys. B 556 1999 3 J.A. Casas J.R. Espinosa A. Ibarra I. Navarro JHEP 9909 1999 015 J.A. Casas J.R. Espinosa A. Ibarra I. Navarro hep-ph/9910420 R. Barbieri G.G. Rossi A. Strumia JHEP 9910 1999 020 N. Haba N. Okamura M. Sugiura Prog. Theor. Phys. 103 2000 367 E.J. Chun S.K. Kang Phys. Rev. D 61 2000 075012 P.H. Chankowski A. Ioannisian S. Pokorski J.W.F. Valle Phys. Rev. Lett. 86 2001 3488 P.H. Chankowski W. Krolikowski S. Pokorski hep-ph/9910231 E.J. Chun S. Pokorski hep-ph/9912210 E.J. Chun Phys. Lett. B 505 2001 155 K.R.S. Balaji A.S. Dighe R.N. Mohapatra M.K. Parida Phys. Rev. Lett. 84 2000 5034 K.R.S. Balaji A.S. Dighe R.N. Mohapatra M.K. Parida Phys. Lett. B 481 2000 33 K.R.S. Balaji A.S. Dighe R.N. Mohapatra M.K. Parida Phys. Rev. D 63 2001 113002 W. Grimus L. Lavoura Phys. Lett. B 546 2002 86 A. Joshipura Phys. Lett. B 543 2003 276 A. Joshipura S. Rindani Phys. Rev. D 67 2003 073009 A. Joshipura S.D. Rindani N. Nimai Singh Nucl. Phys. B 660 2003 362 G. Bhattacharyya A. Raychaudhuri A. Sil Phys. Rev. D 67 2003 073004 [18] P.F. Harrison D.H. Perkins W.G. Scott Phys. Lett. B 458 1999 79 P.F. Harrison D.H. Perkins W.G. Scott Phys. Lett. B 530 2002 167 P.F. Harrison W.G. Scott Phys. Lett. B 535 2002 163 Z.-Z. Xing Phys. Lett. B 533 2002 85 X. He A. Zee Phys. Lett. B 560 2003 87 X. He A. Zee Phys. Rev. D 68 2003 037302 Y. Koide Phys. Lett. B 574 2003 82 S. Chang hep-ph/0404187

Quark mass effects on the stability of hybrid stars
We perform a study of the possible existence of hybrid stars with color superconducting quark cores using a specific hadronic model in a combination with an NJL-type quark model. It is shown that the constituent mass of the non-strange quarks in vacuum is a very important parameter that controls the beginning of the hadron–quark phase transition. At relatively small values of the mass, the first quark phase that appears is the two-flavor color superconducting (2SC) phase which, at larger densities, is replaced by the color-flavor locked (CFL) phase. At large values of the mass, on the other hand, the phase transition goes from the hadronic phase directly into the CFL phase avoiding the 2SC phase. It appears, however, that the only stable hybrid stars obtained are those with the 2SC quark cores.We perform a study of the possible existence of hybrid stars with color superconducting quark cores using a specific hadronic model in a combination with an NJL-type quark model. It is shown that the constituent mass of the non-strange quarks in vacuum is a very important parameter that controls the beginning of the hadron–quark phase transition. At relatively small values of the mass, the first quark phase that appears is the two-flavor color superconducting (2SC) phase which, at larger densities, is replaced by the color-flavor locked (CFL) phase. At large values of the mass, on the other hand, the phase transition goes from the hadronic phase directly into the CFL phase avoiding the 2SC phase. It appears, however, that the only stable hybrid stars obtained are those with the 2SC quark cores.


Stopping and isospin equilibration in heavy ion collisions
We investigate the density behavior of the symmetry energy with respect to isospin equilibration in the combined systems Ru(Zr)+Zr(Ru) at relativistic energies of 0.4 and 1.528A GeV. The study is performed within a relativistic framework and the contribution of the iso-vector, scalar δ field to the symmetry energy and the isospin dynamics is particularly explored. We find that the isospin mixing depends on the symmetry energy and a stiffer behavior leads to more transparency. The results are also nicely sensitive to the “fine structure” of the symmetry energy, i.e., to the covariant properties of the isovector meson fields.The isospin tracing appears much less dependent on the in medium neutron–proton cross sections (σnp) and this makes such observable very peculiar for the study of the isovector part of the nuclear equation of state.Within such a framework, comparisons with experiments support the introduction of the δ meson in the description of the iso-vector equation of state.We investigate the density behavior of the symmetry energy with respect to isospin equilibration in the combined systems Ru(Zr)+Zr(Ru) at relativistic energies of 0.4 and 1.528A GeV. The study is performed within a relativistic framework and the contribution of the iso-vector, scalar δ field to the symmetry energy and the isospin dynamics is particularly explored. We find that the isospin mixing depends on the symmetry energy and a stiffer behavior leads to more transparency. The results are also nicely sensitive to the “fine structure” of the symmetry energy, i.e., to the covariant properties of the isovector meson fields.The isospin tracing appears much less dependent on the in medium neutron–proton cross sections (σnp) and this makes such observable very peculiar for the study of the isovector part of the nuclear equation of state.Within such a framework, comparisons with experiments support the introduction of the δ meson in the description of the iso-vector equation of state.


Missing levels in correlated spectra
Complete spectroscopy (measurements of a complete sequence of consecutive levels) is often considered as a prerequisite to extract fluctuation properties of spectra. It is shown how this goal can be achieved even if only a fraction of levels are observed. The case of levels behaving as eigenvalues of random matrices, of current interest in nuclear physics, is worked out in detail.Complete spectroscopy (measurements of a complete sequence of consecutive levels) is often considered as a prerequisite to extract fluctuation properties of spectra. It is shown how this goal can be achieved even if only a fraction of levels are observed. The case of levels behaving as eigenvalues of random matrices, of current interest in nuclear physics, is worked out in detail.


Three-loop universal anomalous dimension of the Wilson operators in N=4 SUSY Yang–Mills model
We present results for the three-loop universal anomalous dimension γuni(j) of Wilson twist-2 operators in the N=4 Supersymmetric Yang–Mills model. These expressions are obtained by extracting the most complicated contributions from the three loop non-singlet anomalous dimensions in QCD which were calculated recently. Their singularities at j=1 coincide with the predictions obtained from the BFKL equation for N=4 SYM in the next-to-leading order. The asymptotics of γuni(j) at large j is in an agreement with the expectations based on an interpolation between week and strong coupling regimes in the framework of the AdS/CFT correspondence.We present results for the three-loop universal anomalous dimension γuni(j) of Wilson twist-2 operators in the N=4 Supersymmetric Yang–Mills model. These expressions are obtained by extracting the most complicated contributions from the three loop non-singlet anomalous dimensions in QCD which were calculated recently. Their singularities at j=1 coincide with the predictions obtained from the BFKL equation for N=4 SYM in the next-to-leading order. The asymptotics of γuni(j) at large j is in an agreement with the expectations based on an interpolation between week and strong coupling regimes in the framework of the AdS/CFT correspondence.
[1] D.J. Gross F. Wilczek Phys. Rev. D 8 1973 3633 H. Georgi H.D. Politzer Phys. Rev. D 9 1974 416 E.G. Floratos D.A. Ross C.T. Sachrajda Nucl. Phys. B 129 1977 66 E.G. Floratos D.A. Ross C.T. Sachrajda Nucl. Phys. B 139 1978 545 Erratum E.G. Floratos D.A. Ross C.T. Sachrajda Nucl. Phys. B 152 1979 493 A. Gonzalez-Arroyo C. Lopez F.J. Yndurain Nucl. Phys. B 153 1979 161 A. Gonzalez-Arroyo C. Lopez Nucl. Phys. B 166 1980 429 G. Gurci W. Furmanski R. Petronzio Nucl. Phys. B 175 1980 27 W. Furmanski R. Petronzio Phys. Lett. B 97 1980 437 E.G. Floratos C. Kounnas R. Lacage Nucl. Phys. B 192 1981 417 C. Lopes F.J. Yndurain Nucl. Phys. B 171 1980 231 C. Lopes F.J. Yndurain Nucl. Phys. B 183 1981 157 R. Hamberg W.L. van Neerven Nucl. Phys. B 379 1992 143 R.K. Ellis W. Vogelsang hep-ph/9602356 R. Mertig W.L. van Neerven Z. Phys. C 70 1996 637 W. Vogelsang Nucl. Phys. B 475 1996 47 [2] V.N. Gribov L.N. Lipatov Sov. J. Nucl. Phys. 15 1972 438 V.N. Gribov L.N. Lipatov Sov. J. Nucl. Phys. 15 1972 675 L.N. Lipatov Sov. J. Nucl. Phys. 20 1975 94 G. Altarelli G. Parisi Nucl. Phys. B 126 1977 298 Yu.L. Dokshitzer Sov. Phys. JETP 46 1977 641 [3] A.V. Kotikov L.N. Lipatov Nucl. Phys. B 582 2000 19 [4] A.V. Kotikov L.N. Lipatov V.N. Velizhanin Phys. Lett. B 557 2003 114 [5] A.V. Kotikov L.N. Lipatov hep-ph/0112346 A.V. Kotikov L.N. Lipatov Nucl. Phys. B 661 2003 19 [6] L.N. Lipatov Sov. J. Nucl. Phys. 23 1976 338 V.S. Fadin E.A. Kuraev L.N. Lipatov Phys. Lett. B 60 1975 50 E.A. Kuraev L.N. Lipatov V.S. Fadin Sov. Phys. JETP 44 1976 443 E.A. Kuraev L.N. Lipatov V.S. Fadin Sov. Phys. JETP 45 1977 199 I.I. Balitsky L.N. Lipatov Sov. J. Nucl. Phys. 28 1978 822 I.I. Balitsky L.N. Lipatov JETP Lett. 30 1979 355 [7] V.S. Fadin L.N. Lipatov Phys. Lett. B 429 1998 127 G. Camici M. Ciafaloni Phys. Lett. B 430 1998 349 [8] S. Moch J.A.M. Vermaseren A. Vogt hep-ph/0403192 [9] A. Vogt S. Moch J.A.M. Vermaseren hep-ph/0404111 [10] A.P. Bukhvostov E.A. Kuraev L.N. Lipatov G.V. Frolov JETP Lett. 41 1985 92 Pis'ma Zh. Eksp. Teor. Fiz. 41 1985 77 A.P. Bukhvostov G.V. Frolov L.N. Lipatov E.A. Kuraev Nucl. Phys. B 258 1985 601 [11] L.N. Lipatov Perspectives in hadronic physics Proceedings of the ICTP Conference 1997 World Scientific Singapore [12] L.N. Lipatov Proceedings of the International Workshop on Very High Multiplicity Physics, Dubna 2000 159 176 L.N. Lipatov Nucl. Phys. B (Proc. Suppl.) 99 2001 175 [13] V.M. Braun S.E. Derkachov A.N. Manashov Phys. Rev. Lett. 81 1998 2020 A.V. Belitsky Phys. Lett. B 453 1999 59 [14] N. Beisert M. Staudacher Nucl. Phys. B 670 2003 439 [15] L. Dolan C.R. Nappi E. Witten JHEP 0310 2003 017 [16] J.A. Minahan K. Zarembo JHEP 0303 2003 013 [17] R. Kirschner hep-th/0404060 [18] L.N. Lipatov, Preprint DFPD/93/TH/70 L.N. Lipatov hep-th/9311037 L.N. Lipatov JETP Lett. 59 1994 596 Pis'ma Zh. Eksp. Teor. Fiz. 59 1994 571 L.D. Faddeev G.P. Korchemsky Phys. Lett. B 342 1995 311 [19] L. Brink J.H. Schwarz J. Scherk Nucl. Phys. B 121 1977 77 F. Gliozzi J. Scherk D.I. Olive Nucl. Phys. B 122 1977 253 [20] Y.M. Makeenko Sov. J. Nucl. Phys. 33 1981 440 Yad. Fiz. 33 1981 842 T. Ohrndorf Nucl. Phys. B 198 1982 26 [21] A.V. Belitsky D. Müller A. Schafer Phys. Lett. B 450 1999 126 A.V. Belitsky D. Müller Nucl. Phys. B (Proc. Suppl.) 79 1999 576 A.V. Belitsky D. Müller Phys. Rev. D 65 2002 054037 [22] A.I. Onishchenko V.N. Velizhanin hep-ph/0309222 [23] A.I. Onishchenko V.N. Velizhanin JHEP 0402 2004 036 [24] W. Siegel Phys. Lett. B 84 1979 193 [25] J. Fleischer A.V. Kotikov O.L. Veretin Nucl. Phys. B 547 1999 343 J. Fleischer A.V. Kotikov O.L. Veretin Acta Phys. Pol. B 29 1998 2611 hep-ph/9808243 [26] D.I. Kazakov A.V. Kotikov Nucl. Phys. B 307 1988 721 D.I. Kazakov A.V. Kotikov Nucl. Phys. B 345 1990 299 Erratum D.I. Kazakov A.V. Kotikov Phys. Lett. B 291 1992 171 [27] A.V. Kotikov Phys. At. Nucl. 57 1994 133 [28] J. Maldacena Adv. Theor. Math. Phys. 2 1998 231 J. Maldacena Int. J. Theor. Phys. 38 1998 1113 S.S. Gubser I.R. Klebanov A.M. Polyakov Phys. Lett. B 428 1998 105 E. Witten Adv. Theor. Math. Phys. 2 1998 253 [29] S.S. Gubser I.R. Klebanov A.M. Polyakov Nucl. Phys. B 636 2002 99 [30] M. Kruczenski JHEP 0212 2002 024 Yu. Makeenko JHEP 0301 2003 007 M. Axenides E. Floratos A. Kehagias Nucl. Phys. B 662 2003 170 [31] Bo Andersson Eur. Phys. J. C 25 2002 77 [32] H1 Collaboration C. Adloff Eur. Phys. J. C 21 2001 33 ZEUS Collaboration S. Chekanov Eur. Phys. J. C 21 2001 943 [33] S. Frolov A.A. Tseytlin JHEP 0206 2002 007 [34] A.V. Belitsky A.S. Gorsky G.P. Korchemsky Nucl. Phys. B 667 2003 3 [35] K. Konishi Phys. Lett. B 135 1984 439 [36] J. Polchinski M.J. Strassler JHEP 0305 2003 012 [37] N. Beisert C. Kristjansen M. Staudacher Nucl. Phys. B 664 2003 131 [38] N. Beisert hep-th/0310252

Anticharmed pentaquark Θc(3099) from QCD sum rules
We construct QCD sum rules for the anti-charmed pentaquark Θc(3099), recently reported at HERA. The sum rules are constructed similarly with the Θ+(1540) sum rules using the anti-charmed analogue of the Θ+ interpolating field. The strange quark and quark–gluon mixed condensates, which were important in the Θ+ sum rules, are replaced by the gluon condensates whose contribution to the OPE is suppressed due to the heavy quark mass. Our result suggests that the parity of Θc is positive. We identify the difference from the Θ+ sum rule, which leads to the positive parity in this heavy-light pentaquark system. The obtained mass is similar to the experimental value.We construct QCD sum rules for the anti-charmed pentaquark Θc(3099), recently reported at HERA. The sum rules are constructed similarly with the Θ+(1540) sum rules using the anti-charmed analogue of the Θ+ interpolating field. The strange quark and quark–gluon mixed condensates, which were important in the Θ+ sum rules, are replaced by the gluon condensates whose contribution to the OPE is suppressed due to the heavy quark mass. Our result suggests that the parity of Θc is positive. We identify the difference from the Θ+ sum rule, which leads to the positive parity in this heavy-light pentaquark system. The obtained mass is similar to the experimental value.


Implication of the B→(ρ,ω)γ branching ratios for the CKM phenomenology
We study the implication of the recent measurement by the BELLE Collaboration of the averaged branching fraction B̄exp[B→(ρ,ω)γ]=(1.8+0.6−0.5±0.1)×10−6 for the CKM phenomenology. Combined with the averaged branching fraction B̄exp(B→K∗γ)=(4.06±0.26)×10−5 measured earlier, this yields R̄exp[(ρ,ω)γ/K∗γ]=(4.2±1.3)% for the ratio of the two branching fractions. Updating earlier theoretical analysis of these decays based on the QCD factorization framework, and constraining the CKM-Wolfenstein parameters from the unitarity fits, our results yield B̄th[B→(ρ,ω)γ]=(1.38±0.42)×10−6 and R̄th[(ρ,ω)γ/K∗γ]=(3.3±1.0)%, in agreement with the BELLE data. Leaving instead the CKM-Wolfenstein parameters free, our analysis gives (at 68% C.L.) 0.16⩽|Vtd/Vts|⩽0.29, which is in agreement with but less precise than the indirect CKM-unitarity fit of the same, 0.18⩽|Vtd/Vts|⩽0.22. The isospin-violating ratio in the B→ργ decays and the SU(3)-violating ratio in the Bd0→(ρ0,ω)γ decays are presented together with estimates of the direct and mixing-induced CP-asymmetries in the B→(ρ,ω)γ decays within the SM. Their measurements will overconstrain the angle α of the CKM-unitarity triangle.We study the implication of the recent measurement by the BELLE Collaboration of the averaged branching fraction B̄exp[B→(ρ,ω)γ]=(1.8+0.6−0.5±0.1)×10−6 for the CKM phenomenology. Combined with the averaged branching fraction B̄exp(B→K∗γ)=(4.06±0.26)×10−5 measured earlier, this yields R̄exp[(ρ,ω)γ/K∗γ]=(4.2±1.3)% for the ratio of the two branching fractions. Updating earlier theoretical analysis of these decays based on the QCD factorization framework, and constraining the CKM-Wolfenstein parameters from the unitarity fits, our results yield B̄th[B→(ρ,ω)γ]=(1.38±0.42)×10−6 and R̄th[(ρ,ω)γ/K∗γ]=(3.3±1.0)%, in agreement with the BELLE data. Leaving instead the CKM-Wolfenstein parameters free, our analysis gives (at 68% C.L.) 0.16⩽|Vtd/Vts|⩽0.29, which is in agreement with but less precise than the indirect CKM-unitarity fit of the same, 0.18⩽|Vtd/Vts|⩽0.22. The isospin-violating ratio in the B→ργ decays and the SU(3)-violating ratio in the Bd0→(ρ0,ω)γ decays are presented together with estimates of the direct and mixing-induced CP-asymmetries in the B→(ρ,ω)γ decays within the SM. Their measurements will overconstrain the angle α of the CKM-unitarity triangle.


A possibility to determine the P-parity of the Θ+ pentaquark in the NN→YΘ+ reaction
Spin structure of the reaction N→N→→Y→Θ is analyzed at the threshold in a model independent way for an arbitrary spin of the Θ+. We found that the sign of the spin–spin correlation parameter Cx,x being measured in a double-spin experiment, determines the P-parity of the Θ+ unambiguously. Furthermore we show that the polarization transfer from a nucleon to the final hyperon Y is zero or non-zero strictly depending on the P-parity of the Θ+ and the total isospin of the NN system. It allows one to determine the P-parity of the Θ+ in a single-spin measurement, since the polarization of the Y can be measured via its weak decay.Spin structure of the reaction N→N→→Y→Θ is analyzed at the threshold in a model independent way for an arbitrary spin of the Θ+. We found that the sign of the spin–spin correlation parameter Cx,x being measured in a double-spin experiment, determines the P-parity of the Θ+ unambiguously. Furthermore we show that the polarization transfer from a nucleon to the final hyperon Y is zero or non-zero strictly depending on the P-parity of the Θ+ and the total isospin of the NN system. It allows one to determine the P-parity of the Θ+ in a single-spin measurement, since the polarization of the Y can be measured via its weak decay.
[1] T. Nakano Phys. Rev. Lett. 91 2003 012002 [2] V.V. Barmin Phys. At. Nucl. 66 2003 1715 [3] S. Stepanyan Phys. Rev. Lett. 91 2003 252001 [4] V. Kubarovsky Phys. Rev. Lett. 92 2004 032001 [5] J. Barth Phys. Lett. B 572 2003 127 [6] A. Aleev hep-ex/0401024 [7] D. Diakonov V. Petrov M. Polyakov Z. Phys. A 359 1997 305 [8] A. Hosaka Phys. Lett. B 571 2003 55 [9] L.Ya. Glozman Phys. Lett. B 575 2003 18 [10] R.L. Jaffe F. Wilczek Phys. Rev. Lett. 91 2003 232003 [11] F. Csikor Z. Fodor S.D. Katz T.G. Kovacs hep-lat/0309090 S. Sasaki hep-lat/0310014 [12] T.W. Chiu T.H. Hsieh hep-ph/0403020 [13] T. Hyodo A. Hosaka E. Oset nucl-th/0307105 S.I. Nam A. Hosaka H.-Ch. Kim hep-ph/0308313 Y. Oh H. Kim S.H. Lee hep-ph/0310019 Y. Oh H. Kim S.H. Lee hep-ph/0312229 Q. Zhao hep-ph/0310350 K. Nakayama K. Tsushima hep-ph/0311112 Q. Zhao J.S. Al-Khalili hep-ph/0312348 B.G. Yu T.K. Choi C.R. Ji nucl-th/0312075 Th. Mehen C. Schat hep-ph/0401107 [14] P.L. Csonka M.J. Moravcsik M.D. Scadron Phys. Lett. 15 1965 353 [15] A. Thomas K. Hicks A. Hosaka Prog. Theor. Phys. 111 2004 291 [16] Ch. Hanhart hep-ph/0312236 [17] M. Rekalo E. Tomasi-Gustafsson hep-ph/0401050 [18] M.L. Goldberger K.M. Watson Collision Theory 1964 Wiley New York [19] S.M. Bilenky L.I. Lapidus L.D. Puzikov R.M. Ryndin Nucl. Phys. 7 1958 646 [20] G.G. Ohlsen Rep. Prog. Phys. 35 1972 717 [21] D.A. Varschalovich A.N. Moskalev V.K. Khersonskiy Kvantovaya Teoriya Uglovogo Momenta 1975 Nauka Leningrad p. 439 (in Russian) 1988 World Scientific Singapore (in English) [22] S.I. Nam A. Hosaka H.-Ch. Kim hep-ph/0401074 S.I. Nam A. Hosaka H.-Ch. Kim hep-ph/0402138 [23] V. Punjabi Phys. Rev. C 39 1989 608 [24] S. Capstick P.R. Page W. Roberts Phys. Lett. B 570 2003 185 [25] M. Rekalo E. Tomasi-Gustafsson hep-ph/0401162 M. Rekalo E. Tomasi-Gustafsson hep-ph/0402227

Quark distributions in a medium
We derive the formal expressions needed to discuss the change of the twist-two parton distribution functions when a hadron is placed in a medium with relativistic scalar and vector mean fields.We derive the formal expressions needed to discuss the change of the twist-two parton distribution functions when a hadron is placed in a medium with relativistic scalar and vector mean fields.
[1] R.L. Jaffe Nucl. Phys. B 229 1983 205 R.L. Jaffe Relativistic dynamics and quark nuclear physics M.B. Johnson A. Picklesimer Proceedings of the Los Alamos Summer School, 1985 1986 Wiley New York [2] D. Dolgov LHPC Collaboration Phys. Rev. D 66 2002 034506 hep-lat/0201021 M. Gockeler R. Horsley D. Pleiter P.E.L. Rakow S. Schaefer A. Schafer G. Schierholz Nucl. Phys. A 711 2002 291 S. Capitani M. Gockeler R. Horsley D. Pleiter P. Rakow H. Stuben G. Schierholz QCDSF Collaboration Nucl. Phys. B (Proc. Suppl.) 106 2002 299 hep-lat/0111012 S. Sasaki K. Orginos S. Ohta T. Blum RIKEN–BNL–Columbia–KEK Collaboration Phys. Rev. D 68 2003 054509 hep-lat/0306007 [3] W. Detmold W. Melnitchouk J.W. Negele D.B. Renner A.W. Thomas Phys. Rev. Lett. 87 2001 172001 hep-lat/0103006 [4] D.F. Geesaman K. Saito A.W. Thomas Annu. Rev. Nucl. Part. Sci. 45 1995 337 M. Arneodo Phys. Rep. 240 1994 301 [5] B.D. Serot J.D. Walecka Adv. Nucl. Phys. 16 1986 1 B.D. Serot J.D. Walecka Int. J. Mod. Phys. E 6 1997 515 nucl-th/9701058 R.J. Furnstahl B.D. Serot Nucl. Phys. A 673 2000 298 nucl-th/9912048 [6] H. Mineo W. Bentz N. Ishii A.W. Thomas K. Yazaki Nucl. Phys. A 735 2004 482 nucl-th/0312097 [7] K. Tsushima A.W. Thomas G.V. Dunne ADP-01-27-T461, Presented at Workshop on Lepton Scattering, Hadrons and QCD, Adelaide, Australia, 26 March–6 April 2001 hep-ph/0107042 [8] K. Saito A. Michels A.W. Thomas Phys. Rev. C 46 1992 2149 [9] P.A.M. Guichon Phys. Lett. B 200 1988 235 [10] K. Saito K. Tsushima A.W. Thomas Phys. Rev. C 55 1997 2637 nucl-th/9612001 [11] K. Saito A.W. Thomas Phys. Lett. B 327 1994 9 nucl-th/9403015 [12] P.A.M. Guichon A.W. Thomas nucl-th/0402064 [13] C.J. Benesh T. Goldman G.J. Stephenson Phys. Rev. C 68 2003 045208 nucl-th/0307038 [14] J.R. Smith G.A. Miller Phys. Rev. Lett. 91 2003 212301 [15] A.W. Thomas AIP Conf. Proc. 689 2003 53 hep-ex/0311029 [16] P.A.M. Guichon K. Saito E. Rodionov A.W. Thomas Nucl. Phys. A 601 1996 349 K. Saito K. Tsushima A.W. Thomas Nucl. Phys. A 609 1996 339 [17] W. Bentz T. Horikawa N. Ishii A.W. Thomas Nucl. Phys. A 720 2003 95 nucl-th/0210067 [18] D. Ebert T. Feldmann H. Reinhardt Phys. Lett. B 388 1996 154 hep-ph/9608223 [19] G. Hellstern R. Alkofer H. Reinhardt Nucl. Phys. A 625 1997 697 hep-ph/9706551

Quark coalescence for charmed mesons in ultrarelativistic heavy-ion collisions
We investigate effects of charm-quark interactions in a quark–gluon plasma on the production of D and J/ψ mesons in high-energy heavy-ion collisions. Employing a previously constructed coalescence model that successfully reproduces the transverse momentum (pT) spectra and elliptic flow (v2(pT)) of light hadrons at RHIC from underlying light-quark distributions at the phase transition temperature Tc, D-meson and J/ψ pT-spectra are evaluated. For the charm-quark distributions, we consider two limiting scenarios: (i) no rescattering, corresponding to perturbative QCD (pQCD) spectra and (ii) complete thermalization including transverse expansion. We find that D-mesons acquire a minimal v2 inherited from their light-quark content and corresponding semileptonic decay spectra of single electrons practically preserve the v2 of the parent particles, exhibiting marked differences between the pQCD and thermal scenarios for pT⩾1 GeV. Likewise, the pT-spectra and yields of J/ψ's differ appreciably in the two scenarios.We investigate effects of charm-quark interactions in a quark–gluon plasma on the production of D and J/ψ mesons in high-energy heavy-ion collisions. Employing a previously constructed coalescence model that successfully reproduces the transverse momentum (pT) spectra and elliptic flow (v2(pT)) of light hadrons at RHIC from underlying light-quark distributions at the phase transition temperature Tc, D-meson and J/ψ pT-spectra are evaluated. For the charm-quark distributions, we consider two limiting scenarios: (i) no rescattering, corresponding to perturbative QCD (pQCD) spectra and (ii) complete thermalization including transverse expansion. We find that D-mesons acquire a minimal v2 inherited from their light-quark content and corresponding semileptonic decay spectra of single electrons practically preserve the v2 of the parent particles, exhibiting marked differences between the pQCD and thermal scenarios for pT⩾1 GeV. Likewise, the pT-spectra and yields of J/ψ's differ appreciably in the two scenarios.


Vacuum expectation value of a Wegner–Wilson loop near the light-cone
Vacuum expectation values for one Wegner–Wilson loop representing a moving quark–antiquark pair are calculated in four-dimensional Euclidean and Minkowski space–time. The calculation uses gluon field strength correlators with perturbative gluon exchange and non-perturbative correlations from the stochastic vacuum model. The expectation value of a Wegner–Wilson loop forming a hyperbolic angle in Minkowski space–time is connected by an analytical continuation to the expectation value of the Wegner–Wilson loop in Euclidean four-space. The obtained result shows how confinement enters into the light-cone Hamiltonian for valence quarks independently of the chosen model.Vacuum expectation values for one Wegner–Wilson loop representing a moving quark–antiquark pair are calculated in four-dimensional Euclidean and Minkowski space–time. The calculation uses gluon field strength correlators with perturbative gluon exchange and non-perturbative correlations from the stochastic vacuum model. The expectation value of a Wegner–Wilson loop forming a hyperbolic angle in Minkowski space–time is connected by an analytical continuation to the expectation value of the Wegner–Wilson loop in Euclidean four-space. The obtained result shows how confinement enters into the light-cone Hamiltonian for valence quarks independently of the chosen model.


Neutrino production by UHECR proton interactions in the infrared background
We discuss the contribution of proton photoproduction interactions in the isotropic infrared/optical background to the cosmic neutrino fluxes. This contribution has a strong dependence on the proton injection energy spectrum, and is essential at high redshifts. It is thus closely correlated with the cosmological evolution of the ultra-high energy proton sources and of the infrared background itself. These interactions may also contribute to the source fluxes of neutrinos if the proton sources are located in regions of high infrared emission and magnetic fields.We discuss the contribution of proton photoproduction interactions in the isotropic infrared/optical background to the cosmic neutrino fluxes. This contribution has a strong dependence on the proton injection energy spectrum, and is essential at high redshifts. It is thus closely correlated with the cosmological evolution of the ultra-high energy proton sources and of the infrared background itself. These interactions may also contribute to the source fluxes of neutrinos if the proton sources are located in regions of high infrared emission and magnetic fields.


Reissner–Nordström metric in the Friedman–Robertson–Walker universe
The metric for a Reissner–Nordström black hole in the background of the Friedman–Robertson–Walker universe is obtained. Then we verified it and discussed the influence of the evolution of the universe on the size of the black hole. To study the problem of the orbits of a planet in the expanding universe, we rewrote the metric in the Schwarzschild coordinates system and deduced the equation of motion for a planet.The metric for a Reissner–Nordström black hole in the background of the Friedman–Robertson–Walker universe is obtained. Then we verified it and discussed the influence of the evolution of the universe on the size of the black hole. To study the problem of the orbits of a planet in the expanding universe, we rewrote the metric in the Schwarzschild coordinates system and deduced the equation of motion for a planet.
[1] G.C. McVittie Mon. Not. R. Astron. Soc. 93 1933 325 [2] D. Kastor J. Traschen Phys. Rev. D 47 1993 5401 [3] T. Shiromizu U. Gen Class. Quantum Grav. 17 2000 1361 [4] K.R. Nayak M.A.H. MacCallum C.V. Vishveshvara Phys. Rev. D 63 2000 024020 [5] K.R. Nayak, C.V. Vishveshvara, Geometry of the Kerr black hole in the Einstein cosmological background (2000), Report [6] C.J. Gao, S.N. Zhang, Phys. Rev. D, submitted for publication [7] S. Hanany Astrophys. J. 545 2000 L5 [8] R.M. Wald General Relativity 1984 University of Chicago Press [9] P.D. Noerdlinger V. Petrosion Astrophys. J. 168 1971 1

Ξ production at AGS energies
A relativistic transport model is used to study Ξ− production in 2–11 AGeV Au+Au collisions. Introducing the strangeness-exchange reactions between antikaons and hyperons as the sources for Ξ−, we find that the cascade yield in these collisions is in reasonable agreement with the data. Although the Ξ− abundance does not reach chemical equilibrium unless the cross section for strangeness-exchange reactions is enhanced by six times, it exhibits the strongest enhancement with increasing centrality of collision and with increasing beam energy.A relativistic transport model is used to study Ξ− production in 2–11 AGeV Au+Au collisions. Introducing the strangeness-exchange reactions between antikaons and hyperons as the sources for Ξ−, we find that the cascade yield in these collisions is in reasonable agreement with the data. Although the Ξ− abundance does not reach chemical equilibrium unless the cross section for strangeness-exchange reactions is enhanced by six times, it exhibits the strongest enhancement with increasing centrality of collision and with increasing beam energy.


Born–Infeld black holes in the presence of a cosmological constant
We construct asymptotically anti-de Sitter (and de Sitter) black hole solutions of Einstein–Born–Infeld theory in arbitrary dimension. We critically analyse their geometries and discuss their thermodynamic properties.We construct asymptotically anti-de Sitter (and de Sitter) black hole solutions of Einstein–Born–Infeld theory in arbitrary dimension. We critically analyse their geometries and discuss their thermodynamic properties.


3-branes and uniqueness of the Salam–Sezgin vacuum
We prove the uniqueness of the supersymmetric Salam–Sezgin (Minkowski)4×S2 ground state among all non-singular solutions with a four-dimensional Poincaré, de Sitter or anti-de Sitter symmetry. We construct the most general solutions with an axial symmetry in the two-dimensional internal space, and show that included amongst these is a family that is non-singular away from a conical defect at one pole of a distorted 2-sphere. These solutions admit the interpretation of 3-branes with negative tension.We prove the uniqueness of the supersymmetric Salam–Sezgin (Minkowski)4×S2 ground state among all non-singular solutions with a four-dimensional Poincaré, de Sitter or anti-de Sitter symmetry. We construct the most general solutions with an axial symmetry in the two-dimensional internal space, and show that included amongst these is a family that is non-singular away from a conical defect at one pole of a distorted 2-sphere. These solutions admit the interpretation of 3-branes with negative tension.
[1] A. Salam E. Sezgin Phys. Lett. B 147 1984 47 [2] K.I. Maeda H. Nishino Phys. Lett. B 154 1985 358 [3] K.I. Maeda H. Nishino Phys. Lett. B 158 1985 381 [4] G.W. Gibbons P.K. Townsend Nucl. Phys. B 282 1987 610 [5] J.J. Halliwell Nucl. Phys. B 286 1987 729 [6] Y. Aghababaie C.P. Burgess S.L. Parameswaran F. Quevedo JHEP 0303 2003 032 hep-th/0212091 [7] Y. Aghababaie C.P. Burgess S.L. Parameswaran F. Quevedo hep-th/0304256 [8] G.W. Gibbons C.N. Pope hep-th/0307052 [9] R. Güven J.T. Liu C.N. Pope E. Sezgin Class. Quantum Grav. 21 2004 1001 hep-th/0306201 [10] S. Randjbar-Daemi A. Salam E. Sezgin J. Strathdee Phys. Lett. B 151 1985 351 [11] A. Salam E. Sezgin Phys. Scr. 32 1985 283 [12] E. Bergshoeff T.W. Kephart A. Salam E. Sezgin Mod. Phys. Lett. A 1 1986 267 [13] J. Kerimo H. Lü Phys. Lett. B 576 2003 219 [14] M. Cvetič G.W. Gibbons C.N. Pope Nucl. Phys. B 677 2004 164 hep-th/0308026 [15] G.W. Gibbons K.I. Maeda Nucl. Phys. B 298 1988 741 [16] S. Randjbar-Daemi A. Salam J. Strathdee Nucl. Phys. B 214 1983 491 [17] H. Nishino E. Sezgin Phys. Lett. B 144 1984 187

New observables in longitudinal single-spin asymmetries in semi-inclusive DIS
We analyze longitudinal beam and target single-spin asymmetries in semi-inclusive deep inelastic scattering and in jet deep inelastic scattering, including all possible twist-3 contributions as well as quark mass corrections. We take into account the path-ordered exponential in the soft correlators and show that it leads to the introduction of a new distribution and a new fragmentation function contributing to the asymmetries.We analyze longitudinal beam and target single-spin asymmetries in semi-inclusive deep inelastic scattering and in jet deep inelastic scattering, including all possible twist-3 contributions as well as quark mass corrections. We take into account the path-ordered exponential in the soft correlators and show that it leads to the introduction of a new distribution and a new fragmentation function contributing to the asymmetries.
[1] A. Airapetian HERMES Collaboration Phys. Rev. Lett. 84 2000 4047 hep-ex/9910062 [2] A. Airapetian HERMES Collaboration Phys. Rev. D 64 2001 097101 hep-ex/0104005 [3] A. Airapetian HERMES Collaboration Phys. Lett. B 562 2003 182 hep-ex/0212039 [4] H. Avakian CLAS Collaboration hep-ex/0301005 [5] J.C. Collins Nucl. Phys. B 396 1993 161 hep-ph/9208213 [6] A.V. Efremov K. Goeke P. Schweitzer Phys. Lett. B 522 2001 37 hep-ph/0108213 A.V. Efremov K. Goeke P. Schweitzer Phys. Lett. B 544 2002 389 Erratum [7] A.V. Efremov K. Goeke P. Schweitzer Eur. Phys. J. C 24 2002 407 hep-ph/0112166 [8] A.V. Efremov K. Goeke P. Schweitzer Phys. Rev. D 67 2003 114014 hep-ph/0208124 [9] B.Q. Ma I. Schmidt J.J. Yang Phys. Rev. D 66 2002 094001 hep-ph/0209114 [10] A.V. Efremov K. Goeke P. Schweitzer Eur. Phys. J. C 32 2003 337 hep-ph/0309209 [11] A.V. Efremov K. Goeke P. Schweitzer Phys. Lett. B 568 2003 63 hep-ph/0303062 [12] P. Schweitzer A. Bacchetta Nucl. Phys. A 732 2004 106 hep-ph/0310318 [13] D.W. Sivers Phys. Rev. D 41 1990 83 [14] D. Boer P.J. Mulders Phys. Rev. D 57 1998 5780 hep-ph/9711485 [15] F. Yuan Phys. Lett. B 589 2004 28 hep-ph/0310279 [16] L.P. Gamberg D.S. Hwang K.A. Oganessyan Phys. Lett. B 584 2004 276 hep-ph/0311221 [17] X. Ji J.P. Ma F. Yuan hep-ph/0404183 [18] X. Ji J.P. Ma F. Yuan hep-ph/0405085 [19] K. Goeke A. Metz P.V. Pobylitsa M.V. Polyakov Phys. Lett. B 567 2003 27 hep-ph/0302028 [20] P.J. Mulders R.D. Tangerman Nucl. Phys. B 461 1996 197 hep-ph/9510301 P.J. Mulders R.D. Tangerman Nucl. Phys. B 484 1996 538 Erratum [21] X. Ji F. Yuan Phys. Lett. B 543 2002 66 hep-ph/0206057 [22] A.V. Belitsky X. Ji F. Yuan Nucl. Phys. B 656 2003 165 hep-ph/0208038 [23] A. Afanasev C.E. Carlson hep-ph/0308163 [24] A. Metz M. Schlegel hep-ph/0403182 [25] D. Boer P.J. Mulders F. Pijlman Nucl. Phys. B 667 2003 201 hep-ph/0303034 [26] D. Boer hep-ph/0312149 [27] J.P. Ma Q. Wang hep-ph/0310245 [28] J.A.M. Vermaseren math-ph/0010025 [29] E. Avetisyan, HERMES Collaboration, Talk delivered at the 12th International Workshop on Deep Inelastic Scattering (DIS 2004), Strbske Pleso, Slovakia, 14–18 April 2004 [30] K. Hagiwara K. Hikasa N. Kai Phys. Rev. D 27 1983 84 [31] M. Ahmed T. Gehrmann Phys. Lett. B 465 1999 297 hep-ph/9906503 [32] V.A. Korotkov W.D. Nowak K.A. Oganessyan Eur. Phys. J. C 18 2001 639 hep-ph/0002268 [33] R. Seidl, HERMES Collaboration, Talk delivered at the 12th International Workshop on Deep Inelastic Scattering (DIS 2004), Strbske Pleso, Slovakia, 14–18 April 2004

Dynamical CP violation in the early Universe
Following earlier ideas of Dolgov, we show that the asymmetrical dynamical evolution of fields in the early Universe provides a new source for CP violation. This can lead to baryogenesis without any additional CP-violating interactions. The magnitude of this CP violation is time-dependent. In particular, it vanishes (or is very small) in the late Universe after the fields have relaxed (or are in their final approach) to their vacuum values. We provide an explicit example in which our mechanism is realized.Following earlier ideas of Dolgov, we show that the asymmetrical dynamical evolution of fields in the early Universe provides a new source for CP violation. This can lead to baryogenesis without any additional CP-violating interactions. The magnitude of this CP violation is time-dependent. In particular, it vanishes (or is very small) in the late Universe after the fields have relaxed (or are in their final approach) to their vacuum values. We provide an explicit example in which our mechanism is realized.


Family of singular solutions in a SUSY bulk-boundary system
A set of classical solutions of a singular type is found in a 5D SUSY bulk-boundary system. The “parallel” configuration, where the whole components of fields or branes are parallel in the iso-space, naturally appears. It has three free parameters related to the scale freedom in the choice of the brane-matter sources and the “free” wave property of the extra component of the bulk-vector field. The solutions describe brane, anti-brane and brane–anti-brane configurations depending on the parameter choice. Some solutions describe the localization behaviour even after the non-compact limit of the extra space. Stableness is assured. Their meaning in the brane world physics is examined in relation to the stableness, localization, non-singular (kink) solution and the bulk Higgs mechanism.A set of classical solutions of a singular type is found in a 5D SUSY bulk-boundary system. The “parallel” configuration, where the whole components of fields or branes are parallel in the iso-space, naturally appears. It has three free parameters related to the scale freedom in the choice of the brane-matter sources and the “free” wave property of the extra component of the bulk-vector field. The solutions describe brane, anti-brane and brane–anti-brane configurations depending on the parameter choice. Some solutions describe the localization behaviour even after the non-compact limit of the extra space. Stableness is assured. Their meaning in the brane world physics is examined in relation to the stableness, localization, non-singular (kink) solution and the bulk Higgs mechanism.


Dynamical study of the pentaquark antidecuplet
Dynamical calculations are performed for all isomultiplets of the flavour antidecuplet to which the newly discovered pentaquark Θ+ belongs. The framework is a constituent quark model where the short-range interaction has a flavour–spin structure. In this model the lowest pentaquarks have positive parity. Each antidecuplet member is described by a variational solution with the Pauli principle properly taken into account. By fitting the mass of Θ+ of minimal content uudds̄, the mass of Ξ−−, of minimal content ddssū, is predicted at approximately 1960 MeV. The influence of the octet-antidecuplet mixing on the masses of the Y=1 and 0 pentaquarks is considered within the same model and the role of the hyperfine interaction in this mixing is pointed out.Dynamical calculations are performed for all isomultiplets of the flavour antidecuplet to which the newly discovered pentaquark Θ+ belongs. The framework is a constituent quark model where the short-range interaction has a flavour–spin structure. In this model the lowest pentaquarks have positive parity. Each antidecuplet member is described by a variational solution with the Pauli principle properly taken into account. By fitting the mass of Θ+ of minimal content uudds̄, the mass of Ξ−−, of minimal content ddssū, is predicted at approximately 1960 MeV. The influence of the octet-antidecuplet mixing on the masses of the Y=1 and 0 pentaquarks is considered within the same model and the role of the hyperfine interaction in this mixing is pointed out.


Singlet deformation and non(anti)commutative N=2 supersymmetric U(1) gauge theory
We study N=2 supersymmetric U(1) gauge theory in non(anti)commutative N=2 harmonic superspace with the singlet deformation, which preserves chirality. We construct a Lagrangian which is invariant under both the deformed gauge and supersymmetry transformations. We find the field redefinition such that the N=2 vector multilplet transforms canonically under the deformed symmetries.We study N=2 supersymmetric U(1) gauge theory in non(anti)commutative N=2 harmonic superspace with the singlet deformation, which preserves chirality. We construct a Lagrangian which is invariant under both the deformed gauge and supersymmetry transformations. We find the field redefinition such that the N=2 vector multilplet transforms canonically under the deformed symmetries.
[1] J.H. Schwarz P. Van Nieuwenhuizen Lett. Nuovo Cimento 34 1982 21 [2] H. Ooguri C. Vafa Adv. Theor. Math. Phys. 7 2003 53 hep-th/0302109 H. Ooguri C. Vafa Adv. Theor. Math. Phys. 7 2004 405 hep-th/0303063 [3] N. Berkovits N. Seiberg JHEP 0307 2003 010 hep-th/0306226 [4] J. de Boer P.A. Grassi P. van Nieuwenhuizen Phys. Lett. B 574 2003 98 hep-th/0302078 [5] N. Seiberg JHEP 0306 2003 010 hep-th/0305248 [6] T. Araki K. Ito A. Ohtsuka Phys. Lett. B 573 2003 209 hep-th/0307076 [7] R. Britto B. Feng S.J. Rey JHEP 0307 2003 067 hep-th/0306215 S. Terashima J.T. Yee JHEP 0312 2003 053 hep-th/0306237 M.T. Grisaru S. Penati A. Romagnoni JHEP 0308 2003 003 hep-th/0307099 R. Britto B. Feng Phys. Rev. Lett. 91 2003 201601 hep-th/0307165 A. Romagnoni JHEP 0310 2003 016 hep-th/0307209 O. Lunin S.J. Rey JHEP 0309 2003 045 hep-th/0307275 D. Berenstein S.J. Rey Phys. Rev. D 68 2003 121701 hep-th/0308049 M. Alishahiha A. Ghodsi N. Sadooghi hep-th/0309037 [8] A. Imaanpur JHEP 0309 2003 077 hep-th/0308171 A. Imaanpur JHEP 0312 2003 009 hep-th/0311137 P.A. Grassi R. Ricci D. Robles-Llana hep-th/0311155 R. Britto B. Feng O. Lunin S.J. Rey hep-th/0311275 M. Billo M. Frau I. Pesando A. Lerda hep-th/0402160 A. Imaanpur S. Parvizi hep-th/0403174 [9] D. Klemm S. Penati L. Tamassia Class. Quantum Grav. 20 2003 2905 hep-th/0104190 S. Ferrara M.A. Lledo JHEP 0005 2000 008 hep-th/0002084 M. Hatsuda S. Iso H. Umetsu Nucl. Phys. B 671 2003 217 hep-th/0306251 S. Ferrara M.A. Lledo O. Macia JHEP 0309 2003 068 hep-th/0307039 [10] E. Ivanov O. Lechtenfeld B. Zupnik JHEP 0402 2004 012 hep-th/0308012 [11] S. Ferrara E. Sokatchev Phys. Lett. B 579 2004 226 hep-th/0308021 [12] T. Araki K. Ito A. Ohtsuka JHEP 0401 2004 046 hep-th/0401012 [13] C. Sämann M. Wolf hep-th/0401147 [14] D. Mikulovic hep-th/0403290 [15] S.V. Ketov S. Sasaki hep-th/0404119 [16] A. Galperin E. Ivanov V. Ogievetsky E. Sokatchev Harmonic Superspace 2001 Cambridge Univ. Press Cambridge [17] B.M. Zupnik Phys. Lett. B 183 1987 175 [18] T. Araki, K. Ito, A. Ohtsuka, in preparation [19] S. Ferrara E. Ivanov O. Lechtenfeld E. Sokatchev B. Zupnik hep-th/0405049

Quantum escape of sudden future singularity
We consider finite-time, future (sudden or Big Rip type) singularities which may occur even when strong energy condition is not violated but equation of state parameter is time-dependent. Recently, example of such singularity has been presented by Barrow, we found another example of it. Taking into account back reaction of conformal quantum fields near singularity, it is shown explicitly that quantum effects may delay (or make milder) the singularity. It is argued that if the evolution to singularity is realistic, due to quantum effects the universe may end up in de Sitter phase before scale factor blows up. This picture is generalized for braneworld where sudden singularity may occur on the brane with qualitatively similar conclusions.We consider finite-time, future (sudden or Big Rip type) singularities which may occur even when strong energy condition is not violated but equation of state parameter is time-dependent. Recently, example of such singularity has been presented by Barrow, we found another example of it. Taking into account back reaction of conformal quantum fields near singularity, it is shown explicitly that quantum effects may delay (or make milder) the singularity. It is argued that if the evolution to singularity is realistic, due to quantum effects the universe may end up in de Sitter phase before scale factor blows up. This picture is generalized for braneworld where sudden singularity may occur on the brane with qualitatively similar conclusions.
[1] B. McInnes JHEP 0208 2002 029 [2] A.A. Starobinsky Gravit. Cosmol. 6 2000 157 [3] R.R. Caldwell M. Kamionkowski N.N. Weinberg Phys. Rev. Lett. 91 2003 071301 astro-ph/0302506 [4] J.D. Barrow Class. Quantum Grav. 21 2004 L79 gr-qc/0403084 [5] S.W. Hawking G.F.R. Ellis The Large Scale Structure of Space–Time 1973 Cambridge Univ. Press Cambridge [6] L.P. Chimento R. Lazkoz gr-qc/0405020 [7] P.F. Gonzalez-Diaz astro-ph/0404045 M. Bouhmadi-Lopez J. Jimenez Madrid astro-ph/0404540 [8] A.A. Starobinsky Phys. Lett. B 91 1980 99 [9] S. Nojiri S.D. Odintsov S. Ogushi Int. J. Mod. Phys. A 17 2002 4809 hep-th/0205187 [10] E. Elizalde S. Nojiri S.D. Odintsov hep-th/0405034 [11] R. Maartens gr-qc/0312059 G. Kofinas R. Maartens E. Papantonopoulos JHEP 0310 2003 066 [12] P. Brax C. van de Bruck A.-C. Davis hep-th/0404011 M. Sami N. Dadhich hep-th/0405016 [13] T. Shiromizu K.-I. Maeda M. Sasaki Phys. Rev. D 62 2000 024012 gr-qc/9910076 T. Shiromizu K.-I. Maeda M. Sasaki Phys. Rev. D 62 2000 024008 hep-th/9912233 [14] L. Randall R. Sundrum Phys. Rev. Lett. 83 1999 3370 hep-ph/9905221 [15] Yu. Shtanov V. Sahni gr-qc/0204040 [16] S. Nojiri S.D. Odintsov S. Zerbini Phys. Rev. D 62 2000 064006 hep-th/0001192 [17] S.W. Hawking T. Hertog H.S. Reall Phys. Rev. D 62 2000 043501 hep-th/0003052 [18] S. Nojiri S.D. Odintsov Phys. Lett. B 484 2000 119 hep-th/0004097 S. Nojiri S.D. Odintsov Gravit. Cosmol. 8 2002 73 hep-th/0105160

Two-loop light fermion contribution to Higgs production and decays
We compute the electroweak corrections due to the light fermions to the production cross section σ(gg→H) and to the partial decay widths Γ(H→γγ) and Γ(H→gg). We present analytic results for these corrections that are expressed in terms of Generalized Harmonic Polylogarithms. We find that for the gluon fusion production cross section and for the decay width Γ(H→gg) the corrections are large in the Higgs mass region below 160 GeV, where they grow from 4 to 9% of the lowest order term, while above 160 GeV they are small. For the decay width Γ(H→γγ) the corrections for Higgs mass above 160 GeV are typically below −5% of the lowest order term but they may reach O(−10%) for mH∼2mW.We compute the electroweak corrections due to the light fermions to the production cross section σ(gg→H) and to the partial decay widths Γ(H→γγ) and Γ(H→gg). We present analytic results for these corrections that are expressed in terms of Generalized Harmonic Polylogarithms. We find that for the gluon fusion production cross section and for the decay width Γ(H→gg) the corrections are large in the Higgs mass region below 160 GeV, where they grow from 4 to 9% of the lowest order term, while above 160 GeV they are small. For the decay width Γ(H→γγ) the corrections for Higgs mass above 160 GeV are typically below −5% of the lowest order term but they may reach O(−10%) for mH∼2mW.


Search for the flavor-changing neutral current decay D0→μ+μ− with the HERA-B detector
We report on a search for the flavor-changing neutral current decay D0→μ+μ− using 50×106 events recorded with a dimuon trigger in interactions of 920 GeV protons with nuclei by the HERA-B experiment. We find no evidence for such decays and set a 90% confidence level upper limit on the branching fraction B(D0→μ+μ−)<2.0×10−6.We report on a search for the flavor-changing neutral current decay D0→μ+μ− using 50×106 events recorded with a dimuon trigger in interactions of 920 GeV protons with nuclei by the HERA-B experiment. We find no evidence for such decays and set a 90% confidence level upper limit on the branching fraction B(D0→μ+μ−)<2.0×10−6.


Poincaré invariant gravity with local supersymmetry as a gauge theory for the M-algebra
Here we consider a gravitational action having local Poincaré invariance which is given by the dimensional continuation of the Euler density in ten dimensions. It is shown that the local supersymmetric extension of this action requires the algebra to be the maximal extension of the N=1 super-Poincaré algebra. The resulting action is shown to describe a gauge theory for the M-algebra, and is not the eleven-dimensional supergravity theory of Cremmer–Julia–Scherk. The theory admits a class of vacuum solutions of the form S10−d×Xd+1, where Xd+1 is a warped product of R with a d-dimensional spacetime. It is shown that a nontrivial propagator for the graviton exists only for d=4 and positive cosmological constant. Perturbations of the metric around this solution reproduce linearized General Relativity around four-dimensional de Sitter spacetime.Here we consider a gravitational action having local Poincaré invariance which is given by the dimensional continuation of the Euler density in ten dimensions. It is shown that the local supersymmetric extension of this action requires the algebra to be the maximal extension of the N=1 super-Poincaré algebra. The resulting action is shown to describe a gauge theory for the M-algebra, and is not the eleven-dimensional supergravity theory of Cremmer–Julia–Scherk. The theory admits a class of vacuum solutions of the form S10−d×Xd+1, where Xd+1 is a warped product of R with a d-dimensional spacetime. It is shown that a nontrivial propagator for the graviton exists only for d=4 and positive cosmological constant. Perturbations of the metric around this solution reproduce linearized General Relativity around four-dimensional de Sitter spacetime.
[1] E. Cremmer B. Julia J. Scherk Phys. Lett. B 76 1978 409 [2] P.K. Townsend Phys. Lett. B 350 1995 184 [3] E. Witten Nucl. Phys. B 443 1995 85 [4] J.H. Schwarz Phys. Lett. B 367 1996 97 [5] M.J. Duff B.E.W. Nilsson C.N. Pope Phys. Rep. 130 1986 1142 [6] N. Arkani-Ahmed S. Dimopoulos G.R. Dvali Phys. Lett. B 429 1998 263 L. Randall R. Sundrum Phys. Rev. Lett. 83 1999 3370 [7] B. de Wit H. Nicolai H. Samtleben hep-th/0403014 [8] P.K. Townsend hep-th/9507048 [9] P.S. Howe J.M. Izquierdo G. Papadopoulos P.K. Townsend Nucl. Phys. B 467 1996 183 [10] R. Troncoso J. Zanelli Phys. Rev. D 58 1998 101703 R. Troncoso J. Zanelli Int. J. Theor. Phys. 38 1999 1181 [11] D. Lovelock J. Math. Phys. 12 1971 498 [12] B. Zumino Phys. Rep. 137 1986 109 [13] R. Troncoso J. Zanelli Class. Quantum Grav. 17 2000 4451 [14] C. Teitelboim J. Zanelli Class. Quantum Grav. 4 1987 L125 [15] A.H. Chamseddine Nucl. Phys. B 346 1990 213 [16] S. Deser R. Jackiw S. Templeton Ann. Phys. 140 1982 372 S. Deser R. Jackiw S. Templeton Ann. Phys. 185 1988 406 Erratum S. Deser R. Jackiw S. Templeton Ann. Phys. 281 2000 409 [17] T. Regge Phys. Rep. 137 1986 31 [18] See, e.g. M. Nakahara Geometry, Topology and Physics 1991 Adam Hilger [19] M. Hassaïne, R. Troncoso, J. Zanelli, in preparation [20] M. Bañados R. Troncoso J. Zanelli Phys. Rev. D 54 1996 2605 [21] M. Hassaïne R. Olea R. Troncoso hep-th/0210116 [22] J.A. de Azcárraga J.M. Izquierdo M. Picón O. Varela Nucl. Phys. B 662 2003 185 [23] M. Hatsuda M. Sakaguchi Prog. Theor. Phys. 109 2003 853

Quantum chaos and nuclear mass systematics
The presence of quantum chaos in nuclear mass systematics is analyzed by considering the differences between measured and calculated nuclear masses as a time series described by the power law 1fα. While for the liquid droplet model plus shell corrections a quantum chaotic behavior α≈1 is found, errors in the microscopic mass formula have α≈0.5, closer to white noise. The chaotic behavior seems to arise from many body effects not included in the mass formula.The presence of quantum chaos in nuclear mass systematics is analyzed by considering the differences between measured and calculated nuclear masses as a time series described by the power law 1fα. While for the liquid droplet model plus shell corrections a quantum chaotic behavior α≈1 is found, errors in the microscopic mass formula have α≈0.5, closer to white noise. The chaotic behavior seems to arise from many body effects not included in the mass formula.


Measuring new-physics parameters in B penguin decays
We examine new-physics (NP) effects in B decays with large b¯→s¯ penguin amplitudes. Decays involving b¯→d¯ penguins are assumed to be unaffected. We consider a model-independent parametrization of such NP. We argue that NP strong phases are negligible relative to those of the standard model. This allows us to describe the NP effects in terms of a small number of effective amplitudes ANPq(q=u,d,s,c) and corresponding weak phases Φq. We then consider pairs of neutral B decays which are related by flavour SU(3) in the standard model. One receives a large b¯→s¯ penguin component and has a NP contribution; the other has a b¯→d¯ penguin amplitude and is unaffected by NP. The time-dependent measurement of these two decays allows the measurement of the NP parameters ANPq and Φq. The knowledge of these parameters allows us to rule out many NP models and thus partially identify the new physics.We examine new-physics (NP) effects in B decays with large b¯→s¯ penguin amplitudes. Decays involving b¯→d¯ penguins are assumed to be unaffected. We consider a model-independent parametrization of such NP. We argue that NP strong phases are negligible relative to those of the standard model. This allows us to describe the NP effects in terms of a small number of effective amplitudes ANPq(q=u,d,s,c) and corresponding weak phases Φq. We then consider pairs of neutral B decays which are related by flavour SU(3) in the standard model. One receives a large b¯→s¯ penguin component and has a NP contribution; the other has a b¯→d¯ penguin amplitude and is unaffected by NP. The time-dependent measurement of these two decays allows the measurement of the NP parameters ANPq and Φq. The knowledge of these parameters allows us to rule out many NP models and thus partially identify the new physics.


Determining the spin of supersymmetric particles at the LHC using lepton charge asymmetry
If signals suggesting supersymmetry (SUSY) are discovered at the LHC then it will be vital to measure the spins of the new particles to demonstrate that they are indeed the predicted super-partners. A method is discussed by which the spins of some of the SUSY particles can be determined. Angular distributions in sparticle decays lead to charge asymmetry in lepton-jet invariant mass distributions. The size of the asymmetry is proportional to the primary production asymmetry between squarks and anti-squarks. Monte Carlo simulations are performed for a particular mSUGRA model point at the LHC. The resultant asymmetry distributions are consistent with a spin-0 slepton and a spin-12χ˜20, but are not consistent with both particles being scalars.If signals suggesting supersymmetry (SUSY) are discovered at the LHC then it will be vital to measure the spins of the new particles to demonstrate that they are indeed the predicted super-partners. A method is discussed by which the spins of some of the SUSY particles can be determined. Angular distributions in sparticle decays lead to charge asymmetry in lepton-jet invariant mass distributions. The size of the asymmetry is proportional to the primary production asymmetry between squarks and anti-squarks. Monte Carlo simulations are performed for a particular mSUGRA model point at the LHC. The resultant asymmetry distributions are consistent with a spin-0 slepton and a spin-12χ˜20, but are not consistent with both particles being scalars.


Experimental study of trimuon events in neutrino charged-current interactions
This Letter reports on a study of trimuon events induced by neutrino interactions in the CHORUS calorimeter exposed to the CERN SPS wide-band νμ beam. Among the multimuon events produced in the calorimeter, 42 μ−μ−μ+ events were selected and their kinematical properties investigated. In the past, several groups collected a sample of about one hundred events of this type but their source was largely unknown. Taking advantage of experimental data presently available on the production and muonic branching ratios of light neutral mesons and resonances, we make absolute predictions for the expected rates in our experiment. Detailed Monte Carlo simulations described in this article show that more than half of the trimuon events can be attributed to this source. Muons from π− and K− decays in charm dimuon events are responsible for an additional ≈25% contribution to the total μ−μ−μ+ rate. The remaining 25% of events are likely to come from the internal bremsstrahlung of virtual photons into a muon pair. Associated-charm production with subsequent decays of both charmed particles into muons is a negligible source of trimuon events.This Letter reports on a study of trimuon events induced by neutrino interactions in the CHORUS calorimeter exposed to the CERN SPS wide-band νμ beam. Among the multimuon events produced in the calorimeter, 42 μ−μ−μ+ events were selected and their kinematical properties investigated. In the past, several groups collected a sample of about one hundred events of this type but their source was largely unknown. Taking advantage of experimental data presently available on the production and muonic branching ratios of light neutral mesons and resonances, we make absolute predictions for the expected rates in our experiment. Detailed Monte Carlo simulations described in this article show that more than half of the trimuon events can be attributed to this source. Muons from π− and K− decays in charm dimuon events are responsible for an additional ≈25% contribution to the total μ−μ−μ+ rate. The remaining 25% of events are likely to come from the internal bremsstrahlung of virtual photons into a muon pair. Associated-charm production with subsequent decays of both charmed particles into muons is a negligible source of trimuon events.


Decay constants of heavy meson of 0− state in relativistic Salpeter method
The decay constants of pseudoscalar heavy mesons of 0− state are computed by means of the relativistic (instantaneous) Salpeter equation. We solved the full Salpeter equation without making any further approximation, such as ignoring the small component wave function. Therefore, our results for the decay constants include the complete relativistic contributions from the light and the heavy quarks. We obtain FDs≈248±27, FD≈230±25(D0,D±), FBs≈216±32, FB≈196±29(B0,B±), FBc≈322±42 and Fηc≈292±25 MeV.The decay constants of pseudoscalar heavy mesons of 0− state are computed by means of the relativistic (instantaneous) Salpeter equation. We solved the full Salpeter equation without making any further approximation, such as ignoring the small component wave function. Therefore, our results for the decay constants include the complete relativistic contributions from the light and the heavy quarks. We obtain FDs≈248±27, FD≈230±25(D0,D±), FBs≈216±32, FB≈196±29(B0,B±), FBc≈322±42 and Fηc≈292±25 MeV.


Vector meson contributions in ε′/ε
The CP-violating parameter ɛ′/ɛ is computed using the low-energy dynamics of the chiral theory supplemented by vector resonances. The divergent contributions coming from strong π–π scattering are tamed by vector–meson exchange terms. This amounts to softening the fast growing high-energy behaviour of π–π scattering. The final result for ε′/ε shows a smooth dependence on the cut-off where low energy dynamics is matched with that of QCD.The CP-violating parameter ɛ′/ɛ is computed using the low-energy dynamics of the chiral theory supplemented by vector resonances. The divergent contributions coming from strong π–π scattering are tamed by vector–meson exchange terms. This amounts to softening the fast growing high-energy behaviour of π–π scattering. The final result for ε′/ε shows a smooth dependence on the cut-off where low energy dynamics is matched with that of QCD.


Brane solution with an increasing warp factor
We present a new brane solution in the (1+5)-dimensional space–time with an increasing warp factor, which localizes the zero modes of all kinds of matter fields and Newtonian gravity. The interesting features of this solution are: (1) In contrast to the Gogberashvili–Singleton case the effective wave function of the zero mode spinor field confined on the brane is finite at a position of brane; (2) There is exactly one zero mode for each matter field and the gravitational field confined on the brane with a finite probability and infinitely many zero modes (labelled by the angular momentum corresponding to extra space) are located in the bulk at different localization radii.We present a new brane solution in the (1+5)-dimensional space–time with an increasing warp factor, which localizes the zero modes of all kinds of matter fields and Newtonian gravity. The interesting features of this solution are: (1) In contrast to the Gogberashvili–Singleton case the effective wave function of the zero mode spinor field confined on the brane is finite at a position of brane; (2) There is exactly one zero mode for each matter field and the gravitational field confined on the brane with a finite probability and infinitely many zero modes (labelled by the angular momentum corresponding to extra space) are located in the bulk at different localization radii.
[1] N. Arkani-Hamed S. Dimopoulos G. Dvali Phys. Lett. B 429 1998 263 hep-ph/9803315 N. Arkani-Hamed S. Dimopoulos G. Dvali Phys. Rev. D 59 1999 086004 hep-ph/9807344 I. Antoniadis N. Arkani-Hamed S. Dimopoulos G. Dvali Phys. Lett. B 436 1998 257 hep-ph/9804398 [2] L. Randall R. Sundrum Phys. Rev. Lett. 83 1999 3370 hep-ph/9905221 L. Randall R. Sundrum Phys. Rev. Lett. 83 1999 4690 hep-th/9906064 [3] M. Gogberashvili Int. J. Mod. Phys. D 11 2002 1635 hep-th/9812296 M. Gogberashvili Int. J. Mod. Phys. D 11 2002 1639 hep-ph/9908347 [4] V. Rubakov M. Shaposhnikov Phys. Lett. B 125 1983 136 V. Rubakov M. Shaposhnikov Phys. Lett. B 125 1983 139 [5] K. Akama K. Kikkawa N. Nakanishi H. Nariai Gauge Theory and Gravitation, Nara, Japan, 1982 Lecture Notes in Physics vol. 176 1982 Springer Berlin 267 hep-th/0001113 [6] B. Bajc G. Gabadadze Phys. Lett. B 474 2000 282 hep-th/9912232 [7] A. Pomarol Phys. Lett. B 486 2000 153 hep-ph/9911294 [8] I. Oda Phys. Lett. B 496 2000 113 hep-th/0006203 I. Oda Phys. Rev. D 62 2000 126009 hep-th/0008012 [9] M. Gogberashvili P. Midodashvili Phys. Lett. B 515 2001 447 hep-ph/0005298 M. Gogberashvili P. Midodashvili Europhys. Lett. 61 2003 308 hep-th/0111132 [10] P. Midodashvili hep-th/0308051 [11] M. Gogberashvili D. Singleton Phys. Rev. D 69 2004 026004 hep-th/0305241 M. Gogberashvili D. Singleton Phys. Lett. B 582 2004 95 hep-th/0310048 [12] I. Oda Phys. Lett. B 571 2003 235 hep-th/0307119 [13] D. Singleton hep-th/0403273 [14] V. Fock Z. Phys. 57 1929 261 reprinted with the Russian translation, in: E. Kuranski, R. Zatsepina, G. Sorokina (Eds.), Albert Einstein and the Theory of Gravitation, Mir, Moscow, 1979 [15] J. Mathews R. Walker Mathematical Methods of Physics 1972 Atomizdat Moscow [16] N. Arkani-Hamed M. Schmaltz Phys. Rev. D 61 2000 033005 hep-ph/9903417 [17] This was pointed out to me by M. Gogberashvili

High inertness of W@Si12 cluster toward O2 molecule
Highlights► We investigated the O2 molecule adsorption on W@Si12 cluster. ► The dissociation barrier of the O2 molecule on W@Si12 was examined. ► The MEP and the inertness of W@Si12 toward O2 are identified. ► The spin-state-dependent kinetic processes are discussed. ► Other factors were also discussed for the inertness of the cluster studied.


Rectifying performance in zigzag graphene nanoribbon heterojunctions with different edge hydrogenations
Using nonequilibrium Greenʼs functions in combination with the density functional theory, we investigated the electronic transport behaviors of zigzag graphene nanoribbon (ZGNR) heterojunctions with different edge hydrogenations. The results show that electronic transport properties of ZGNR heterojunctions can be modulated by hydrogenations, and prominent rectification effects can be observed. We propose that the edge dihydrogenation leads to a blocking of electronic transfer, as well as the changes of the distribution of the frontier orbital at negative/positive bias might be responsible for the rectification effects. These results may be helpful for designing practical devices based on graphene nanoribbons.


Carrier dependent ferromagnetism in chromium doped topological insulator Cry(BixSb1−x)2−yTe3
To understand the mechanism of ferromagnetism in topological insulator, we studied the structural, magnetic and transport characters of Cry(BixSb1−x)2−yTe3 single crystals. The Curie temperature TC, which is determined from magnetization and anomalous Hall effect (AHE) measurements by Arrott plots, is found to be proportional to yCr⁎p1/3, where p is the hole density. This fact supports a scenario of Ruderman–Kittel–Kasuya–Yoshida (RKKY) interaction with mean-field approximation.


Bloch–Siegert shift in application to the astrophysical determination of the fundamental constants variation
We have evaluated the Bloch–Siegert shift for the different values of magnetic fieldʼs strengths defined at astrophysical conditions, i.e. when the stars with the strong surface magnetic fields are taken as a powerful pumping source of radiation. It is found that the additional shift of resonant frequency should be taken into account in the search for the time variation of the fundamental constants. The main conclusion is that the influence of the electromagnetic field should be considered carefully in each special case of the corresponding frequency determination.


Short-time quantum propagator and Bohmian trajectories
We begin by giving correct expressions for the short-time action following the work Makri–Miller. We use these estimates to derive an accurate expression modulo Δt2 for the quantum propagator and we show that the quantum potential is negligible modulo Δt2 for a point source, thus justifying an unfortunately largely ignored observation of Holland made twenty years ago. We finally prove that this implies that the quantum motion is classical for very short times.
[1] D. Bohm Hidden variables and the implicate order B.J. Hiley D.F. Peat Quantum Implications: Essays in Honour of David Bohm 1987 Routledge London 35 [2] D. Bohm B.J. Hiley The Undivided Universe: An Ontological Interpretation of Quantum Theory 1993 Routledge London, New York [3] M. de Gosson The Principles of Newtonian and Quantum Mechanics. The Need for Planckʼs Constant  ℏ 2001 Imperial College Press London [4] M. de Gosson B.J. Hiley Zeno paradox for Bohmian trajectories: the unfolding of the metatron arXiv:1001.2622 [5] B.J. Hiley A.H. Aziz Mufti The ontological interpretation of quantum field theory applied in a cosmological context M. Ferrero A. van der Merwe Fundamental Problems in Quantum Physics 1995 Kluwer Dordrecht 141 156 [6] P.R. Holland The Quantum Theory of Motion: An Account of the de Broglie–Bohm Causal Interpretation of Quantum Mechanics 1993 Cambridge University Press [7] P. Holland Hamiltonian theory of wave and particle in quantum mechanics I: Liouvilleʼs theorem and the interpretation of the de Broglie–Bohm theory Nuovo Cimento B 116 2001 1043 1070 [8] P. Holland Hamiltonian theory of wave and particle in quantum mechanics II: Hamilton–Jacobi theory and particle back-reaction Nuovo Cimento B 116 2001 1143 1172 [9] N. Makri W.H. Miller Correct short time propagator for Feynman path integration by power series expansion in Δ t Chem. Phys. Lett. 151 1988 1 8 [10] N. Makri W.H. Miller Exponential power series expansion for the quantum time evolution operator J. Chem. Phys. 90 1989 904 911 [11] L.S. Schulman Techniques and Applications of Path Integration 1981 Wiley New York

Glued trees algorithm under phase damping
We study the behaviour of the glued trees algorithm described by Childs et al. in [1] under decoherence. We consider a discrete time reformulation of the continuous time quantum walk protocol and apply a phase damping channel to the coin state, investigating the effect of such a mechanism on the probability of the walker appearing on the target vertex of the graph. We pay particular attention to any potential advantage coming from the use of weak decoherence for the spreading of the walk across the glued trees graph.


Photon exchange and entanglement formation during transmission through a rectangular quantum barrier
When a quantum particle traverses a rectangular potential created by a quantum field both photon exchange and entanglement between particle and field take place. We present the full analytic solution of the Schrödinger equation of the composite particle–field system allowing investigation of these phenomena in detail and comparison to the results of a classical field treatment. Besides entanglement formation, remarkable differences also appear with respect to the symmetry between energy emission and absorption, resonance effects and if the field initially occupies the vacuum state.


Stern–Gerlach surfing in laser wakefield accelerators
We investigate the effects of a Stern–Gerlach-type addition to the Lorentz force on electrons in a laser wakefield accelerator. The Stern–Gerlach-type terms are found to generate a family of trajectories describing electrons that ‘surf’ along the plasma density wave driven by a laser pulse. Such trajectories could lead to an increase in the size of an electron bunch, which may have implications for attempts to exploit such bunches in future free electron lasers.


Modelling the jetting of dilute polymer solutions in drop-on-demand inkjet printing
We have developed a simplified jetting model that predicts the printability of dilute, monodisperse polymer solutions in drop-on-demand (DoD) inkjet printing. Polymer molecules are modelled as finitely extensible non-linear elastic (FENE) dumbbells with fluid parameters chosen to fit the Zimm model. Three distinct jetting regimes are predicted, defined by the Weissenberg number Wi and the extensibility L of the molecules. The behaviour of the jet depends upon a critical factor that limits jet speed; regime 1 is restricted by fluid viscosity, regime 2 by elasticity and regime 3 by high strain extensional viscosity. We study two polymer solutions of disparate viscosity under different jetting conditions (i.e. print speed and nozzle geometry) and compare our results with experimental data and axisymmetric simulations. The maximum polymer concentration that can be jetted at a desired speed is found to scale with molecular weight Mw and is dependent on the solvent quality factor ν. We find that polymers can be stretched out in the print head for particular nozzle geometries, which has a considerable effect on the maximum polymer concentration that can be ejected. Furthermore, this ‘pre-stretch’ mechanism can fully extend molecules in the nozzle and consequently, molecules can undergo central scission due to high strain rates at the nozzle exit.


Inkjet printing of weakly elastic polymer solutions
Fluid assessment methods, requiring small volumes and avoiding the need for jetting, are particularly useful in the design of functional fluids for inkjet printing applications. With the increasing use of complex (rather than Newtonian) fluids for manufacturing, single frequency fluid characterisation cannot reliably predict good jetting behaviour, owing to the range of shearing and extensional flow rates involved. However, the scope of inkjet fluid assessments (beyond achievement of a nominal viscosity within the print head design specification) is usually focused on the final application rather than the jetting processes. The experimental demonstration of the clear insufficiency of such approaches shows that fluid jetting can readily discriminate between fluids assessed as having similar LVE characterisation (within a factor of 2) for typical commercial rheometer measurements at shearing rates reaching 104rads−1.Jetting behaviour of weakly elastic dilute linear polystyrene solutions, for molecular weights of 110–488kDa, recorded using high speed video was compared with recent results from numerical modelling and capillary thinning studies of the same solutions.The jetting images show behaviour ranging from near-Newtonian to “beads-on-a-string”. The inkjet printing behaviour does not correlate simply with the measured extensional relaxation times or Zimm times, but may be consistent with non-linear extensibility L and the production of fully extended polymer molecules in the thinning jet ligament.Fluid test methods allowing a more complete characterisation of NLVE parameters are needed to assess inkjet printing feasibility prior to directly jetting complex fluids. At the present time, directly jetting such fluids may prove to be the only alternative.


Stability of the boundary layer on a rotating disk for power-law fluids
The stability of the flow due to a rotating disk is considered for non-Newtonian fluids, specifically shear-thinning fluids that satisfy the power-law (Ostwald-de Waele) relationship. In this case the basic flow is not an exact solution of the Navier–Stokes equations, however, in the limit of large Reynolds number the flow inside the three-dimensional boundary layer can be determined via a similarity solution. An asymptotic analysis is presented in the limit of large Reynolds number. It is shown that the stationary spiral instabilities observed experimentally in the Newtonian case can be described for shear-thinning fluids by a linear stability analysis. Predictions for the wavenumber and wave angle of the disturbances suggest that shear-thinning fluids may have a stabilising effect on the flow.


Gels formed from amino-acid derivatives, their novel rheology as probed by bulk and particle tracking rheological methods
We discuss the use of dynamic light scattering based particle micro-rheology to probe the lengthscale dependence of the microstructures formed by Fmoc-tyrosine gels. Past studies on these systems using dye diffusion have shown that Fmoc-tyrosine is capable of forming gels that can entrap molecules if they are large enough, unlike those gels formed by Fmoc-phenylalanine (Sutton et al., 2009). This result seems at odds with microscopic studies of the gel microstructure, which indicate porosity on much larger lengthscales than the molecular probes used. Here, we use particle probe based micro-rheology to investigate the porosity of the gels on larger lengthscales than is possible using molecular diffusion studies and show that there is considerable evidence of larger scale structures present in the gel. In particular we see that at no point does particle probe based micro-rheology reproduce the bulk properties of the gels, and also that there is strong dependence of the probe behaviour on particle size. Both of these results indicate the presence of microstructural features in the gel that are of the order of the particle size.


Modelling the interfacial peeling of pressure-sensitive adhesives
Peel tests were performed using specimens which consisted of a polyester backing membrane supporting an acrylic pressure-sensitive adhesive adhered to a polyethylene substrate. Interfacial separation of the PSA from the polyethylene substrate was observed. Finite element (FE) peeling simulations were conducted which modelled the backing-membrane as an elasto-plastic power-law material, the adhesive as a viscoelastic material and the interfacial properties with a cohesive zone model (CZM). The material properties of the backing membrane and the pressure-sensitive adhesive were measured from tensile and stress relaxation experiments. The cohesive zone parameters were calculated analytically from the peel test data, as well as being measured directly from independent poker-chip probe tack tests. The numerical results from the CZM/FE simulations and the experimental values of the peel forces as a function of the peel angle were found to be in good agreement.


Assessment of the stress relaxation characteristics of critical gels formed under unidirectional shear flow by controlled stress parallel superposition rheometry
Processes involving a unidirectional shear flow component are widespread in industrial manufacturing techniques such as printing and coating, or in physiological events such as blood coagulation. Standard rheometric techniques are usually employed under quiescent conditions and as such are inappropriate for the study of microstructural modification induced by the presence of a unidirectional shear flow. We demonstrate how controlled stress parallel superposition (CSPS) may be exploited to enable accurate detection of the Gel Point and analysis of Gel Point parameters for systems undergoing a viscoelastic liquid (VEL) to viscoelastic solid (VES) transition in the presence of a unidirectional flow field. Specifically, we note that certain features of the CSPS experiment, when performed near the Gel Point, may obviate previously reported concerns regarding the experiment. A biopolymer system (gelatin) which forms gels by thermoreversible gelation is employed as a model gelling material to confirm the ability of CSPS to characterise the stress relaxation characteristics of critical-gels in the presence of (a) progressively decreasing and (b) progressively increasing unidirectional strain rate and oscillatory strain amplitude. Additional validation of CSPS results is reported for a silicone dielectric gel used in the industrial production of printed electronic products. Finally, CSPS is used to investigate microstructural modification of fibrin–thrombin gels as a consequence of clot formation under a unidirectional shear stress. The results confirm the validity of the CSPS technique in gelation studies and the technique is used, for the first time, to directly record the thermally induced VES to VEL transition in aqueous gelatin systems.


Validation of Optimal Fourier Rheometry for rapidly gelling materials and its application in the study of collagen gelation
Rheological Gel Point measurements may incur errors in the case of rapid gelling systems due to the limitations of multiple frequency oscillatory shear techniques such as frequency sweeps and Fourier Transform Mechanical Spectroscopy, FTMS. These limitations are associated with sample mutation and data interpolation. In the present paper we consider how an alternative rapid characterisation technique known as Optimal Fourier Rheometry, OFR, can be used to study a rapidly gelling material, namely collagen at near physiological temperatures. The OFR technique is validated using a model reference gelling system whose GP characteristics have been widely reported. An analysis of the susceptibility of OFR measurements to rheometrical artefacts is made prior to its use in the study of rapid gelling collagen gels formed over a range of physiologically relevant collagen concentrations. The results of this OFR study are the first measurements of the stress relaxation characteristics of collagen gels performed in a single rheological experiment.


Oscillations of aqueous PEDOT:PSS fluid droplets and the properties of complex fluids in drop-on-demand inkjet printing
Shear-thinning aqueous poly(3,4-ethylenedioxythiophene): poly(styrene sulphonate) (PEDOT:PSS) fluids were studied under the conditions of drop-on-demand inkjet printing. Ligament retraction caused oscillation of the resulting drops, from which values of surface tension and viscosity were derived. Effective viscosities of<4mPas at drop oscillation frequencies of 13–33kHz were consistent with conventional high-frequency rheometry, with only a small possible contribution from viscoelasticity with a relaxation time of about 6μs. Strong evidence was found that the viscosity, reduced by shear-thinning in the printhead nozzle, recovered as the drop formed. The low viscosity values measured for the drops in flight were associated with the strong oscillation induced by ligament retraction, while for a weakly perturbed drop the viscosity remained high. Surface tension values in the presence of surfactant were significantly higher than the equilibrium values, and consistent with the surface age of the drops.


A multi-agent based cooperative approach to scheduling and routing
In this paper, we propose a general agent-based distributed framework where each agent is implementing a different metaheuristic/local search combination. Moreover, an agent continuously adapts itself during the search process using a direct cooperation protocol based on reinforcement learning and pattern matching. Good patterns that make up improving solutions are identified and shared by the agents. This agent-based system aims to provide a modular flexible framework to deal with a variety of different problem domains. We have evaluated the performance of this approach using the proposed framework which embodies a set of well known metaheuristics with different configurations as agents on two problem domains, Permutation Flow-shop Scheduling and Capacitated Vehicle Routing. The results show the success of the approach yielding three new best known results of the Capacitated Vehicle Routing benchmarks tested, whilst the results for Permutation Flow-shop Scheduling are commensurate with the best known values for all the benchmarks tested.


Progressive hedging applied as a metaheuristic to schedule production in open-pit mines accounting for reserve uncertainty
Scheduling production in open-pit mines is characterized by uncertainty about the metal content of the orebody (the reserve) and leads to a complex large-scale mixed-integer stochastic optimization problem. In this paper, a two-phase solution approach based on Rockafellar and Wets’ progressive hedging algorithm (PH) is proposed. PH is used in phase I where the problem is first decomposed by partitioning the set of scenarios modeling metal uncertainty into groups, and then the sub-problems associated with each group are solved iteratively to drive their solutions to a common solution. In phase II, a strategy exploiting information obtained during the PH iterations and the structure of the problem under study is used to reduce the size of the original problem, and the resulting smaller problem is solved using a sliding time window heuristic based on a fix-and-optimize scheme. Numerical results show that this approach is efficient in finding near-optimal solutions and that it outperforms existing heuristics for the problem under study.


Transmission and generation investment in electricity markets: The effects of market splitting and network fee regimes
We propose an equilibrium model that allows to analyze the long-run impact of the electricity market design on transmission line expansion by the regulator and investment in generation capacity by private firms in liberalized electricity markets. The model incorporates investment decisions of the transmission system operator and private firms in expectation of an energy-only market and cost-based redispatch. In different specifications we consider the cases of one vs. multiple price zones (market splitting) and analyze different approaches to recover network cost—in particular lump sum, generation capacity based, and energy based fees. In order to compare the outcomes of our multilevel market model with a first best benchmark, we also solve the corresponding integrated planner problem. Using two test networks we illustrate that energy-only markets can lead to suboptimal locational decisions for generation capacity and thus imply excessive network expansion. Market splitting heals these problems only partially. These results are valid for all considered types of network tariffs, although investment slightly differs across those regimes.


The weighted additive distance function
Distance functions in production theory are mathematical structures that characterize the belonging to the reference technology through a numerical value, behave as technical efficiency measures when the focus is analyzing an observed input–output vector within its production possibility set and present a dual relationship with some support function (profit, revenue, cost function). In this paper, we endow the well-known weighted additive models in Data Envelopment Analysis with a distance function structure, introducing the Weighted Additive Distance Function and showing its main properties.


Stochastic short-term mine production schedule accounting for fleet allocation, operational considerations and blending restrictions
A new short-term mine production scheduling formulation is developed herein based on stochastic integer programming. Unlike past approaches, the formulation simultaneously optimizes fleet and mining considerations, production extraction sequence and production constraints, while accounting for uncertainty in both orebody metal quantity and quality along with fleet parameters and equipment availability, all leading to a well-informed sequence of mining that is expected to have realistic as well as high performance during a mine’s operation. To assess the latter performance and implementation intricacies of the proposed formulation, the formulation is applied at a multi-element iron mine and the resulting monthly schedules are assessed and compared to the conventional mine scheduling approach showing: lower cost, minable patterns, efficient fleet allocation ensuring higher and less variable utilization of the fleet.


Compact Markov-modulated models for multiclass trace fitting
Markov-modulated Poisson processes (MMPPs) are stochastic models for fitting empirical traces for simulation, workload characterization and queueing analysis purposes. In this paper, we develop the first counting process fitting algorithm for the marked MMPP (M3PP), a generalization of the MMPP for modeling traces with events of multiple types. We initially explain how to fit two-state M3PPs to empirical traces of counts. We then propose a novel form of composition, called interposition, which enables the approximate superposition of several two-state M3PPs without incurring into state space explosion. Compared to exact superposition, where the state space grows exponentially in the number of composed processes, in interposition the state space grows linearly in the number of composed M3PPs. Experimental results indicate that the proposed interposition methodology provides accurate results against artificial and real-world traces, with a significantly smaller state space than superposed processes.


Coarse grained force field for the molecular simulation of natural gases and condensates
The atomistically-detailed molecular modelling of petroleum fluids is challenging, amongst other aspects, due to the very diverse multicomponent and asymmetric nature of the mixtures in question. Complicating matters further, the time scales for many important processes can be much larger than the current and foreseeable capacity of modern computers running fully-atomistic models. To overcome these limitations, a coarse grained (CG) model is proposed where some of the less-important degrees of freedom are safely integrated out, leaving as key parameters the average energy levels, the molecular conformations and the range of the Mie intermolecular potentials employed as the basis of the model. The parametrization is performed by using an analytical equation of state of the statistical associating fluid theory (SAFT) family to link the potential parameters to macroscopically observed thermophysical properties. The parameters found through this top-down approach are used directly in molecular dynamics simulations of multi-component multi-phase systems. The procedure is exemplified by calculating the phase envelope of the methane–decane binary and of two synthetic light condensate mixtures. A methodology based on the discrete expansion of a mixture is used to determine the bubble points of these latter mixtures, with an excellent agreement to experimental data. The model presented is entirely predictive and an abridged table of parameters for some fluids of interest is provided.


Modelling the phase and chemical equilibria of aqueous solutions of alkanolamines and carbon dioxide using the SAFT-γ SW group contribution approach
The speciation reactions that take place in mixtures of water (H2O), carbon dioxide (CO2), and alkanolamines make the modelling of the chemical and fluid-phase equilibria of these systems challenging. We demonstrate for the first time that the statistical associating fluid theory (SAFT), formulated within a group-contribution (GC) framework based on transferable intermolecular square-well (SW) potentials (SAFT-γ SW), can be used to model successfully such complex reacting systems. The chemical reactions in these mixtures are described via a physical association model. The concept of second-order groups is introduced in the SAFT-γ SW approach in order to deal with the multifunctional nature of the alkanolamines. In developing the models, several compounds including ethylamine, propylamine, ethanol, propanol, 2-aminoethanol, and 3-amino-1-propanol are considered. We present calculations and predictions of the fluid-phase behaviour of these compounds and a number of their aqueous mixtures with and without CO2. The group-contribution nature of the models is used to predict the absorption of CO2 in aqueous solutions of 5-amino-1-pentanol and 6-amino-1-hexanol. The proposed predictive approach offers a robust platform for the identification of new solvents and mixtures that are viable candidates for CO2 absorption, thereby guiding experimental studies.


Thermal conductivity measurements of semiclathrate hydrates and aqueous solutions of tetrabutylammonium bromide (TBAB) and tetrabutylammonium chloride (TBAC) by the transient hot-wire using parylene-coated probe
The thermal conductivity of semiclathrate hydrates and aqueous solutions of tetrabutylammonium bromide (TBAB) and tetrabutylammonium chloride (TBAC) was measured for the first time in the temperature range from 223 to 303 K under atmospheric pressure. A transient hot-wire apparatus using a parylene-coated probe was employed for the measurements with an uncertainty of ±0.7%. The experimental results indicate that the thermal conductivity of two semiclathrate hydrates are smaller than those of two clathrate hydrates—about 80% of the THF hydrate and 60% of the CH4 hydrate—and are about a factor of 5.5 lower than that of ice Ih at temperatures near the melting point. In addition, the temperature coefficient of the thermal conductivity of semiclathrate hydrate show a weak negative, and the thermal conductivity is more sensitive to the molar mass of a guest molecule.


Fire risk analysis of residential buildings based on scenario clusters and its application in fire risk management
This article presents building fire risk analysis model based on scenario clusters and its application in fire risk management of buildings. Building fire risk analysis is a process of understanding and characterizing the fire hazards, the unwanted outcomes that may result from the fire, and the probabilities of fire and unwanted outcomes occurring. The purpose is to evaluate and make a decision about the level of fire risk to determine whether to take appropriate risk management measures or not. Therefore, building fire risk analysis serves as a basis for fire risk management. In the paper, scenario clusters are constructed in the process of building fire risk analysis, and the number of deaths and directive property loss are selected as building fire risk indexes. Finally, the average fire risk of residential buildings is quantified in detail. With the types of detailed fire risk models developed here, fire risk management measures could be taken to improve the building fire safety grading and reduce fire risk levels and subsequent damage.


On the effect of inverse modelling and compensation effects in computational pyrolysis for fire scenarios
Polymer pyrolysis is a key phenomenon in solid ignition, flame spread and fire growth. It is therefore an essential part in the understanding of fire behaviour. Advances in computational pyrolysis during the last decade have mainly resulted in an increase of the number of physical and chemical mechanisms implemented in the models. This stems from the implicit assumption that models with a higher level of complexity should be more accurate. However, a direct consequence of this growth in complexity is the addition of new parameters and the accumulation of modelling uncertainty born from the lack of knowledge of their values. The large number of parameters and the difficulty to quantify their values from direct measurements often oblige modellers to solve an inverse problem to perform the calibration of their models. By doing inverse modelling, the equations and the experimental data are consequently coupled to the parameter values found. This coupling and its consequences, which are most often ignored, are investigated here using different levels of model complexity for the simulation in Gpyro of transient pyrolysis of PolyMethylMethAcrylate in non-burning conditions. Among the wide range of possible model complexities, five models with a number of parameters ranging from 3 to 30 are considered. It is observed that models of different complexities (i.e. number of mechanisms and associated assumptions) can achieve similar levels of accuracy by virtue of using different parameters values. The results show the strong presence of multiple compensation effects between implemented mechanisms (e.g. chemistry or heat transfer), and that an increase of model complexity can induce a large scatter in the parameters values found. We recommend the use of larger data sets from different experimental procedures (e.g. different boundary conditions) and of different nature (e.g. in-depth temperature profile instead of only surface temperature) to break down the compensation effects found in this study.


The extended conformal Einstein field equations with matter: The Einstein–Maxwell field
A discussion is given of the conformal Einstein field equations coupled with matter whose energy–momentum tensor is trace-free. These resulting equations are expressed in terms of a generic Weyl connection. The article shows how in the presence of matter it is possible to construct a conformal gauge which allows to know a priori the location of the conformal boundary. In vacuum this gauge reduces to the so-called conformal Gaussian gauge. These ideas are applied to obtain (i) a new proof of the stability of Einstein–Maxwell de Sitter-like spacetimes; (ii) a proof of the semi-global stability of purely radiative Einstein–Maxwell spacetimes.
[1] H. Friedrich On the existence of  n -geodesically complete or future complete solutions of Einstein’s field equations with smooth asymptotic structure Comm. Math. Phys. 107 1986 587 [2] H. Friedrich On the global existence and the asymptotic behaviour of solutions to the Einstein–Maxwell–Yang–Mills equations J. Differential Geom. 34 1991 275 [3] H. Friedrich Einstein equations and conformal structure: existence of anti-de Sitter-type space–times J. Geom. Phys. 17 1995 125 [4] H. Friedrich Conformal Einstein evolution J. Frauendiener H. Friedrich The Conformal Structure of Spacetime: Geometry, Analysis, Numerics Lecture Notes in Physics 2002 Springer 1 [5] H. Friedrich Conformal geodesics on vacuum spacetimes Comm. Math. Phys. 235 2003 513 [6] H. Friedrich Gravitational fields near space-like and null infinity J. Geom. Phys. 24 1998 83 [7] C. Lübbe J.A. Valiente Kroon On de Sitter-like and Minkowski-like spacetimes Classical Quantum Gravity 26 2009 145012 [8] C. Lübbe J.A. Valiente Kroon A stability result for purely radiative spacetimes J. Hyperbolic Differ. Equ. 7 2010 545 [9] R. Penrose W. Rindler Spinors and Space–Time Two-Spinor Calculus and Relativistic Fields vol. 1 1984 Cambridge University Press [10] H. Friedrich The asymptotic characteristic initial value problem for Einstein’s vacuum field equations as an initial value problem for a first-order quasilinear symmetric hyperbolic system Proc. R. Soc. Lond. Ser. A 378 1981 401 [11] H. Friedrich On the regular and the asymptotic characteristic initial value problem for Einstein’s vacuum field equations Proc. R. Soc. Lond. Ser. A 375 1981 169 [12] H. Friedrich Cauchy problems for the conformal vacuum field equations in general relativity Comm. Math. Phys. 91 1983 445 [13] P. Sommers Space spinors J. Math. Phys. 21 1980 2567 [14] T. Kato Linear evolution equations of “hyperbolic” type J. Fac. Sci. Univ. Tokyo 17 1970 241 [15] T. Kato Linear evolution equations of “hyperbolic” type. II J. Math. Soc. Japan 25 1973 648 [16] T. Kato The Cauchy problem for quasi-linear symmetric hyperbolic systems Arch. Ration. Mech. Anal. 58 1975 181 [17] W. Simon Radiative Einstein–Maxwell spacetimes and ‘no hair’ theorems Classical Quantum Gravity 9 1992 241 [18] H. Friedrich On static and radiative space–times Comm. Math. Phys. 119 1988 51 [19] E.T. Newman R. Penrose 10 exact gravitationally-conserved quantities Phys. Rev. Lett. 15 1965 231 [20] E.T. Newman R. Penrose New conservation laws for zero rest-mass fields in asymptotically flat space–time Proc. R. Soc. Lond. Ser. A 305 1968 175 [21] A.R. Exton E.T. Newman R. Penrose Conserved quantities in the Einstein–Maxwell theory J. Math. Phys. 10 1969 1566 [22] H. Friedrich B. Schmidt Conformal geodesics in general relativity Proc. R. Soc. Lond. Ser. A 414 1987 171

Hedonic modeling to explore the relationship of cell phone plan price and quality in Croatia
Since 2009, the Croatian mobile market has been subject to various negative influences, including the economic crisis and a 6% telecommunication tax on mobile operator gross revenues. This paper took advantage of this tumultuous period to explore the effects of quality change on monthly price of cell phone plans in Croatia during 2009–2013. We used hedonic modeling to calculate hedonic price and quality indices over the period. The results indicate that cell phone plan prices slowly fell rather than rose, and that plan quality increased. The results are consistent with trends in other European countries with similar market conditions.


Migration from social casino games to gambling: Motivations and characteristics of gamers who gamble
The increasing convergence of the gambling and gaming industries has raised questions about the extent to which social casino game play may influence gambling. This study aimed to examine the relationship between social casino gaming and gambling through an online survey of 521 adults who played social casino games in the previous 12 months. Most social casino game users (71.2%) reported that these games had no impact on how much they gambled. However, 9.6% reported that their gambling overall had increased and 19.4% reported that they had gambled for money as a direct result of these games. Gambling as a direct result of social casino games was more common among males, younger users, those with higher levels of problem gambling severity and more involved social casino game users in terms of game play frequency and in-game payments. The most commonly reported reason for gambling as a result of playing social casino games was to win real money. As social casino games increased gambling for some users, this suggests that simulated gambling may influence actual gambling expenditure particularly amongst those already vulnerable to or affected by gambling problems.The increasing convergence of the gambling and gaming industries has raised questions about the extent to which social casino game play may influence gambling. This study aimed to examine the relationship between social casino gaming and gambling through an online survey of 521 adults who played social casino games in the previous 12 months. Most social casino game users (71.2%) reported that these games had no impact on how much they gambled. However, 9.6% reported that their gambling overall had increased and 19.4% reported that they had gambled for money as a direct result of these games. Gambling as a direct result of social casino games was more common among males, younger users, those with higher levels of problem gambling severity and more involved social casino game users in terms of game play frequency and in-game payments. The most commonly reported reason for gambling as a result of playing social casino games was to win real money. As social casino games increased gambling for some users, this suggests that simulated gambling may influence actual gambling expenditure particularly amongst those already vulnerable to or affected by gambling problems.


Growth of non-polar InGaN quantum dots with an underlying AlN/GaN distributed Bragg reflector by metal-organic vapour phase epitaxy
Non-polar (11–20) InGaN quantum dots (QDs) have been grown using a modified droplet epitaxy method by metal-organic vapour phase epitaxy on top of a 15-period AlN/GaN distributed Bragg reflector (DBR) on a-plane GaN pseudo-substrate prepared by epitaxial lateral overgrowth (ELOG), in which the QDs are located at the centre of a ca. 180 nm GaN layer. The AlN/GaN DBR has shown a peak reflectivity of ∼80% at a wavelength of ∼454 nm with a 49 nm wide, flat stop-band. Variations in layer thicknesses observed by cross-sectional scanning transmission electron microscopy have been identified as the main source of degradation of the DBR reflectivity. The presence of trenches due to incomplete coalescence of the ELOG template and the formation of cracks due to relaxation of tensile strain during the DBR growth may distort the DBR and further reduce the reflectivity. The DBR top surface is very smooth and does not have a detrimental effect on the subsequent growth of QDs. Enhanced single QD emission at 20 K was observed in cathodoluminescence.


On the use of deep feedforward neural networks for automatic language identification
In this work, we present a comprehensive study on the use of deep neural networks (DNNs) for automatic language identification (LID). Motivated by the recent success of using DNNs in acoustic modeling for speech recognition, we adapt DNNs to the problem of identifying the language in a given utterance from its short-term acoustic features. We propose two different DNN-based approaches. In the first one, the DNN acts as an end-to-end LID classifier, receiving as input the speech features and providing as output the estimated probabilities of the target languages. In the second approach, the DNN is used to extract bottleneck features that are then used as inputs for a state-of-the-art i-vector system. Experiments are conducted in two different scenarios: the complete NIST Language Recognition Evaluation dataset 2009 (LRE'09) and a subset of the Voice of America (VOA) data from LRE'09, in which all languages have the same amount of training data. Results for both datasets demonstrate that the DNN-based systems significantly outperform a state-of-art i-vector system when dealing with short-duration utterances. Furthermore, the combination of the DNN-based and the classical i-vector system leads to additional performance improvements (up to 45% of relative improvement in both EER and Cavg on 3s and 10s conditions, respectively).


Acoustic adaptation to dynamic background conditions with asynchronous transformations
This paper proposes a framework for performing adaptation to complex and non-stationary background conditions in Automatic Speech Recognition (ASR) by means of asynchronous Constrained Maximum Likelihood Linear Regression (aCMLLR) transforms and asynchronous Noise Adaptive Training (aNAT). The proposed method aims to apply the feature transform that best compensates the background for every input frame. The implementation is done with a new Hidden Markov Model (HMM) topology that expands the usual left-to-right HMM into parallel branches adapted to different background conditions and permits transitions among them. Using this, the proposed adaptation does not require ground truth or previous knowledge about the background in each frame as it aims to maximise the overall log-likelihood of the decoded utterance. The proposed aCMLLR transforms can be further improved by retraining models in an aNAT fashion and by using speaker-based MLLR transforms in cascade for an efficient modelling of background effects and speaker. An initial evaluation in a modified version of the WSJCAM0 corpus incorporating 7 different background conditions provides a benchmark in which to evaluate the use of aCMLLR transforms. A relative reduction of 40.5% in Word Error Rate (WER) was achieved by the combined use of aCMLLR and MLLR in cascade. Finally, this selection of techniques was applied in the transcription of multi-genre media broadcasts, where the use of aNAT training, aCMLLR transforms and MLLR transforms provided a relative improvement of 2–3%.


Multivariate empirical mode decomposition and its application to fault diagnosis of rolling bearing
Rolling bearings are widely used in rotary machinery systems. The measured vibration signal of any part linked to rolling bearings contains fault information when failure occurs, differing only by energy levels. Bearing failure will cause the vibration of other components, and therefore the collected bearing vibration signals are mixed with vibration signal of other parts and noise. Using multiple sensors to collect signals at different locations on the machine to obtain multivariate signal can avoid the loss of local information. Subsequently using the multivariate empirical mode decomposition (multivariate EMD) to simultaneously analyze the multivariate signal is beneficial to extract fault information, especially for weak fault characteristics during the period of early failure. This paper proposes a novel method for fault feature extraction of rolling bearing based on multivariate EMD. The nonlocal means (NL-means) denoising method is used to preprocess the multivariate signal and the correlation analysis is employed to calculate fault correlation factors to select effective intrinsic mode functions (IMFs). Finally characteristic frequencies are extracted from the selected IMFs by spectrum analysis. The numerical simulations and applications to bearing monitoring verify the effectiveness of the proposed method and indicate that this novel method is promising in the field of signal decomposition and fault diagnosis.Rolling bearings are widely used in rotary machinery systems. The measured vibration signal of any part linked to rolling bearings contains fault information when failure occurs, differing only by energy levels. Bearing failure will cause the vibration of other components, and therefore the collected bearing vibration signals are mixed with vibration signal of other parts and noise. Using multiple sensors to collect signals at different locations on the machine to obtain multivariate signal can avoid the loss of local information. Subsequently using the multivariate empirical mode decomposition (multivariate EMD) to simultaneously analyze the multivariate signal is beneficial to extract fault information, especially for weak fault characteristics during the period of early failure. This paper proposes a novel method for fault feature extraction of rolling bearing based on multivariate EMD. The nonlocal means (NL-means) denoising method is used to preprocess the multivariate signal and the correlation analysis is employed to calculate fault correlation factors to select effective intrinsic mode functions (IMFs). Finally characteristic frequencies are extracted from the selected IMFs by spectrum analysis. The numerical simulations and applications to bearing monitoring verify the effectiveness of the proposed method and indicate that this novel method is promising in the field of signal decomposition and fault diagnosis.


Volterra series truncation and kernel estimation of nonlinear systems in the frequency domain
The Volterra series model is a direct generalisation of the linear convolution integral and is capable of displaying the intrinsic features of a nonlinear system in a simple and easy to apply way. Nonlinear system analysis using Volterra series is normally based on the analysis of its frequency-domain kernels and a truncated description. But the estimation of Volterra kernels and the truncation of Volterra series are coupled with each other. In this paper, a novel complex-valued orthogonal least squares algorithm is developed. The new algorithm provides a powerful tool to determine which terms should be included in the Volterra series expansion and to estimate the kernels and thus solves the two problems all together. The estimated results are compared with those determined using the analytical expressions of the kernels to validate the method. To further evaluate the effectiveness of the method, the physical parameters of the system are also extracted from the measured kernels. Simulation studies demonstrates that the new approach not only can truncate the Volterra series expansion and estimate the kernels of a weakly nonlinear system, but also can indicate the applicability of the Volterra series analysis in a severely nonlinear system case.The Volterra series model is a direct generalisation of the linear convolution integral and is capable of displaying the intrinsic features of a nonlinear system in a simple and easy to apply way. Nonlinear system analysis using Volterra series is normally based on the analysis of its frequency-domain kernels and a truncated description. But the estimation of Volterra kernels and the truncation of Volterra series are coupled with each other. In this paper, a novel complex-valued orthogonal least squares algorithm is developed. The new algorithm provides a powerful tool to determine which terms should be included in the Volterra series expansion and to estimate the kernels and thus solves the two problems all together. The estimated results are compared with those determined using the analytical expressions of the kernels to validate the method. To further evaluate the effectiveness of the method, the physical parameters of the system are also extracted from the measured kernels. Simulation studies demonstrates that the new approach not only can truncate the Volterra series expansion and estimate the kernels of a weakly nonlinear system, but also can indicate the applicability of the Volterra series analysis in a severely nonlinear system case.


Bayesian selection of graphical regulatory models
We define a new class of coloured graphical models, called regulatory graphs. These graphs have their own distinctive formal semantics and can directly represent typical qualitative hypotheses about regulatory processes like those described by various biological mechanisms. They admit an embellishment into classes of probabilistic statistical models and so standard Bayesian methods of model selection can be used to choose promising candidate explanations of regulation. Regulation is modelled by the existence of a deterministic relationship between the longitudinal series of observations labelled by the receiving vertex and the donating one. This class contains longitudinal cluster models as a degenerate graph. Edge colours directly distinguish important features of the mechanism like inhibition and excitation and graphs are often cyclic. With appropriate distributional assumptions, because the regulatory relationships map onto each other through a group structure, it is possible to define a conditional conjugate analysis. This means that even when the model space is huge it is nevertheless feasible, using a Bayesian MAP search, to a discover regulatory network with a high Bayes Factor score. We also show that, like the class of Bayesian Networks, regulatory graphs also admit a formal but distinctive causal algebra. The topology of the graph then represents collections of hypotheses about the predicted effect of controlling the process by tearing out message passers or forcing them to transmit certain signals. We illustrate our methods on a microarray experiment measuring the expression of thousands of genes as a longitudinal series where the scientific interest lies in the circadian regulation of these plants.


Probabilistic abductive logic programming using Dirichlet priors
Probabilistic programming is an area of research that aims to develop general inference algorithms for probabilistic models expressed as probabilistic programs whose execution corresponds to inferring the parameters of those models. In this paper, we introduce a probabilistic programming language (PPL) based on abductive logic programming for performing inference in probabilistic models involving categorical distributions with Dirichlet priors. We encode these models as abductive logic programs enriched with probabilistic definitions and queries, and show how to execute and compile them to boolean formulas. Using the latter, we perform generalized inference using one of two proposed Markov Chain Monte Carlo (MCMC) sampling algorithms: an adaptation of uncollapsed Gibbs sampling from related work and a novel collapsed Gibbs sampling (CGS). We show that CGS converges faster than the uncollapsed version on a latent Dirichlet allocation (LDA) task using synthetic data. On similar data, we compare our PPL with LDA-specific algorithms and other PPLs. We find that all methods, except one, perform similarly and that the more expressive the PPL, the slower it is. We illustrate applications of our PPL on real data in two variants of LDA models (Seed and Cluster LDA), and in the repeated insertion model (RIM). In the latter, our PPL yields similar conclusions to inference with EM for Mallows models.Probabilistic programming is an area of research that aims to develop general inference algorithms for probabilistic models expressed as probabilistic programs whose execution corresponds to inferring the parameters of those models. In this paper, we introduce a probabilistic programming language (PPL) based on abductive logic programming for performing inference in probabilistic models involving categorical distributions with Dirichlet priors. We encode these models as abductive logic programs enriched with probabilistic definitions and queries, and show how to execute and compile them to boolean formulas. Using the latter, we perform generalized inference using one of two proposed Markov Chain Monte Carlo (MCMC) sampling algorithms: an adaptation of uncollapsed Gibbs sampling from related work and a novel collapsed Gibbs sampling (CGS). We show that CGS converges faster than the uncollapsed version on a latent Dirichlet allocation (LDA) task using synthetic data. On similar data, we compare our PPL with LDA-specific algorithms and other PPLs. We find that all methods, except one, perform similarly and that the more expressive the PPL, the slower it is. We illustrate applications of our PPL on real data in two variants of LDA models (Seed and Cluster LDA), and in the repeated insertion model (RIM). In the latter, our PPL yields similar conclusions to inference with EM for Mallows models.


Surface reconstruction for planning and navigation of liver resections
Computer-assisted systems for planning and navigation of liver resection procedures rely on the use of patient-specific 3D geometric models obtained from computed tomography. In this work, we propose the application of Poisson surface reconstruction (PSR) to obtain 3D models of the liver surface with applications to planning and navigation of liver surgery. In order to apply PSR, the introduction of an efficient transformation of the segmentation data, based on computation of gradient fields, is proposed. One of the advantages of PSR is that it requires only one control parameter, allowing the process to be fully automatic once the optimal value is estimated. Validation of our results is performed via comparison with 3D models obtained by state-of-art Marching Cubes incorporating Laplacian smoothing and decimation (MCSD). Our results show that PSR provides smooth liver models with better accuracy/complexity trade-off than those obtained by MCSD. After estimating the optimal parameter, automatic reconstruction of liver surfaces using PSR is achieved keeping similar processing time as MCSD. Models from this automatic approach show an average reduction of 79.59% of the polygons compared to the MCSD models presenting similar smoothness properties. Concerning visual quality, on one hand, and despite this reduction in polygons, clinicians perceive the quality of automatic PSR models to be the same as complex MCSD models. On the other hand, clinicians perceive a significant improvement on visual quality for automatic PSR models compared to optimal (obtained in terms of accuracy/complexity) MCSD models. The median reconstruction error using automatic PSR was as low as 1.03±0.23mm, which makes the method suitable for clinical applications. Automatic PSR is currently employed at Oslo University Hospital to obtain patient-specific liver models in selected patients undergoing laparoscopic liver resection.


Thermo-mechanical fatigue testing and simulation using a viscoplasticity model for a P91 steel
An experimental programme of cyclic thermo-mechanical testing for a P91 power plant steel, under isothermal, and in-phase and out-of-phase thermo-mechanical, temperature-strain cycle conditions, has been implemented. Using the experimental data, an optimisation procedure has been developed for the accurate determination of the material constants under isothermal conditions, in which the Chaboche model is employed to describe material responses. The material was found to exhibit cyclic softening throughout the full life cycles, which is believed to be related to the evolution of microstructure and the propagation of micro-cracks. The model developed shows good predictive capability of cyclic stress–strain behaviour and cyclic softening.


Modeling diffusion-governed solidification of ternary alloys – Part 1: Coupling solidification kinetics with thermodynamics
A method incorporating the full diffusion-governed solidification kinetics and the ternary phase diagram into a multiphase volume average solidification model is presented. The motivation to develop such a model is to predict macrosegregation in castings. A key feature of this model, different from most previous ones which usually assume an infinite solute mixing in liquid (e.g. lever rule, Gulliver–Scheil), is that diffusions in both liquid and solid phases are considered. It is known that models with assumption of an infinite liquid mixing lead to erroneous estimation of the solidification path at the initial stage. Here solidification of a ternary alloy (Fe–0.45wt.%C–1.06wt.%Mn) is examined. As the two chosen alloy elements (C and Mn) have large differences in the solute partition coefficient, liquidus slope and liquid diffusion coefficient, the solidification path shows differently from those predicted by infinite liquid mixing models. The first part of this two-part investigation evaluates the full diffusion-governed kinetics and its influence on solidification path and microsegregation. Applications of the model for the calculation of solidification and macrosegregation are presented in the accompanying paper [Part 2].


Atomistic investigation on the structure–property relationship during thermal spray nanoparticle impact
During thermal spraying, hot particles impact on a colder substrate. This interaction of crystalline copper nanoparticles and copper substrate is modeled, using MD simulation. The quantitative results of the impacts at different velocities and temperatures are evaluated using a newly defined flattening aspect ratio. This ratio between the maximum diameter after the impact and the height of the splat increases with increasing Reynolds numbers until a critical value is reached. At higher Reynolds numbers the flattening aspect ratio decreases again, as the kinetic energy of the particle leads to increasing substrate temperature and, therefore, decreases the substrate resistance. Thus, the particle penetrates into the substrate and deforms less.


Co-continuous polymer systems: A numerical investigation
A finite volume based implementation of the binary Cahn–Hilliard equation was implemented using an open source library, OpenFOAM. This was used to investigate the development of droplet and co-continuous binary polymer microstructures. It was shown that the initial concentrations of each phase define the final form of the resultant microstructure, either droplet, transition or co-continuous. Furthermore, the mechanical deformation response of the representative microstructures were investigated under both uniaxial and triaxial loading conditions. The elastic response of these microstructures were then compared to a classic representative microstructure based on a face centred cubic arrangement of spheres with similar volume fractions of each phase. It was found that the numerically predicted composite Young’s modulus closely followed the upper Hashin–Shtrikman bound for both co-continuous and classical structures, while significant deviations from analytical composite theory were noted for the calculated values of Poisson’s ratio. The yield behaviour of the composite microstructures was also found to vary between the co-continuous microstructures and the representative microstructure, with a more gradual onset of plastic deformation noted for the co-continuous structures. The modelling approach presented allows for the future investigation of binary composite systems with tuneable material properties.


Sliding window-based support vector regression for predicting micrometeorological data
Sensor network technology is becoming more widespread and sophisticated, and devices with many sensors, such as smartphones and sensor nodes, have been used extensively. Since these devices have more easily accumulated various kinds of micrometeorological data, such as temperature, humidity, and wind speed, an enormous amount of micrometeorological data has been accumulated. In recent years, it has been expected that such an enormous amount of data, called big data, will produce novel knowledge and value. Accordingly, many current applications have used data mining technology or machine learning to exploit big data. However, micrometeorological data has a complicated correlation among different features, and its characteristics change variously with time. Therefore, it is difficult to predict micrometeorological data accurately with low computational complexity even if state-of-the-art machine learning algorithms are used. In this paper, we propose a new methodology for predicting micrometeorological data, sliding window-based support vector regression (SW-SVR) that involves a novel combination of support vector regression (SVR) and ensemble learning. To represent complicated micrometeorological data easily, SW-SVR builds several SVRs specialized for each representative data group in various natural environments, such as different seasons and climates, and changes weights to aggregate the SVRs dynamically depending on the characteristics of test data. In our experiment, we predicted the temperature after 1h and 6 h by using large-scale micrometeorological data in Tokyo. As a result, regardless of testing periods, training periods, and prediction horizons, the prediction performance of SW-SVR was always greater than or equal to other general methods such as SVR, random forest, and gradient boosting. At the same time, SW-SVR reduced the building time remarkably compared with those of complicated models that have high prediction performance.


Combined influence of forearm orientation and muscular contraction on EMG pattern recognition
The performance of intelligent electromyogram (EMG)-driven prostheses, functioning as artificial alternatives to missing limbs, is influenced by several dynamic factors including: electrode position shift, varying muscle contraction level, forearm orientation, and limb position. The impact of these factors on EMG pattern recognition has been previously studied in isolation, with the combined effect of these factors being understudied. However, it is likely that a combination of these factors influences the accuracy. We investigated the combined effect of two dynamic factors, namely, forearm orientation and muscle contraction levels, on the generalizability of the EMG pattern recognition. A number of recent time- and frequency-domain EMG features were utilized to study the EMG classification accuracy. Twelve intact-limbed and one bilateral transradial (below-elbow) amputee subject were recruited. They performed six classes of wrist and hand movements at three muscular contraction levels with three forearm orientations (nine conditions). Results indicate that a classifier trained by features that quantify the angle, rather than amplitude, of the muscle activation patterns perform better than other feature sets across different contraction levels and forearm orientations. In addition, a classifier trained with the EMG signals collected at multiple forearm orientations with medium muscular contractions can generalize well and achieve classification accuracies of up to 91%. Furthermore, inclusion of an accelerometer to monitor wrist movement further improved the EMG classification accuracy. The results indicate that the proposed methodology has the potential to improve robustness of myoelectric pattern recognition.


Combination of multiple diagnosis systems in Self-Healing networks
The Self-Organizing Networks (SON) paradigm proposes a set of functions to automate network management in mobile communication networks. Within SON, the purpose of Self-Healing is to detect cells with service degradation, diagnose the fault cause that affects them, rapidly compensate the problem with the support of neighboring cells and repair the network by performing some recovery actions.The diagnosis phase can be designed as a classifier. In this context, hybrid ensembles of classifiers enhance the diagnosis performance of expert systems of different kinds by combining their outputs. In this paper, a novel scheme of hybrid ensemble of classifiers is proposed as a two-step procedure: a modeling stage of the baseline classifiers and an application stage, when the combination of partial diagnoses is actually performed. The use of statistical models of the baseline classifiers allows an immediate ensemble diagnosis without running and querying them individually, thus resulting in a very low computational cost in the execution stage.Results show that the performance of the proposed method compared to its standalone components is significantly better in terms of diagnosis error rate, using both simulated data and cases from a live LTE network. Furthermore, this method relies on concepts which are not linked to a particular mobile communication technology, allowing it to be applied either on well established cellular networks, like UMTS, or on recent and forthcoming technologies, like LTE-A and 5G.


Quantification of the phase fraction in steel using an electromagnetic sensor
The effect of ferrite fraction, in 0.17–0.8wt% C steels with ferrite–pearlite microstructures, on multi-frequency electromagnetic (EM) sensor readings has been studied. The measured initial relative permeability values agreed well with finite element microstructure model predictions. The EM sensor low frequency inductance value is sensitive to changes in relative permeability and the sensor can measure ferrite fraction in dual-phase steels. Therefore, EM sensors could be used to assess dual-phase (ferrite+pearlite/bainite/martensite) steel microstructures in a non-contact, non-destructive manner.


Convective and absolute instabilities in the boundary layer over rotating spheres with surface mass flux and incident axial flow
We consider the effect of surface mass flux and forced axial flow on the boundary-layer flows over rotating spheres, with a view to establishing flow-control mechanisms for rotating flows of engineering significance. A theoretical study is presented which considers the onset of convective instability modes (both stationary and travelling relative to the rotating surface) and local absolute instability. Suction is found to be universally stabilising in terms of the delayed onset of both instability types. Extensive theoretical data are presented for future comparison to experiments.


Short links and tiny keyboards: A systematic exploration of design trade-offs in link shortening services
Link-shortening services save space and make the manual entry of URLs less onerous. Short links are often included on printed materials so that people using mobile devices can quickly enter URLs. Although mobile transcription is a common use-case, link-shortening services generate output that is poorly suited to entry on mobile devices: links often contain numbers and capital letters that require time consuming mode switches on touch screen keyboards. With the aid of computational modeling, we identified problems with the output of a link-shortening service, bit.ly. Based on the results of this modeling, we hypothesized that longer links that are optimized for input on mobile keyboards would improve link entry speeds compared to shorter links that required keyboard mode switches. We conducted a human performance study that confirmed this hypothesis. Finally, we applied our method to a selection of different non-word mobile data-entry tasks. This work illustrates the need for service design to fit the constraints of the devices people use to consume services.Link-shortening services save space and make the manual entry of URLs less onerous. Short links are often included on printed materials so that people using mobile devices can quickly enter URLs. Although mobile transcription is a common use-case, link-shortening services generate output that is poorly suited to entry on mobile devices: links often contain numbers and capital letters that require time consuming mode switches on touch screen keyboards. With the aid of computational modeling, we identified problems with the output of a link-shortening service, bit.ly. Based on the results of this modeling, we hypothesized that longer links that are optimized for input on mobile keyboards would improve link entry speeds compared to shorter links that required keyboard mode switches. We conducted a human performance study that confirmed this hypothesis. Finally, we applied our method to a selection of different non-word mobile data-entry tasks. This work illustrates the need for service design to fit the constraints of the devices people use to consume services.


Vascular image registration techniques: A living review
Registration of vascular structures is crucial for preoperative planning, intraoperative navigation, and follow-up assessment. Typical applications include, but are not limited to, Trans-catheter Aortic Valve Implantation and monitoring of tumor vasculature or aneurysm growth. In order to achieve the aforementioned goals, a large number of various registration algorithms has been developed. With this review paper we provide a comprehensive overview over the plethora of existing techniques with a particular focus on the suitable classification criteria such as the involved modalities of the employed optimization methods. However, we wish to go beyond a static literature review which is naturally doomed to be outdated after a certain period of time due to the research progress. We augment this review paper with an extendable and interactive database in order to obtain a living review whose currency goes beyond the one of a printed paper. All papers in this database are labeled with one or multiple tags according to 13 carefully defined categories. The classification of all entries can then be visualized as one or multiple trees which are presented via a web-based interactive app (http://livingreview.in.tum.de) allowing the user to choose a unique perspective for literature review. In addition, the user can search the underlying database for specific tags or publications related to vessel registration. Many applications of this framework are conceivable, including the use for getting a general overview on the topic or the utilization by physicians for deciding about the best-suited algorithm for a specific application.


Autoadaptive motion modelling for MR-based respiratory motion estimation
Respiratory motion poses significant challenges in image-guided interventions. In emerging treatments such as MR-guided HIFU or MR-guided radiotherapy, it may cause significant misalignments between interventional road maps obtained pre-procedure and the anatomy during the treatment, and may affect intra-procedural imaging such as MR-thermometry. Patient specific respiratory motion models provide a solution to this problem. They establish a correspondence between the patient motion and simpler surrogate data which can be acquired easily during the treatment. Patient motion can then be estimated during the treatment by acquiring only the simpler surrogate data.In the majority of classical motion modelling approaches once the correspondence between the surrogate data and the patient motion is established it cannot be changed unless the model is recalibrated. However, breathing patterns are known to significantly change in the time frame of MR-guided interventions. Thus, the classical motion modelling approach may yield inaccurate motion estimations when the relation between the motion and the surrogate data changes over the duration of the treatment and frequent recalibration may not be feasible.We propose a novel methodology for motion modelling which has the ability to automatically adapt to new breathing patterns. This is achieved by choosing the surrogate data in such a way that it can be used to estimate the current motion in 3D as well as to update the motion model. In particular, in this work, we use 2D MR slices from different slice positions to build as well as to apply the motion model. We implemented such an autoadaptive motion model by extending our previous work on manifold alignment.We demonstrate a proof-of-principle of the proposed technique on cardiac gated data of the thorax and evaluate its adaptive behaviour on realistic synthetic data containing two breathing types generated from 6 volunteers, and real data from 4 volunteers. On synthetic data the autoadaptive motion model yielded 21.45% more accurate motion estimations compared to a non-adaptive motion model 10 min after a change in breathing pattern. On real data we demonstrated the method’s ability to maintain motion estimation accuracy despite a drift in the respiratory baseline. Due to the cardiac gating of the imaging data, the method is currently limited to one update per heart beat and the calibration requires approximately 12 min of scanning. Furthermore, the method has a prediction latency of 800 ms. These limitations may be overcome in future work by altering the acquisition protocol.


A web-based, interactive visualization tool for social environmental survey data
Understanding human motivations and actions related to environmental problems is central to modeling complex, human-natural systems. However, social science survey data on environmental issues are often presented in relatively static reports and figures and are not easily accessible for participatory deliberation. Federal data sharing mandates motivate innovative data visualization and sharing mechanisms. We developed an open-source, web-based Survey Data Viewer as a visual interface to explore quantitative social science survey data. We used the Python Django web framework and the D3.js visualization library to create and deploy the tool. The Viewer was implemented using a water-related survey administered to a large, random sample of Utah adults in public venues. The Viewer allows users to visualize question responses based on demographic variables with percentages and mean response levels. We developed a standardized template for encoding survey data and metadata that permits the generalization of the tool to other similar surveys.Understanding human motivations and actions related to environmental problems is central to modeling complex, human-natural systems. However, social science survey data on environmental issues are often presented in relatively static reports and figures and are not easily accessible for participatory deliberation. Federal data sharing mandates motivate innovative data visualization and sharing mechanisms. We developed an open-source, web-based Survey Data Viewer as a visual interface to explore quantitative social science survey data. We used the Python Django web framework and the D3.js visualization library to create and deploy the tool. The Viewer was implemented using a water-related survey administered to a large, random sample of Utah adults in public venues. The Viewer allows users to visualize question responses based on demographic variables with percentages and mean response levels. We developed a standardized template for encoding survey data and metadata that permits the generalization of the tool to other similar surveys.


H2 regularity properties of singular parameterizations in isogeometric analysis
Isogeometric analysis (IGA) is a numerical simulation method which is directly based on the NURBS-based representation of CAD models. It exploits the tensor-product structure of 2- or 3-dimensional NURBS objects to parameterize the physical domain. Hence the physical domain is parameterized with respect to a rectangle or to a cube. Consequently, singularly parameterized NURBS surfaces and NURBS volumes are needed in order to represent non-quadrangular or non-hexahedral domains without splitting, thereby producing a very compact and convenient representation.The Galerkin projection introduces finite-dimensional spaces of test functions in the weak formulation of partial differential equations. In particular, the test functions used in isogeometric analysis are obtained by composing the inverse of the domain parameterization with the NURBS basis functions. In the case of singular parameterizations, however, some of the resulting test functions do not necessarily fulfill the required regularity properties. Consequently, numerical methods for the solution of partial differential equations cannot be applied properly.We discuss the regularity properties of the test functions. For one- and two-dimensional domains we consider several important classes of singularities of NURBS parameterizations. For specific cases we derive additional conditions which guarantee the regularity of the test functions. In addition we present a modification scheme for the discretized function space in case of insufficient regularity. It is also shown how these results can be applied for computational domains in higher dimensions that can be parameterized via sweeping.


The basic principles of uncertain information fusion. An organised review of merging rules in different representation frameworks
We propose and advocate basic principles for the fusion of incomplete or uncertain information items, that should apply regardless of the formalism adopted for representing pieces of information coming from several sources. This formalism can be based on sets, logic, partial orders, possibility theory, belief functions or imprecise probabilities. We propose a general notion of information item representing incomplete or uncertain information about the values of an entity of interest. It is supposed to rank such values in terms of relative plausibility, and explicitly point out impossible values. Basic issues affecting the results of the fusion process, such as relative information content and consistency of information items, as well as their mutual consistency, are discussed. For each representation setting, we present fusion rules that obey our principles, and compare them to postulates specific to the representation proposed in the past. In the crudest (Boolean) representation setting (using a set of possible values), we show that the understanding of the set in terms of most plausible values, or in terms of non-impossible ones matters for choosing a relevant fusion rule. Especially, in the latter case our principles justify the method of maximal consistent subsets, while the former is related to the fusion of logical bases. Then we consider several formal settings for incomplete or uncertain information items, where our postulates are instantiated: plausibility orderings, qualitative and quantitative possibility distributions, belief functions and convex sets of probabilities. The aim of this paper is to provide a unified picture of fusion rules across various uncertainty representation settings.


Spatial anomaly detection in sensor networks using neighborhood information
The field of wireless sensor networks (WSNs), embedded systems with sensing and networking capability, has now matured after a decade-long research effort and technological advances in electronics and networked systems. An important remaining challenge now is to extract meaningful information from the ever-increasing amount of sensor data collected by WSNs. In particular, there is strong interest in algorithms capable of automatic detection of patterns, events or other out-of-the order, anomalous system behavior. Data anomalies may indicate states of the system that require further analysis or prompt actions. Traditionally, anomaly detection techniques are executed in a central processing facility, which requires the collection of all measurement data at a central location, an obvious limitation for WSNs due to the high data communication costs involved. In this paper we explore the extent by which one may depart from this classical centralized paradigm, looking at decentralized anomaly detection based on unsupervised machine learning. Our aim is to detect anomalies at the sensor nodes, as opposed to centrally, to reduce energy and spectrum consumption. We study the information gain coming from aggregate neighborhood data, in comparison to performing simple, in-node anomaly detection. We evaluate the effects of neighborhood size and spatio-temporal correlation on the performance of our new neighborhood-based approach using a range of real-world network deployments and datasets. We find the conditions that make neighborhood data fusion advantageous, identifying also the cases in which this approach does not lead to detectable improvements. Improvements are linked to the diffusive properties of data (spatio-temporal correlations) but also to the type of sensors, anomalies and network topological features. Overall, when a dataset stems from a similar mixture of diffusive processes precision tends to benefit, particularly in terms of recall. Our work paves the way towards understanding how distributed data fusion methods may help managing the complexity of wireless sensor networks, for instance in massive Internet of Things scenarios.


Robust Ad-hoc Sensor Routing (RASeR) protocol for mobile wireless sensor networks
Robust Ad-hoc Sensor Routing (RASeR) is a novel protocol for data routing in mobile wireless sensor networks (MWSNs). It is designed to cope with the demanding requirements of emerging technologies, which require the reliable and low-latency delivery of packets in highly mobile conditions. RASeR uses blind forwarding, which is facilitated by a novel method of gradient maintenance. The problem of maintaining a gradient field in a changing topology, without flooding, is solved by using a global time division multiple access MAC. Furthermore, it is enhanced with the additional options of a supersede mode, to aid time-critical applications, reverse flooding, to allow sink-to-sensor commands and energy saving sleep cycles to reduce power consumption. Analytical expressions are derived and verified by simulation. RASeR is compared with the state-of-the-art MWSN routing protocols, PHASeR and MACRO, as well as the MANET protocols, AODV and OLSR. The results indicate that RASeR is a high performance protocol, which shows improvements over PHASeR, MACRO, AODV and OLSR. Tested over varying levels of mobility, scalability and traffic, the simulations yield near perfect PDR in many scenarios, as well as a low end-to-end delay, high throughput, low overhead and low energy consumption. The robustness of this protocol and its consistent reliability, low latency and additional features, makes it highly suitable to a wide number of applications. It is specifically applicable to highly mobile situations with a fixed number of nodes and small payloads.Robust Ad-hoc Sensor Routing (RASeR) is a novel protocol for data routing in mobile wireless sensor networks (MWSNs). It is designed to cope with the demanding requirements of emerging technologies, which require the reliable and low-latency delivery of packets in highly mobile conditions. RASeR uses blind forwarding, which is facilitated by a novel method of gradient maintenance. The problem of maintaining a gradient field in a changing topology, without flooding, is solved by using a global time division multiple access MAC. Furthermore, it is enhanced with the additional options of a supersede mode, to aid time-critical applications, reverse flooding, to allow sink-to-sensor commands and energy saving sleep cycles to reduce power consumption. Analytical expressions are derived and verified by simulation. RASeR is compared with the state-of-the-art MWSN routing protocols, PHASeR and MACRO, as well as the MANET protocols, AODV and OLSR. The results indicate that RASeR is a high performance protocol, which shows improvements over PHASeR, MACRO, AODV and OLSR. Tested over varying levels of mobility, scalability and traffic, the simulations yield near perfect PDR in many scenarios, as well as a low end-to-end delay, high throughput, low overhead and low energy consumption. The robustness of this protocol and its consistent reliability, low latency and additional features, makes it highly suitable to a wide number of applications. It is specifically applicable to highly mobile situations with a fixed number of nodes and small payloads.


Mood Glove: A haptic wearable prototype system to enhance mood music in film
This is an exploratory work aimed at enhancing mood music in film entertainment. We present the design and implementation of a haptic wearable prototype system which aims to amplify mood music in film through haptic sensations (vibrotactile feedback). This approach also could potentially have implications for hearing-impaired audiences, providing a new enriched emotional experience while watching a movie. This paper reports on a set of three studies conducted to assess whether vibrotactile stimuli are able to enhance moods. Preliminary findings show that vibrotacile stimuli at low intensity and low frequency induce a sense of calmness in users, whereas vibrotactile stimuli at low intensity but higher frequency increased excitement. The combination of high intensity and high frequency vibrotactile stimuli heightened tension on the other hand. These findings support our position that vibrotactile feedback could be used to enrich the emotional aspects of cinematic experience through haptic sensations.


The Research of Automated Select Test Cases for Aspect-oriented Software
Aspect-oriented Programming (AOP) can well solve the cross-cutting concerns. Because of the different features of aspect, AOP requires new techniques for testing. First, this paper proposes a model to test aspect-oriented software. In order to support the testing model of the first three steps, we propose the algorithm of selecting aspect relevant test cases. Then, we develop a new tool to implement the theoretical of automating select test case. Finally, a case of the Bank Account System is studied to illustrate our testing approach.Aspect-oriented Programming (AOP) can well solve the cross-cutting concerns. Because of the different features of aspect, AOP requires new techniques for testing. First, this paper proposes a model to test aspect-oriented software. In order to support the testing model of the first three steps, we propose the algorithm of selecting aspect relevant test cases. Then, we develop a new tool to implement the theoretical of automating select test case. Finally, a case of the Bank Account System is studied to illustrate our testing approach.
[1] G. Kiczales Aspect-Oriented Programming. in Proceedings of 11th European Conference on Object-Oriented Programming 1997 220 242 [2] Laddad, R., Aspectj in Action: Practical Aspect-Oriented Programming 2003: Manning Publications Co. [3] M. Rinard,A. Salcianu,and S. Bugrara. A classification system and analysis for aspect-oriented programs. InProc.12thInternational Symposium on the Foundations of Software Engineering, pages 147-158, 2004. [4] Lionel C. Briand, Jie Feng, Yvan Labiche. Using genetic algorithms and coupling measures to devise optimal integration test orders. Proceeding SEKE’02 Proceedings of the 14th international conference on Software engineering and knowledge engineering. [5] Eclipse, http://www.eclipse.org. [6] Barat, http://sourceforge.net/projects/barat. [7] Junit, http://www.junit.org.

Modification in the Design of Varnish Plant at Crocodile Matchet Limited, Tema, Ghana
In this paper, the design of a varnish plant at Crocodile Matchet Limited, Tema, Ghana was considered and modification made to eliminate blooming and rusting of its product at the final processing plant when there is high moisture content in the atmosphere. The proposed design included pipelines or ductsand hot air receiving chambers for the Varnish Plant.Heat from the exhaust gas which would have otherwise, gone wasted, was utilised by redesigning the varnish plant and this yielded 6.74kW of heat energy which was transferred into the air chambers to aid the drying ofmatchets at the hardening plant. Consequently, the absorption of the moisture on the steel and the dryness of the product were improved. Further studies were done to ensure constant supply of hot air into the air chambers.In this paper, the design of a varnish plant at Crocodile Matchet Limited, Tema, Ghana was considered and modification made to eliminate blooming and rusting of its product at the final processing plant when there is high moisture content in the atmosphere. The proposed design included pipelines or ductsand hot air receiving chambers for the Varnish Plant.Heat from the exhaust gas which would have otherwise, gone wasted, was utilised by redesigning the varnish plant and this yielded 6.74kW of heat energy which was transferred into the air chambers to aid the drying ofmatchets at the hardening plant. Consequently, the absorption of the moisture on the steel and the dryness of the product were improved. Further studies were done to ensure constant supply of hot air into the air chambers.
[1] Simons A, Nunoo S. Assessment of heat transfer effectiveness-Application to shell bitumen plant, Takoradi, Ghana. Proceedings of ASME Summer Heat Transfer Conference. New York: ASME; 2008. [2] Cengel YA, Turner RH. Fundamentals of thermal-fluid sciences. New York: McGraw-Hill Higher Education; 2001. [3] Sharma PC, Aggarwal DK. Machine design. India: Sanjeev Kumar Kataria; 2003. [4] Frank PI, DewittDP. Fundamentals of heat and mass transfer. New York: John Wiley and Sons; 2005.

Development and Characteristic of Digital Library as a Library Branch
Digital libraries promise new societal benefits, especially for e-learning in digital or mobile times, starting with the elimination of the time and space constraints of traditional bricks-and-mortar libraries. The library and information professionals are required to acquire such knowledge and skills as the library is one of the highly IT influenced service profession. This paper gives an overview of current trends in digital library research consists of digital library characteristic, advantage, disadvantages and function. This paper also highlights on the impact of information technology on the traditional libraryDigital libraries promise new societal benefits, especially for e-learning in digital or mobile times, starting with the elimination of the time and space constraints of traditional bricks-and-mortar libraries. The library and information professionals are required to acquire such knowledge and skills as the library is one of the highly IT influenced service profession. This paper gives an overview of current trends in digital library research consists of digital library characteristic, advantage, disadvantages and function. This paper also highlights on the impact of information technology on the traditional library
[1] Shen X-X, Zheng Z. and Han S-G. A review of the major projects constituting the China Academic Digital Library. The Electronic Library 2008; 26 (1): 39-54. [2] Whitten, Ian H., David Bainbridge, and Stefan J. Boddie. Greenstone: Open-Source digital library Software. D-Lib Magazine; 2001; 7.(10). [3] David Lee King Building the Digital Branch: Guidelines for Transforming Your Library Website. Library Technology Reports; 2009; 45(6): 5-9. [4] Kavita Ajay Jadhav. Digital library: today's need- a review. International Multidisciplinary Research Journal, 2011; 1(11):17-19. [5] Sangsuree Vasupongayya, Kittisak Keawneam, Kittipong Sengloilaun, Patt Emmawat, Open Source Library Management System Software: A Review. World Academy of Science, Engineering and Technology, 2011, 77: 973-978. [6] Hanadashisha Warr, P. Hangsing, Open source digital library software: a literature review. Proceedings of the National Seminar on “Preservation and Conservation of Information Resources in Knowledge Society: Issues, Challenges and Trends” held on March 3-4, 2009, at Manipur University, Canchipur, Imphal, Pages 238-258. Edited by Th. Madhuri Devi and Ch. Ibohal Singh. [7] Ali Shiri.Digital library research: current developments and trends. Library Review, 2003,52(5): 198-202. [8] Ranganathan, S.R. Five Laws of Library Science. 1999. Sarada Ranganathan Endowment Publications. [9] R.K. and Vishwanthan K.R. Digital Libraries: development and principles, Library Review, 2001, 50 (1): 10-16. [10] Alexa T. McCray and Marie E. Gallagher. Principles For Digital Library Development. Communication of the ACM COMMUNICATIONS OF THE ACM, 2001, 44(5): 49-54. [11] Chore, N.V. and Salwe, S.M. Library Sources and Service In Digital Environment. Proceeding of state level seminar on role of information technology in library, Karad.(8-9 April 2010).

Research and Practice on “Triple-driven” Based Software Development Practical Teaching System
According to the situation that the IT students can not meet the software industry demand for qualified personnel, a “triple-driven” three-dimensional software development practical teaching system was proposed, aiming to improve the software development capabilities and innovation sense of students. This system can effectively improve students the interest of software development and the practical skills and sense of innovation, laying a solid foundation for student after graduation to rapidly integrate into the software development process, meeting the needs of software industry.According to the situation that the IT students can not meet the software industry demand for qualified personnel, a “triple-driven” three-dimensional software development practical teaching system was proposed, aiming to improve the software development capabilities and innovation sense of students. This system can effectively improve students the interest of software development and the practical skills and sense of innovation, laying a solid foundation for student after graduation to rapidly integrate into the software development process, meeting the needs of software industry.
[1] Wang Guicheng Fu Yonghong Lu Zhangping Implementing four-in-one teaching reform and enhancing students’ engineering awareness[J] Journal of Higher Education Management 3 3 2009 90 92 [2] Lei Huan Tang Weiyi F. Edward Crawley Cultivating innovative, multi-level and professional engineering personnel[J] Research in Higher Education of Engineering 5 2009 29 34 [3] Zhang Laibin A macro-view of engineering and the reform of higher engineering education[J] China Higher Education Research 18 22 2009 8 10 [4] Fu Youjia, Yang Changhui. Discussion on C language teaching[J]. Computer Era, 2009, (9):67-68. [5] Guo Lingling, Yuan Man, Fu Yu (2010). Exploration and Practice on Case-driven Research-based Teaching Model. Education Technology and Computer (ICETC), 2010 2nd International Conference (pp. V1209-211). Shanghai, China. [6] He Jingyuan Zhu Zhengyu An exploration about content fundamentals of computer technology[J] Computer Education 2 2010 25 27 [7] Li Wenze Lu. Kong Research on learning interest and autonomy in computer teaching for vocational college student[J] Journal of Kaifeng Institute of Education 4 2010 109 111 [8] Niu Yi Ani. Dong Fostering students’ interest in learning C language [J] Journal of Dongguan University of Technology 1 2006 110 113 [9] S.H.E.N. Qi ZHANG. Yan T.I.A.N. Xianghong Constructing Practice Teaching System Refer to CDIO Model [J] Computer Education 17 2010 57 60 [10] Guo Lingling, Tang Guowei and Fu Yu, “Study on Interest-driven Based Practical Teaching Model,” International Conference on Information and Education Technology (ICIET 2011), vol. 2, p. 82-84, February 2011. [11] Tang Song Li Chaolin Huai. Cai Reform on computer practice teaching in independent colleges[J] Computer Education 17 2010 54 56 [12] Liu Wenjing Fan Jiuming Zhao Shushan Deepening reform of experimental teaching and cultivating creative talents[J] Experimental Technology and Management 10 2007 223 225

A Novel Principal Component Analysis Color Identification Algorithm for Moving Plate Recognition system
According to the shortcomings of long time and big errors about the moving plate recognition system, we present the moving plate recognition algorithm based on principal component analysis(PCA) color extraction. On the basis of the analysis of moving plate recognition system's basic principles, it introduces the basic principles and calculation steps about PCA extraction algorithm, and discusses the feasibility of applying the algorithm to PRS in the paper. The experimental results show that the algorithm has the advantages of faster speed and higher accuracy of recognition. The algorithm provides a new thought for the research on the moving plate recognition algorithm.According to the shortcomings of long time and big errors about the moving plate recognition system, we present the moving plate recognition algorithm based on principal component analysis(PCA) color extraction. On the basis of the analysis of moving plate recognition system's basic principles, it introduces the basic principles and calculation steps about PCA extraction algorithm, and discusses the feasibility of applying the algorithm to PRS in the paper. The experimental results show that the algorithm has the advantages of faster speed and higher accuracy of recognition. The algorithm provides a new thought for the research on the moving plate recognition algorithm.
[1] Wang Han Bai Xuebing Hui. Wang Wood Texture Classification and Recognition Based on Spatial GLCM Forest Engineering 23 1 2007 32 36 [2] Wang Keqi Chen Lijun Wang Hui Xie Yonghua The Exraction of Wood Texture Features Based on Spatial GLCM Engineering 22 1 2006 24 29 [3] Wang Han Bai Xuebing Hui. Wang Classification of wood surface texture based on wavelets transform Journal of Harbin Institute of Technology 41 9 2009 232 236 [4] X.D. Yang X.B. Ning Y.L. Yin Fingerprint image preprocessing technique and feature extraction algorithm Journal of Nanjing University Natural Sciences 4 42 2006 351 361 [5] Junwei Tao Wei Jiang Improved two-dimensional principal component analysis based on the palmprint identification Optical Technology 33 2 2007 283 286 [6] Xu Chunmei Wang Chunyao Yue. Liu The color recognition research based on machine vision system Machinery Design  &  Manufacture 8 2011 257 326

Factors Related to Improving Teaching of Sport Normal Students in China
With the development of sport normal students in china, Some ideas to teaching and learning that view learning as a simple process of knowledge have become outdated and ineffective, therefore, In order to improving the quality of teaching and learning on sport normal students in china, this author discussed some factors on promoting the level of teaching and learning for sport normal students, such as implementation principle, curriculum design, education policy, and so on. The meaning of results and their implication of future research are discussed.With the development of sport normal students in china, Some ideas to teaching and learning that view learning as a simple process of knowledge have become outdated and ineffective, therefore, In order to improving the quality of teaching and learning on sport normal students in china, this author discussed some factors on promoting the level of teaching and learning for sport normal students, such as implementation principle, curriculum design, education policy, and so on. The meaning of results and their implication of future research are discussed.
[1] Banks J. Multiethnic education: theory and practice, 3 rd  ed. Boston: Allyn and bacon; 1994. [2] Joyce Vantassel-baska, Susannah Wood. The integrated Curriculum Model(ICM), Learning and individual differences. 2010;:1-10. [3] Hayes-Jacob H. A model for curriculum and instruction: discipline fields, interdisciplinary and cognitive process. Unpublished doctoral dissertation, Columbia University; 1981. [4] Ana M, Isabel P, Margarida Afonso. Teacher training processes and teachers’ competence. Teaching and teacher education.2005; 415-22. [5] Bernstein B. Pedagogy, symbolic control and identity—theory, research, critique.3 rd  ed. New York: Roman and little field;2000. [6] Harlen, W, Holroyd C. Primary teachers’ understanding of concepts of science: impact on confidence and teaching. International journal of science education, 1997;93-12. [7] Brown P, Park A. Education and poverty in rural china. Economic of education review. 2002:523-18. [8] Chapman D W. Trends in educational administration in developing asia. Educational administration. 2000:283-25. [9] Deng Z, Treiman D J. The impact of the cultural revolution on trends in educational attainment in the people's Republic of china. The American Journal of socialy. 1997:391-36. [10] LI H Z. Economic transition and returns to education in china. Economics of education review.2003:317-11. [11] Zhao Y H. Labor migration and returns to rural education in china. American journal of agricultural economics. 1997:1278-9. [12] Richard light, Marlene A Dixon. Contemporary developments in sport pedagogy and their implications for sport management education. Sport management reviews. 2007:159-16.

The Design and Implementation of a Process-Driven Higher Educational Administrative System
A process-driven model is presented to build an instinctive and efficient higher educational administrative management system to overcome problems most universities facing. With this model, processes are identified explicitly and the routine of educational administration is broken into small tasks. Each task has designated role of executors. A process describes the activities and relationships among them. A prototype of higher educational administrative system is built with Bonita open solution. The demo shows that the process-driven higher educational administrative system helps end users understand processes they are involved and focus on what to do.A process-driven model is presented to build an instinctive and efficient higher educational administrative management system to overcome problems most universities facing. With this model, processes are identified explicitly and the routine of educational administration is broken into small tasks. Each task has designated role of executors. A process describes the activities and relationships among them. A prototype of higher educational administrative system is built with Bonita open solution. The demo shows that the process-driven higher educational administrative system helps end users understand processes they are involved and focus on what to do.
[1] Noor Azizi Ismail, (2010) “Activity-based management system implementation in higher education institution: Benefits and challenges”, Campus-Wide Information Systems, Vol. 27 Iss: 1, pp.40-52. [2] Bonita Open Solution.http://www.bonitasoft.org. last access 2012. [3] J.F. Baldwin, Currently challenges in higher education administration and management,Perspectives, vol.13,pp. 93-97,2009. [4] Muhammad Asif, Erik J. de Bruijn, Olaf A.M. Fisscher, Cory Searcy, Harm-Jan Steenhuis, (2009) “Process embedded design of integrated management systems”, International Journal of Quality  &  Reliability Management, Vol. 26 Iss: 3, pp.261-282. [5] N. Turbit, Business Process Modelling Overview.The project PERFECT white Paper collection. [6] Bonita open solution. http://www.bonitasoft.org. [7] J .Meenakumari, Education and educational administration: A technological perspective,Proceedings of the International Conference on Computer Science and Information Technology, ICCSIT 2008, pp 836-840, 2008. [8] J. Nelson, J. Carpenter, S. Napper, B. Ramachandran, Innovative administration supports innovative education,Proceedings - Frontiers in Education Conference, pp T2G3-T2G8, 2008. [9] Mohamed Zairi, (1997) “Business process management: a boundaryless approach to modern competitiveness”, Business Process Management Journal, Vol. 3 Iss: 1, pp.64-80.

An Exploratory Study on the Curricula Constructions of Sports Major Free Normal Students in China
With employment of utilizing the investigation, expert interviews and comparison, this article investigates the curricula construction, curricula design and curricula content for sports free normal students. On the basis of the investigation, this article analyzed the theoretical framework of curricular construction and proposed some suggestions. We hope that it can provide some evidences for curricula design for sports free normal students.With employment of utilizing the investigation, expert interviews and comparison, this article investigates the curricula construction, curricula design and curricula content for sports free normal students. On the basis of the investigation, this article analyzed the theoretical framework of curricular construction and proposed some suggestions. We hope that it can provide some evidences for curricula design for sports free normal students.
[1] Liang Yu.Of College Teaching Master of Teaching Method[D]Master's thesis of Huazhong University of Science and Technology, 2008:6. [2] Ting. Zhu National quality curriculum construction practice -- Taking Zhejiang University of Technology as an example[J]Education Research 10 2010 101 104 [3] Xu Jingzhu Higher normal education curriculum structure analysis of the current situation and reform conception[J] Higher education of Sciences 3 2000 43 49 [4] Ling. Li Application of microteaching training physical education teachers teaching skill for the students of design and research[J] Journal of Xi’an Physical Education University 4 2007 118 120 [5] Liu Minhang Reform of physical education curriculum cultural dynamic characteristics[J] Journal of Tianjin Physical Education University 5 2008 383 385 [6] Feng Jianjun From the knowledge structure of teachers of teachers education curriculum reform[J] Training of primary and middle school teachers 8 2004 3 6 [7] Hu Wangsheng On the tutorial system of undergraduate teaching reform[J] Education in Heilongjiang 2 2010 1 3 [8] Gong Chunbo.The Hunan Province ordinary university sports education specialized student employment situation and countermeasure research[D]Thesis for master degree of Wuhan Sports Institute, 2009:9. [9] Fei. Wang On China s Undergraduate Physical Education[J] Journal of Shandong Sports Institute 12 2009 83 86 [10] Chen Shijian Free education for cultivating pattern exploration[J] Journal of Southwestern University: Humanities and Social Sciences Edition 6 2007 7 11 [11] Li Chunmei Pre-service teacher education curriculum structure of teachers’ Professional Ability Cultivation -- Based on the perspective of[J] Journal of Sichuan Vocational and Technical College 1 2011 79 81 [12] Bo. Li According to the training mode in local colleges and universities curriculum system reconstruction[J] Education Research 8 2011 59 63 [13] qing. Xia Xiao Health education teachers practical knowledge generation mechanism pre-test[J] Journal of Anqing Teachers College: Social Science Edition 3 2011 123 126 [14] Xia Dan.Changchun City elementary and middle school physical education and health curriculum resources development use present situation and countermeasure research[D]Thesis for master degree of Liaoning Normal University, 2006:5.

A Brief Analysis on the Lettered Words in Chinese--From the Perspective of Ecolinguistics
It has been more than a century since the emergence of the lettered words. After that, with the development of economy and culture, the increase of international contacts and communication between China and foreign countries, lettered words have been appearing more frequently. Lettered words have become an indispensable part of Chinese vocabulary, such as WTO, Ka la OK and MP3. As a new phenomenon in the vocabulary system of the modern Chinese, the lettered words draws a lot of academic attention. Ecolinguistics is a new branch of linguistic, which combine the linguistic with the ecology. This paper is trying to analyze the lettered words from the perspective of Ecolinguistics. This paper will discuss the reasons of appearing the lettered words and the influence may give to modern Chinese form the ecolinguistic view.It has been more than a century since the emergence of the lettered words. After that, with the development of economy and culture, the increase of international contacts and communication between China and foreign countries, lettered words have been appearing more frequently. Lettered words have become an indispensable part of Chinese vocabulary, such as WTO, Ka la OK and MP3. As a new phenomenon in the vocabulary system of the modern Chinese, the lettered words draws a lot of academic attention. Ecolinguistics is a new branch of linguistic, which combine the linguistic with the ecology. This paper is trying to analyze the lettered words from the perspective of Ecolinguistics. This paper will discuss the reasons of appearing the lettered words and the influence may give to modern Chinese form the ecolinguistic view.
[1] Fill, A. Language and ecology: Ecolinguistics per-spectives for 2000 beyond [A]. In AILA Organizing Committee (eds.).Selected Papers from AILA 1999 Tokyo[C]. Tokyo: Waseda University Press.2000. [2] Halliday, M.A.K. “New Ways of Meeting: The Challenge to Applied Linguistics”. In Fill, A. and Muhlhausler, P. The Ecolinguistics Reader[J]. London:Continuum.2001. [3] Liu Chong quan.  < < The letter word dictionary > >  [M], Shanghai: Shanghai dictionaries press.2001. [4] LiuChong quan.about the Chinese letters,  < < The language application > > [M].2002. [5] LiuChong quan.  < < The Chinese letter word dictionary > > [M],Beijing: foreign language teaching and research press.2009. [6] FanJunJun, GongJi. The present situation of the study of contemporary ecological linguistics[J]. Foreign social science, the sixth period.2006. [7] WuXiaoXin. The ecological linguistics, from the perspective of foreign-originated words in English[J]. Journal of tianjin foreign studies university, the fourth period.2010. [8] ZouYuHua.The letter word popularity investigation report[J]. language teaching and research, the second phase.2005. [9] Alvin Jackson. The present situation of the study of contemporary ecological linguistics[J]. foreign social science.2004:6. [10] WangJinJun. The ecological linguistics: a new era of linguistics[J]. journal of tianjin foreign studies university, 2007:1.

On the Fitness Training of Older People in an Aging Society
The 21st century in the face of an aging population trend, the health status of the elderly is a hot issue of social concern, therefore, to explore the health status of the Chinese population aging and the elderly, elderly fitness exercise Misunderstanding study and formulate measures and methods of fitness of the elderly, promoting elderly fitness training towards a healthy, scientific direction, to promote a nationwide fitness activities carried out in order to achieve the exercise of scientific fitness of older persons.The 21st century in the face of an aging population trend, the health status of the elderly is a hot issue of social concern, therefore, to explore the health status of the Chinese population aging and the elderly, elderly fitness exercise Misunderstanding study and formulate measures and methods of fitness of the elderly, promoting elderly fitness training towards a healthy, scientific direction, to promote a nationwide fitness activities carried out in order to achieve the exercise of scientific fitness of older persons.
[1] Wang Hai-rong J, Method of Modern elderly reasonable physical exercise. Hunan Institute of Humanities Science and Technology College; 2006. [2] J. Xu Feng-ping The research for the actuallty and developing currency of fit activities for the old in our country Shanghai Sport Science Research. 3 24 2003 45 49 [3] Xie Qi-shan N, Strengthen the elderly sports building to cope with the trend of population aging. China Sports Daily. 2007. [4] Liu Guang-hong. Luo Xu. Li An-hui J, Fitness service system in an aging society and older age groups in China Development Strategies. 2006. [5] Pei Li-Xin J, Analysis of aging and elderly Sports Strategy. Sports and Science. 2001. [6] Lu Tian-zheng J, Elderly healthy and elderly sports. Shandong Institute of Physical Education. 1999. [7] J. Lu Yuan-zheng Pitfalls and errors in the elderly fitness regimen Journal of Physical Education. 11 17 2010 119 122 [8] Guo-dong Si. Zhang Yong-sheng J, Analysis of science and fitness of older persons. Sports World Academic. 2007.8. 14-16.

Construct of Web-based Instructional Environment Based on Inter-subjectivity Fusing Cognition with Emotion–Taking the Website Design of the Quality Course Apparel Production and Management for Example
Faced with deficient ability of autonomic learning among learners and low emotional involvement in current web-based instructional environment, here we propose a construct model that is based on inter-subjectivity fusing cognition with emotion to make up for these shortages. Further more, we’ve put the construct model into practice through the online teaching reformation of the quality course apparel production and management.Faced with deficient ability of autonomic learning among learners and low emotional involvement in current web-based instructional environment, here we propose a construct model that is based on inter-subjectivity fusing cognition with emotion to make up for these shortages. Further more, we’ve put the construct model into practice through the online teaching reformation of the quality course apparel production and management.
[1] Ren Ruixian, Analysis of Emotional Communication in E-Learning Environment[J], Open Education Research, 2004(3), pp.47-50. [2] Jerry Losec, Zhu Xiaobin, Wang Jingli. Affective bracket: Students’ Emotional and Academic Intersection of Teachers’ Knowledge[J], Open Education Research, 2009(5). [3] Ross, A.R. (1996), The Influence of Computer Communication skills on Participation in A Computer Conferencing Course, Journal of Educational Computing Research, 15(1), pp.37-52. [4] Liu Jingfu, Zhong Zhixian. Lack of Sensation In On-Line Teaching And Countermeasure[J], Distance Education in China, 2001(6). [5] Hao Ning, Defects of online education from the perspective of educational psychology[J], E-education Research, 2002(11). [6] Feng Xiangdong, From the Perspective of Inter-subjectivity:the Key Element Relationof the Teaching Activities[J], Journal of Higher Education. 2004(5). [7] Pan Derong, Hermeneutics: From Inter and Outer- subjectivity to Inter-subjectivity[J], Journal of Anhui Normal University(Social Science Edition), 2002(3). [8] Feng Jianjun, Educational Process of Communication[J], Education Research, 2000(2). [9] Qiao Jianzhong, Theoretical Approach to the Teaching Mode of Fusing Cognition with Emotion[J], Journal of Nanjing Normal University(Social Science Edition), 2006(1).

Algorithms for Automatic Generation of Logical Questions on Mobile Devices
In this paper, we present algorithms for automatic generation of logic reasoning questions. The algorithms are able to construct questions that are solvable with unique solutions. The algorithms employ AI techniques such as semantic networks to produce verbal questions. These algorithms are small in size and are able to replace traditional question databases. They are particularly suitable for implementation on the memory constrained mobile platforms. The algorithms can be applied to question generation for job interview, civil service exam, etc.In this paper, we present algorithms for automatic generation of logic reasoning questions. The algorithms are able to construct questions that are solvable with unique solutions. The algorithms employ AI techniques such as semantic networks to produce verbal questions. These algorithms are small in size and are able to replace traditional question databases. They are particularly suitable for implementation on the memory constrained mobile platforms. The algorithms can be applied to question generation for job interview, civil service exam, etc.
[1] C. Frasson, G. Gauthier and A. Lesgold (eds.), Intelligent Tutoring Systems, LNCS-1086, 3rd Int. Conference on Intelligent Tutoring Systems (ITS’96), Montreal, Canada, June 1996. [2] J. Larkin, R. Chabay and C Sheftic (eds.), Computer Assisted Instruction and Intelligent Tutoring Systems: Establishing Communication and Collaboratio**n, Erlbaum, 1990. http://www.barnesandnoble.com/w/computer-assisted-instruction-and-intelligent-tutoring-systems-ruth-w-chabay/1001959570. [3] J. Heflin, Towards the Semantic Web: Knowledge Representation in a Dynamic Distributed Environment, Ph.D. Thesis, University of Maryland, College Park, 2001. [4] The Simple HTML Ontology Extensions (SHOE language specification), April 2000, available at http://www.cs.umd.edu/projects/plus/SHOE/spec.html. [5] T. Li, and S. Sambasivam, Question Difficulty Assessment In Intelligent Tutor System for Computer Architecture, In proceedings of ISECON 2003, San Diego, 2003. http://www.sciencemag.org/content/228/4698/456.short. [6] H. Kunichika, T. Katayama, T. Hirashima, and A. Takeuchi, Automated Question Generation Methods for Intelligent English Learning Systems and Its Evaluation, Proc of ICCE2004, Dec 2-5, Hong Kong. [7] Meier, R. Professional Android Application Development, Indianapolis: Wiley; 2009.

Biomechanical Analysis on Hip-push Skills Applied in Walking Race
By referring to many relevant data and essays, this paper aims at discussing and analyzing the importance of hip-push applied in walking race,based on the point of the view on sports biomechanics .With redard to the existing problems,the authors have made an objective analysis on the sports-biomechanics factors that can influence the race,hoping to provide a theoretical basis for the deep development and training of walking race.By referring to many relevant data and essays, this paper aims at discussing and analyzing the importance of hip-push applied in walking race,based on the point of the view on sports biomechanics .With redard to the existing problems,the authors have made an objective analysis on the sports-biomechanics factors that can influence the race,hoping to provide a theoretical basis for the deep development and training of walking race.
[1] Zongfang Lu, Cai Xiyuan. A key technical analysis to the 27th Olympic women's 20 km race's athletes Wang liping and Liu Hongyu [G]. Tianjin Sports Institute, 2002, (15). [2] Liansheng Bai, Li Wang. An analysis to Han Qiang's characteristics of sports training [G]. Inner Mongolia of Sports Science and Technology, 2008, 3, (21). [3] Derong Zhang, Xiyuan Cai, Wei Li, Li Yan. On new definition of walking. Tianjin sports institute, 1998, (4). The IAAF. International track and field competition rules [M]. 2001. [4] ZhangDeRong, ZhaoZhiLing. China's outstanding female technical features walker [J]. Journal of tianjin sports institute, 2001, (4). [5] Longjun Jing, Peng Wang. Technical analysis of Chinese excellent 20 km race walking athletes [J], 2011, 1,47 sports science and technology. [6] Hongwei Lin, Xiaoping Ni, Xuezhi Qiu. Technical analysis for our present race-walkers [J]. Sports science, 2001, (5). [7] Xuemei Lang, Zhongqiu Ji. Biomechanics analysis of the excellent women walking walkers [J]. Sports science and technology, 2003 (4): 39. [8] Hongwei Lin, etc. Technical analysis to part of our country active walkers [J] sports and science, 1999 (20): 24-26. [9] Fayuan Mao, A research on the validity of hip movement of walking evaluation method [J]. Journal of normal positions, 1996 (17):-46. [10] Wei Li, Jianchen Li. Walker technical foul creatures of the cause of mechanics [J]. Chinese sports science and technology, 2000 (6): 23 to 24. [11] Junxia Wang. Countermeasures study of walking race in China and the Beijing Olympic Games [J]. Journal of xian sports institute, 2006, (1): 82-84.

Automatic Verification of Data-centric Web Service Specifications
Amodel are proposed for modeling data-centric Web services which are powered by relational databases and interact with users according to logical formulas specifying input constraints, control-flow constraints and state/output/action rules. The Linear Temporal First-Order Logic (LTL-FO) formulas over inputs, states, outputs and actions are used to express the properties to be verified.We have proven that automatic verification of LTL-FO properties of data-centric Web services under input-bounded constraints is decidable by reducing Web services to data-centric Web applications. Thus, we can verify Web service specifications using existing verifier designed for Web applications.Amodel are proposed for modeling data-centric Web services which are powered by relational databases and interact with users according to logical formulas specifying input constraints, control-flow constraints and state/output/action rules. The Linear Temporal First-Order Logic (LTL-FO) formulas over inputs, states, outputs and actions are used to express the properties to be verified.We have proven that automatic verification of LTL-FO properties of data-centric Web services under input-bounded constraints is decidable by reducing Web services to data-centric Web applications. Thus, we can verify Web service specifications using existing verifier designed for Web applications.
[1] A. Deutsch, L. Sui, and V. Vianu, “Specification and verification of data-driven web applications,”.  Journal of Computer and System Sciences , vol. 73, no. 3, pp. 442-474, 2007. [2] R. Chinnici, J.-J. Moreau, A. Ryman, and S. Weerawarana, “Web services description language (wsdl) version 2.0 part 1:Core language,”  W3C Recommendation , vol. 26, 2007. [3] Martin D, Burstein M, Hobbs J, et al. OWL-S: Semantic markup for web services[J]. W3C member submission, 2004, 22: 2007-04. [4] Web services business process execution language version(wsbpel 2.0), 2007. [Online]. Available:  http://docs.oasis-open.org/wsbpel/2.0/OS/wsbpel-v2.0-OS.html . [5] E. M. Clarke, O. Grumberg, and D. Peled,  Model checking .The MIT press, 1999. [6] M. Spielmann, “Verification of relational transducers for electronic commerce,”  Journal of Computer and System Sciences ,vol. 66, no. 1, pp. 40-65, 2003. [7] A. Deutsch, M. Marcus, L. Sui, V. Vianu, and D. Zhou, “A verifier for interactive, data-driven web applications,”in  Proceedings of the 2005 ACM SIGMOD international conference on Management of data . ACM, 2005, pp. 539-550. [8] A. Deutsch, L. Sui, and V. Vianu, “Specification and verification of data-driven web services,” in  Proceedings of thetwenty-third ACM SIGMOD-SIGACT-SIGART symposium on Principles of database systems . ACM, 2004, pp. 71-82. [9] S. Abiteboul, V. Vianu, B. Fordham, and Y. Yesha, “Relational transducers for electronic commerce,” in  Proceedings of the seventeenth ACM SIGACT-SIGMOD-SIGART symposium on Principles of database systems , ser. PODS’98. New York,NY, USA: ACM, 1998, pp. 179-187.

Informatics Related Branch's Curriculum and Role of Project Management
The most important goal of the software industry is to produce successful product. During the process of production several times the product fails due to lack of proper management. This paper is exploring the role of software engineering courses in computer engineering related branches and then reasons why software developers lack project management in proper software management trainings. Our findings reflect that in majority of computer related branches like computer science, computer engineering, information system engineering there is no place for software project management course. Our findings are based on a survey of course curriculums of computer engineering, computer science and information system engineering courses taught in Turkish universities.The most important goal of the software industry is to produce successful product. During the process of production several times the product fails due to lack of proper management. This paper is exploring the role of software engineering courses in computer engineering related branches and then reasons why software developers lack project management in proper software management trainings. Our findings reflect that in majority of computer related branches like computer science, computer engineering, information system engineering there is no place for software project management course. Our findings are based on a survey of course curriculums of computer engineering, computer science and information system engineering courses taught in Turkish universities.
[1] Hussey M, Wu B, Xu X. Software Industry-Oriented Education Practices and Curriculum Development: Experiences and Lessons. Engineering Science Reference 2011. [2] Sun Y. Industry Oriented Curriculum and Syllabus Creation for Software Engineering Series Courses in the School of Software. Software Industry-Oriented Education Practices and Curriculum Development: Experiences and Lessons 2011; 98. [3] Charette R N, Why Software Fails. IEEE Spectrum. September 2005; 42. [4] Lethbridge Timothy C. A survey of the relevance of computer science and software engineering education. In Software Engineering Education, 1998. Proceedings., 11th Conference on, pp. 56-66. IEEE, 1998. [5] Cotterell M, Hughes B. Software project management. International Thomson Computer Press 1995. [6] Pressman, Roger S, Darrel I. Software engineering: a practitioner's approach. Vol. 5. New York: McGraw- hill, 1992. [7] Schwalbe K. Information Technology Project Management. 3rd ed. Thompson 2004;1-29. [8] Yabuuchi Y, Kocaoglu D, Watada J. Analysis of Project Management in Software Development. PICMET 2006 Proceedings, 9-13 July, Istanbul, Turkey (c) 2006 PICMET. 2006. [9] Keil M, Rai R, Mann J. E. C, Zhang G. P. Why Software Projects Escalate: The Importance of Project Management Constructs, IEEE Transactions on Engineering Management 2003; 251-261: 50-3. [10] Williams L, Heckman S. Project Management. 2008. Available:  http://openseminar.org/se/modules/13/index/screen.do . [11] Turbit N. Project Management  &  Software Development Methodology. 2012. Available:  http://www.projectperfect.com.au/downloads/Info/info_methodology_implementation.pdf . [12] Lethbridge Timothy C. What knowledge is important to a software professional?. Computer 33, no. 5. 2000; 44-50. [13] Pusatli O. T, Misra S. A discussion on assuring software quality in small and medium software enterprises: an empirical investigation. Tehnički vjesnik 18, no. 3. 2011; 447-452. [14] CS2008 Review Taskforce. Computer Science Curriculum 2008: An Interim Revision of CS 2001. IEEE Computer Society. 2008. [15] The Joint Task Force on Computing Curricula. Curriculum Guidelines for Undergraduate Degree Programs in Computer Engineering. IEEE Computer Society. 2004. [16] Petkovic D, Thompson G, Todtenhoefer R. Teaching practical software engineering and global software engineering: evaluation and comparison. In ACM SIGCSE Bulletin, vol. 38, no. 3. 2006; 294-298. [17] Kitchenham B, Budgen D, Brereton P, Woodall P. An investigation of software engineering curricula. Journal of Systems and Software 74, no. 3. 2005; 325-335.

Study on Macroscopical Dynamic Monitoring of New Increased Construction Land in Yinchuan Plain based on 20m Scale Middle Resolution Remote Sensing Data
Analyzing the significance of macroscopical dynamic monitoring of new add construction land, considering the influence of various factors, this paper selected Yinchuan Plain for a typical experimental zone, built knowledge base of remote sensing images interpretation, used multi-temporal remote sensing images, carried through interactive interpretation of change patterns of new add construction land and field validation. Interpretation results of 20m scale remote sensing image show that the minimum spot average area of new construction land change monitored by 20m scale remote sensing data is about 6 acres. The ability 20m scale remote sensing data identifies new increased construction land change further strengthens, shows in the recognition of the smallest spot area reduces and the recognition accuracy increases.Analyzing the significance of macroscopical dynamic monitoring of new add construction land, considering the influence of various factors, this paper selected Yinchuan Plain for a typical experimental zone, built knowledge base of remote sensing images interpretation, used multi-temporal remote sensing images, carried through interactive interpretation of change patterns of new add construction land and field validation. Interpretation results of 20m scale remote sensing image show that the minimum spot average area of new construction land change monitored by 20m scale remote sensing data is about 6 acres. The ability 20m scale remote sensing data identifies new increased construction land change further strengthens, shows in the recognition of the smallest spot area reduces and the recognition accuracy increases.
[1] Wenzhuo Dai. Land remote sensing monitoring implementation analysis and prospect under the new situation. Land  &  Resources of Zhejiang, no. 5, pp. 46-50, 2011. [2] Xiulan Wang, Yuhai Bao. Study on the methods of land use dynamic change research. Progress in Geography, vol. 18, no. 1, pp. 81-87, 1999. [3] Jing Zhou, Qingyuan Yang, Guixin Xin, Yingbin Feng. Application of differentiated land utilization polices in the new-round land utilization planning. Resources  &  Industries, vol. 13, no. 1, pp. 78-82, 2011. [4] Yi Zong. The theory analysis and evaluation research of urban land intensive utilization in China. Tianjing: Tianjing University, 2005. [5] Guanghui Hou. Allocation of new construction land based on land competitiveness evaluation. Journal of Anhui Agri Sci, vol. 39, no. 2, pp. 939-941, 2011. [6] Mei Xu, Shifeng Huang, Xuan Huang. Discussion of several key problems about dynamic detection of land use by remote sensing. Remote Sensing Technology and Application, vol. 15, no. 4, pp. 252-255, 2000. . [7] Yongjiu Feng, Zhen Han. Remote sensing based spatio-temporal evolution of land use pattern in Huangpu river coast. Remote Sensing for Land  &  Resources, no. 5, pp. 91-96, 2011. [8] Zhiqiang Gao, Jiyuan Liu, Dafang Zhuang. The research of Chinese land-use/land-cover present situations. Journal of Remote Sensing, vol. 3, no. 2, pp. 134-138, 1999. [9] Hujun He, Xingke Yang, Yuhang Li, Yongshou Li, Li Wang. Multi-source data fusion technique and its application in geological and mineral survey. Journal of Earth Science and Environment, vol. 32, no. 1, pp. 44-47, 2010. [10] Shucheng You, Shunxi Liu, Zongxue Xu. Evaluation on high spatial resolution SAR data for land use discrimination and land change detection. Chinese Agricultural Science Bulletin, vol. 27, no. 8, pp. 460-463, 2011.

Diversity and Convergence Issues in Evolutionary Multiobjective Optimization: Application to Agriculture Science
Evolutionary Algorithms are the stochastic optimization methods, simulating the behavior of natural evolution. These algorithms are basically population based search procedures efficiently dealing with complex search spaces having robust and powerful search mechanism. EAs are highly applicable in multiobjective optimization problem which are having conflicting objectives. This paper reviews the work carried out for diversity and convergence issues in EMO.Evolutionary Algorithms are the stochastic optimization methods, simulating the behavior of natural evolution. These algorithms are basically population based search procedures efficiently dealing with complex search spaces having robust and powerful search mechanism. EAs are highly applicable in multiobjective optimization problem which are having conflicting objectives. This paper reviews the work carried out for diversity and convergence issues in EMO.
[1] A. Zhou, B.-Y. Qu, H. Li, S.-Z. Zhao, P.N. Sugathan, Multiobjective Evolutionary Algorithms: A Survey of the state of the art, Swarm and Evolutionary Computation, 1 (2011), 32-49. [2] A. Konak, D.W. Coit, A.E. Smith, Multi-objective optimization using genetic algorithms: a tutorial, Reliability Engineering and Safety Systems, 91, 2006, 992-1007. [3] J. D. Schaffer, (1984),Multiple objective optimization with Vector Evaluated Genetic Algorithms, Ph. D. Thesis, Vanderbilt University, Nashville, TN. [4] Goldberg D.E, Genetic algorithms in search optimization and machine learning, Addison Wesley Publishing Company Reading Massachusetts, 1989. [5] Koza, J. R, Genetic Programming,On the programming of computers by means of natural selection, The MIT Press, Cambridge, Massachusetts, (1992). [6] Schwefel H.-P., Evolution and optimization seeking, John Wiley  &  Sons, Newyork, 1995. [7] Fogel, L.J. Artificial Intelligence through simulated evolution, John Wiley, New York, 1966. [8] Coello, C.A., Van Veldhuizen D. A., Lamont, G.B., Evolutionary Algorithms for solving multi-objective problems, Kluwer Academic publishers, Newyork, (2002). [9] Coello C. Recent trends in evolutionary multi-objective optimization,in:A. Abraham, L, Jain, R. Goldberg (Eds.), Evolutionary Multi-objective optimization:Theoretical Advances and Applications (Springer-Verlog,London, 2005)7-32 (2005). [10] Coello, C., Toscano, G., Mezura, E. Current and future research trends in evolutionary multi-objective optimization, in: M. Grana, R. Duro, A. d’ Anjou, P.P. Wang (Eds.) Spring-Verlag, London, 2005. [11] Coello, C., Evolutionary multiobjective optimization: a historical view of the field, IEEE computational Intelligence Magazine, 1:1, 28-36 (2006). [12] Srinivas, N., Deb, K., Multiobjective optimization using non-dominated sorting in genetic algorithms. Evolutionary Computation,;1; 2(3), pp. 221-248, 1994. [13] Horn, J., Nafpliotis, N., Goldberg, D.E., A niched pareto genetic algorithm for multi-objective optimization, In: proc. Ist IEEE Conference on Evolutionary Computation, IEEE World Congress on Computational Intelligence, 1, 82-87, 1994. [14] Fonseca, C.M. Fleming, P.J. Genetic algorithms for multiobjective optimization: formulation, discussion and generalization, In proc. 5th International Conference on Genetic Algorithms, 416-423, (1993) . [15] E. Zitzler, L. Thiele, Multiobjective evolutionary algorithms: a comparative case study and the strength pareto approach, IEEE Transactions on Evolutionary Computation, 3 (4), 257-271, (1999. [16] Zitzler, E., Laumanns, M., Thiele, L., SPEA2: Improving the strength pareto evolutionary algorithms, Technical Report 103, Computer Engineering  &  Networks Laboratory (TIK), Swiss Federal Institute of Technology (ETH), Zurich, Switzerland (20u01). [17] Knowles, J.D., Corne, D.W., Approximating the non-dominated front using the Pareto achieved evolution strategy, Evolutionary Computation, 8 (2), 149-172 (2000). [18] Deb, K., Pratap, A., Agarwal, S., Meyarivan, T. A fast and elitist Multiobjective genetic algorithm: NSGA II, IEEE Transactions on Evolutionary Computation, 6 (2), 182-197, (2002). [19] Erickson, M., Mayer, A., Horn, J., The Niched Pareto Genetic Algorithms applied to the design of ground water remediation system, Ist International Conference on Evolutionary Multi Criteria Optimization, 681-695, Springer-Verlag, LNCS, No. 1993 (2001). [20] Corne, D.W., Knowles, J.D., Oates, M.J., The pareto envelop based selection algorithm for multi- objective optimization, In Proc. VI Conference of Parallel Problem Solving from Nature, pp. 839-848, Paris, France, Springer LNCS 1917 (2000). [21] Coello, C.A. C., Pulido, G.T., A microgenetic algorithm for Multiobjective optimization, In: proc. First International Conference on Evolutionary Multi-Criteria Optimization, pp. 126-140, LNCS 1993 (2001) . [22] Coello, C.A. C., Pulido, G.T. Multi-objective optimization using a micro-genetic algorithm, Proc. Genetic and Evolutionary Computation Conference (GECCO’ 2001), pp. 274-282, Morgan Kaufmann Publishers (2001). [23] T. M. Chan, K.F. Man, K.S. Tang, S. Kwong, A jumping gene paradigm for evolutionary multiobjective optimization, IEEE Transactions on Evolutionary Computation, 12 (2), 2008, pp. 143-159.

Coordination of Agricultural Products Supply Chain with Stochastic Yield by Price Compensation
In this paper, coordination problem of agricultural products supply chain with stochastic yield is studied based on prices compensation strategy. The agricultural producing is influenced by the natural conditions, and the yield is uncertain. While agricultural products is rigid demand goods, the fluctuations of yield cause greater volatility of prices. The two- echelon supply chain with one supplier and one retailor is studied, and the mathematical model is constructed. The model showed that prices compensation strategy is Pareto improvement for agricultural products supply chain with stochastic yield, and it also incentive agricultural products supplier to rise the production plan and balance the profit allocation of supply chain.In this paper, coordination problem of agricultural products supply chain with stochastic yield is studied based on prices compensation strategy. The agricultural producing is influenced by the natural conditions, and the yield is uncertain. While agricultural products is rigid demand goods, the fluctuations of yield cause greater volatility of prices. The two- echelon supply chain with one supplier and one retailor is studied, and the mathematical model is constructed. The model showed that prices compensation strategy is Pareto improvement for agricultural products supply chain with stochastic yield, and it also incentive agricultural products supplier to rise the production plan and balance the profit allocation of supply chain.
[1] Kazaz B. Production planning under yield and demand uncertainty with yield-dependent cost and price[J]. Manufacturing  &  Service Operations Management, 2004, 6(3): 209-224. [2] Deo S, Corbett C J. Cournot competition under yield uncertainty: The case of the US influenza vaccine market[J]. Manufacturing  &  Service Operations Management, 2009, 11(4): 563-576. [3] Bohle C, Maturana S, Vera J. A robust optimization approach to wine grape harvesting scheduling[J]. European Journal of Operational Research, 2010, 200(1): 245-252. [4] Boyabatlı O, Kleindorfer P R, Koontz S R. Integrating long-term and short-term contracting in beef supply chains[J]. Management Science, 2011, 57(10): 1771-1787. [5] Xu H. Managing production and procurement through option contracts in supply chains with random yield[J]. International Journal of Production Economics, 2010, 126(2): 306-313. [6] He Y, Zhao X. Coordination in multi-echelon supply chain under supply and demand uncertainty[J]. International Journal of Production Economics, 2012, 139(1): 106-115.

Application of Classification Scale Method (CSM) in Tight Sandstone Permeability Calculation
It is difficult in directly predicting permeability from porosity in tight sandstones due to the poor relationship between core derived porosity and permeability that caused by the extreme heterogeneity. The classical SDR (Schlumberger Doll Research) and Timur-Coates models are all unusable because not enough core samples were drilled for lab NMR experimental measurements to calibrate the involved model parameters. Based on the classification scale method (CSM), after the target tight sandstones are classified into two types, the relationship between core porosity and permeability is established for every type of formations, and the corresponding permeability estimation models are established. Field examples show that the classification scale method is effective in estimating tight sandstone permeability.It is difficult in directly predicting permeability from porosity in tight sandstones due to the poor relationship between core derived porosity and permeability that caused by the extreme heterogeneity. The classical SDR (Schlumberger Doll Research) and Timur-Coates models are all unusable because not enough core samples were drilled for lab NMR experimental measurements to calibrate the involved model parameters. Based on the classification scale method (CSM), after the target tight sandstones are classified into two types, the relationship between core porosity and permeability is established for every type of formations, and the corresponding permeability estimation models are established. Field examples show that the classification scale method is effective in estimating tight sandstone permeability.
[1] Coates, G.R., Xiao, L.Z., Primmer, M.G., NMR logging principles and applications. Gulf Publishing Company, Houston, 2000: 45-132. USA. [2] S.H. Chen J.S. Chen M. Gillen D. Georgi A new approach for obtaining Swir from NMR log without requiring T2cutoff Paper DD presented at the 49th SPWLA Annual Logging Symposium 2008 [3] Fahad, A.A.A., Stephen, A.H., Permeability estimation using hydraulic flow units in a central Arabia reservoir, 2000, SPE63254. [4] W.E. Kenyon P.I. Day C. Straley J.F. Willemsen A three-part study of NMR longitudinal relaxation properties of water-saturated sandstones SPE Formation Evaluation 3 3 1988 622 636 [5] W.E. Kenyon Petrophysical principles of applications of NMR logging The Log Analysis 38 3 1997 21 43 [6] Z.Q. Mao L. Xiao Z.N. Wang Y. Jin X.G. Liu B. Xie Estimation of permeability by integrating nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) logs with mercury injection capillary pressure (MICP) data in tight gas sands. 44 4 2013 449 468 [7] C. Straley C.E. Morriss W.E. Kenyon NMR in partially saturated rocks: laboratory insights on free fluid index and comparison with borehole logs Paper CC presented at SPWLA 32nd Annual Logging Symposium 1991 [8] A. Timur An investigation of permeability, porosity, and residual water saturation relationships Paper Jpresented at the 9th SPWLA Annual Logging Symposium 1968 [9] K.B. Vivian U.O. Joshua F.W. Paul The challenges for carbonate petrophysics in petroleum resource estimation SPE Reservoir Evaluation  &  Engineering 14 1 2011 25 34 [10] L. Xiao Z.Q. Mao Z.N. Wang Y. Jin X.G. Liu B. Xie Comparison Study of Models for Calculating Absolute Permeability Using Nuclear Magnetic Resonance Imaging Log Technology in Tight Sandstone Gas Zones 2009 SPE126408 [11] L. Xiao Z.Q. Mao Y. Jin Estimation of saturation exponent from nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) logs in low permeability reservoirs Applied Magnetic Resonance 42 1 2012 113 125

E-procurement and E-supply Chain: Features and Development of E-collaboration
The opportunity offered by digital technologies to make deep rationalization in purchase of supplies is becoming indispensable in competition between enterprises, considering positive effects in reducing the costs of the companies that have adopted the E-Procurement. As it has been confirmed by numerous case studies, automation of procedures for the purchase through e-procurement technology enables companies to achieve a reduction in costs (average 8-12%) of total purchases. So web-based models are playing a critical role within companies, especially in the generation of value of supply chain. This article focuses on the role of e-procurement within a supply chain showing, through simulations, the advantages and difficulties of implementing a systematic use of the Internet and defining the basic structure of an e-supply chain.The opportunity offered by digital technologies to make deep rationalization in purchase of supplies is becoming indispensable in competition between enterprises, considering positive effects in reducing the costs of the companies that have adopted the E-Procurement. As it has been confirmed by numerous case studies, automation of procedures for the purchase through e-procurement technology enables companies to achieve a reduction in costs (average 8-12%) of total purchases. So web-based models are playing a critical role within companies, especially in the generation of value of supply chain. This article focuses on the role of e-procurement within a supply chain showing, through simulations, the advantages and difficulties of implementing a systematic use of the Internet and defining the basic structure of an e-supply chain.
[1] A. VanWeele Purchasing Management:Analysis Planning and Practice 1994 Chapman  &  Hall London, UK [2] L. de Boer J. Harink G. Heijboer A Conceptual Model for Assessing the Impact of Electronic Procurement European Journal of Purchasing  &  Supply Management 8 2002 25 33 [3] W.D. Presutti Jr. Supply Management an E-Procurement: Creating Value Added in the Supply Chain Industrial Marketing Management 32 2003 219 226 [4] Knudsen D. Uncovering the Strategic Domain of E-Procurement. In Proceedings of the 12th IPSERA Conference, Budapest, April 14-16; 2003. [5] Leonard A, Spring M. E-Procurement Must Become Supply Management: Portfolio Approaches and Electronic Procurement.” In Proceedings of the 11th IPSERA Conference, Enschede, The Netherlands, March 25-27; 2002. [6] Balocco R, Rangone A. Le applicazioni B2B e il ruolo degli e-marketplace: mondo digitale; 2002. [7] R.M. Monczka R.J. Trent R.B. Handfield Purchasing and Supply Chain Management 1st ed 1998 South-Western Educational Publishing [8] KenjaleK A. Phatak The benefits of B2B exchanges 2002 CRM on-line magazine [9] Obeservatoryresearch on B2b, Politecnico di Milano, 2003. [10] Bertelè U, Rangone A. Dai Marketplace ai servizi di sourcing, procurement e supply chain collaboration: come le imprese posso creare valore, Associazione Impresa Politecnico, Milano; 2003. [11] Bertelè U, Rangone A. eProcurment, eSupply Chain: una scelta tattica o strategica?, School of Management – Politecnico di Milano, Milano, 2005.

Hypergraph Reconfigurability Analysis
In the present paper, a hypergraph model for the structural system modeling and reconfigurability analysis has been presented. At first, we represent each system equation by a hyperedge, and then we extend the modeling hypergraph with others colored hyperedges (red and blue) which allows us to perform the analysis task. Based on the bottom up analysis hypergraph model, it's very easy to check the system reconfigurability in the presence of fault by verifying the existence of paths from the affected hyperedge to specifics blue hyperedges passing through specifics red hyperedges. The method is illustrated through a pedagogical example.In the present paper, a hypergraph model for the structural system modeling and reconfigurability analysis has been presented. At first, we represent each system equation by a hyperedge, and then we extend the modeling hypergraph with others colored hyperedges (red and blue) which allows us to perform the analysis task. Based on the bottom up analysis hypergraph model, it's very easy to check the system reconfigurability in the presence of fault by verifying the existence of paths from the affected hyperedge to specifics blue hyperedges passing through specifics red hyperedges. The method is illustrated through a pedagogical example.
[1] Assas L.M. Analyse de la tolérance aux fautes: approche fonctionnelle et structurelle. PhD thesis, Université de Lille, 2002. [2] R. Giaccio G. Ausiello On-line algorithms for satisability formulae with uncertainty Theoretical Computer Science 171 1997 3 24 [3] U. Nanni G. Ausiello F.G. Italiano Hypergraph traversal revisited: Cost measures and dynamic algorithms. In Symposium on Mathematical Foundations of Computer Science 1450 1998 Springer-Verlag 1 16 [4] Belkherchi N. Contribution à l’étude du diagnostic et de la commande tolérante aux fautes par l’approche structurelle: Application aux procedes biologiques. PhD thesis, Universite de Toulouse 3 Paul Sabatier, 2011. [5] R. Merzouki S. Benmoussa B. Ould-Bouamama Bond graph approach for plant fault detection and isolation: Application to intelligent autonomous vehicle IEEE Transactions on Automation Science and Engineering 2013 [6] Berge C. Graphs and Hypergraphs, 1973. [7] Wu N, Blanke M, Starosweicki M. Concepts and methods in fault-tolerant control. American Control Conference, Arlington, USA, 4: 2606-2620, 2001. [8] T. Trinh D-Do C. Commault J. Dion Sensor classiﬁcation for the fault detection and isolation, a structural approach International Journal of Adaptive Control and Signal Processing 25 2011 1 17 [9] Dauphin-Tanguy G, Djeziri M, Ould Bouamama B. Bond graph model based robust control and diagnosis. Book Chapter in Springer Verlag, ISBN: 1848828810, 662 pages, 2010. [10] Suzuki E, Durand N, Crmilleux B. Visualizing transactional data with multiple clusterings for knowledge discovery. ISMIS, 2006. [11] Grazia scutella M, Gallo G. Directed hyper-graphs as a modeling paradigm, 21: 97-123, 1998. [12] S. Nguyen S. Pallottino G. Gallo G. Longo Directed hypergraphs and applications Discrete applied mathematics 42 1993 177 201 [13] M. Starosweicki A. Gehin Reconﬁguration analysis using generic component models IEEE Transactions on Systems, Man, and Cybernetics, Part A: Systems and Humans 38 3 2008 575 583 [14] M. Staroswiecki A. Gehin M. Assas Structural analysis of system reconﬁgurability In Proceedings of IFAC/Safeprocess 1 2000 292 297 [15] R. Isermann Model-based fault detection and diagnosis-status and applications Annual Reviews in Control 29 2005 71 85 [16] N. Durand M. Hajjar A. Ismail M. Quafafou An efficient architecture for information retrieval in p2p context using hypergraph. International Journal of Computer Networks  &  Communications 3 2011 166 [17] W. Khalil R. Merzouki B. Ould-Bouamama H. Haffaf Hypergraph models for system of systems supervision design IEEE Transactions on Systems, Man and Cybernetics, Part A: Systems and Humans 42 2012 1005 1012 [18] A. Martnez-Morales M. Vidal Directed hyper-graphs for Rdf documents 33 2010 59 67 [19] Ostasz A. Causal graph and its application to finding residual set and diagnostic relation. PhD thesis, Warsaw University of Technology, 2006. [20] Soufiane R. Hypergraphe de Voisinage Spatiocolorimetrique. Application en traitement d’images: Detection de contours et du bruit. PhD thesis, Universite de Bourgogne Dijon, 2004. [21] Starosweicki M. On reconfigurability with respect to actuator failures. IFAC Safeprocess Barcelona, 2002. [22] A.L. Gehin M. Starosweicki From control to supervision In Annual Reviews in Control 25 2001 1 11 [23] Yassine A. Génération des tests et placement de capteurs pour le diagnostic des systèmes physiques s’appuyant sur une modélisation structurelle. PhD thesis, Laboratoire G-SCOP de Grenoble, 2008.

Rotation Invariant Multiple Face-detection Architecture for Smart TV
This paper suggests a design of high quality real-time rotation face detection architecture for gesture recognition of smart TV. For high performance rotated face detection, the multiple-MCT(Modified Census Transform) architecture, which is robust against lighting change, was used. The Adaboost learning algorithm was used for creating optimized learning data. The proposed hardware structure was composed of Color Space Converter, Image Resizer, Noise Filter, Memory Controller Interface, Image Rotator, Image Scaler, MCT Generator, Candidate Detector, Confidence Switch, Confidence Mapper, Position Resizer, Data Grouper, Overlay Processor and Color Overlay Processer. As a result, suggested face detection device can conduct real-time processing at speed of at least 30 frames per second.This paper suggests a design of high quality real-time rotation face detection architecture for gesture recognition of smart TV. For high performance rotated face detection, the multiple-MCT(Modified Census Transform) architecture, which is robust against lighting change, was used. The Adaboost learning algorithm was used for creating optimized learning data. The proposed hardware structure was composed of Color Space Converter, Image Resizer, Noise Filter, Memory Controller Interface, Image Rotator, Image Scaler, MCT Generator, Candidate Detector, Confidence Switch, Confidence Mapper, Position Resizer, Data Grouper, Overlay Processor and Color Overlay Processer. As a result, suggested face detection device can conduct real-time processing at speed of at least 30 frames per second.
[1] D. Han Design and VLSI implementation of a high-performance face detection engine Computers  &  Electrical Engineering 38 5 2012 1222 1239 [2] Choi J, Han D, Yoo SJ. Real-Time Face-Detection Engine for Robustness to Variable Illumination and Rotated Faces. In: Computers, Networks, Systems and Industrial Engineering (CNSI), 2011 First ACIS/JNU International Conference on. 2011;53-58. [3] P. Viola M.J. Jones Robust real-time face detection International journal of computer vision 57 2 2004 137 154

Soft Sensor for COx Content in Tail Gas of PX Oxidation Side Reactions based on Particle Filters and EM Algorithm
Based on expectation-maximization algorithm, parameter estimation was proposed for data-driven nonlinear models in this work. On this basis, particle filters were used to approximately calculate integrals, deriving EM algorithm based on particle filter. And the effectiveness of using the proposed algorithm for the soft sensor of COx content in tail gas of PX oxidation side reactions was verified through simulation results.Based on expectation-maximization algorithm, parameter estimation was proposed for data-driven nonlinear models in this work. On this basis, particle filters were used to approximately calculate integrals, deriving EM algorithm based on particle filter. And the effectiveness of using the proposed algorithm for the soft sensor of COx content in tail gas of PX oxidation side reactions was verified through simulation results.
[1] Brosillow. Inferential control of process[J]. Jour. AichE, 1978, 24(3): 485-509. [2] P. Kadleca B. Gabrys S. Strandtb Data-driven soft sensors in the process industry Computers and Chemical Engineering 33 2009 795 814 [3] S. Khatibisepehr B. Huang Dealing with the irregular data in soft sensors: Bayesian method and comparative study Industrial and Engineering Chemistry Research 47 2008 8713 8723 [4] W. Yan H. Shao X. Wang Soft sensing modeling based on support vector machine and Bayesian model selection Computers and Chemical Engineering 28 2004 1489 1498 [5] S.D. Grantham L.H. Ungar A first principles approach to automation trouble shooting of chemical plants Computers and Chemical Engineering: 14 1990 783 798 [6] P.K. Pearson Control systems, identification Encyclopedia of Physical Science and Technology 2004 687 707 [7] A. Doucet N. de Freitas N. Gordon Sequential Monte Carlo Methods in Practice 2001 Springer New York [8] R.B. Gopaluni A particle filter approach to identification of nonlinear process under missing observations The Canadian Journal of Chemical Engineering 86 2008 1081 1092 [9] Jing Deng Li Xie Lei Chen Shima Khatibisepehr Biao Huang Fangwei Xub Aris Espejo. Development and industrial application of soft sensors with on-line Bayesian model updating strategy Journal of Process Control: 23 2013 317 325 [10] J. Deng, B. Huang, Identification of nonlinear parameter varying systems with missing output data, AIChE Journal (2012), http://dx.doi.org/10.1002/aic.13735. [11] M.S. Arulampalam A tutorial on particle filters for online nonlinear/non-Gaussian Bayesian tracking [J] IEEE Trans.Signal Processing 50 2 2002 174 188 [12] Chen Zhe. Bayesian Filtering: From Kalman Filters to Particle Filters, and beyond[R].Hamilton; McMaster University, 2003. [13] X. Shao B. Huang J. Lee F. Xu A. Espejo Constrained Bayesian state estimation-a comparative study and a new particle filter based approach Journal of Process Control: 20 2010 143 157 [14] H.W. Prengle Jr. N. Barond Make Petrochemicals by Liquid Phase Oxidation [J] Hydrocarbon Process 49 3 1970 106 [15] H.W. Prengle Jr. N. Barond Make Petrochemicals by Liquid Phase Oxidation(2).Kinetics Mass Transfer and Reactor Design [J] Hydrocarbon Process 49 11 1970 150 [16] Chunyang Zhang Optimization of the oxidation process parameters of PTA reduces the consumption of acetic acid[J] Polyester industry 12 3 1999 39 42 [17] Ming. Yun Analysis of reducing PX consumption in PTA production[J] Polyester industry 15 5 2002 35 37 [18] Dehua Wu Chao Huang Wenge Wu. Optimization of TA technology to reduce the consumption of acetic acid[J]. Polyester industry 13 2 2000 37 40

Increasing Immersiveness into a 3D Virtual World: Motion-tracking and Natural Navigation in vAcademia
In this paper, we present a project aiming at integrating immersive virtual reality technologies into a three-dimensional virtual world. We use an educational platform vAcademia as a test bed for the project, and focus on improving the learning process and, subsequently – the outcomes. We aim at increasing the immersiveness of 3D virtual world experience by applying motion tracking for controlling the avatar and two technologies for natural navigation: immersive projection and head-mounted display. In addition, we propose the major types of learning scenarios for the use of the designed systems.In this paper, we present a project aiming at integrating immersive virtual reality technologies into a three-dimensional virtual world. We use an educational platform vAcademia as a test bed for the project, and focus on improving the learning process and, subsequently – the outcomes. We aim at increasing the immersiveness of 3D virtual world experience by applying motion tracking for controlling the avatar and two technologies for natural navigation: immersive projection and head-mounted display. In addition, we propose the major types of learning scenarios for the use of the designed systems.
[1] Burkle M., Kinshuk (2009) Learning in Virtual Worlds: The Challenges and Opportunities. Paper presented at the 8th International Conference on CyberWorlds (CW), Bradford, UK, September 7-11. [2] S. Kluge E. Riley Teaching in Virtual Worlds: Opportunities and Challenges The Journal of Issues in Informing Science and Information Technology 5 1 2008 127 135 [3] S. Kumar J. Chhugani C. Kim D. Kim A. Nguyen P. Dubey C. Bienia Y. Kim Second Life and the New Generation of Virtual Worlds Computer 41 9 2008 46 53 [4] I. Duncan A. Miller S. Jiang A taxonomy of virtual worlds usage in education British Journal of Educational Technology 43 6 2012 949 964 [5] K.F. Hew W.S. Cheung Use of three-dimensional (3-D) immersive virtual worlds in K-12 and higher education settings: A review of the research British Journal of Educational Technology 41 1 2010 33 55 [6] D. Pasco The Potential of Using Virtual Reality Technology in Physical Activity Settings Quest 65 4 2013 429 441 [7] H.-M. Huang U. Rauch S.-S. Liaw Investigating learners’ attitudes toward virtual reality learning environments: Based on a constructivist approach Computers  &  Education 55 3 2010 1171 1182 [8] M. Roussou M. Oliver M. Slater The virtual playground: an educational virtual reality environment for evaluating interactivity and conceptual learning Virtual Reality 10 3–4 2006 227 240 [9] T. Monahan G. McArdle M. Bertolotto Virtual reality for collaborative e-learning. Computers and Education 50 4 2008 1339 1353 [10] J. Trindade C. Fiolhais L. Almeida Science learning in virtual environments: a descriptive study British Journal of Educational Technology 33 4 2002 471 488 [11] M. Slater Place Illusion and Plausibility Can Lead to Realistic Behaviour in Immersive Virtual Environments Philos Trans R Soc Lond 364 1535 2009 3549 3557 [12] Morozov M., Gerasimov A., Fominykh M., Smorkalov A.: Asynchronous Immersive Classes in a 3D Virtual World: Extended Description of vAcademia. In: Gavrilova M, Tan CJK, Kuijper A (eds.) Transactions on Computational Science XVIII, vol 7848. Lecture Notes in Computer Science, pp. 81-100. Springer Berlin Heidelberg, (2013). [13] Smorkalov A., Fominykh M., Morozov M. Collaborative Work with Large Amount of Graphical Content in a 3D Virtual World: Evaluation of Learning Tools in vAcademia. In: 16th International Conference on Interactive Collaborative Learning (ICL), Kazan, Russia, September 25-27, pp. 303-312. IEEE, (2013). [14] J. Shotton A. Fitzgibbon M. Cook T. Sharp M. Finocchio R. Moore A. Kipman A. Blake Real-Time Human Pose Recognition in Parts from Single Depth Images Machine Learning for Computer Vision. Springer 2013 Berlin Heidelberg [15] Cheong S.N., Yap W.J., Logeswaran R., Chai I.: Design and Development of Kinect-Based Technology-Enhanced Teaching Classroom. In: Park JJ, Jeong Y-S, Park SO, Chen H-C (eds.) Embedded and Multimedia Computing Technology and Service. Lecture Notes in Electrical Engineering, vol 181, pp. 179-186. (2012). [16] C. Cruz-Neira D.J. Sandin T.A. DeFanti R.V. Kenyon J.C. Hart The CAVE: audio visual experience automatic virtual environment Commun ACM 35 6 1992 64 72 [17] O. Cakmakci J. Rolland Head-worn displays: a review Display Technology, Journal of 2 3 2006 199 216 [18] M. Antonov N. Mitchell A. Reisse L. Cooper S. LaValle M. Katsev Oculus Software Development Kit Oculus VR, Inc., CA, USA 2013 [19] Meyer J.H.F., Land R.: Threshold concepts and troublesome knowledge: issues of liminality. In: Meyer JHF, Land R (eds.) Overcoming barriers to student understanding: threshold concepts and troublesome knowledge. pp. 19-32. Routledge, Abingdon, UK (2006). [20] Molka-Danielsen J., Savin-Baden M., Steed A., Fominykh M., Oyekoya O., Hokstad L.M., Prasolova-Førland E.: Teaching Threshold Concepts in Virtual Reality: Exploring the Conceptual Requirements for Systems Design. In: Fallmyr T (ed.) Norsk konferanse for organisasjoners bruk av informasjonsteknologi (NOKOBIT), Stavanger, Norway, November 18-20. Akademika forlag, Trondheim, Norway (2013). [21] E.M. Boyd A.W. Fales Reflective Learning: Key to Learning from Experience Journal of Humanistic Psychology 23 2 1983 99 117

Diesel Engine PT Pump Fault Diagnosis based on the Characteristics of its Fuel Pressure
In order to solve the problem that the diesel engine PT fuel system is unable to field maintain, developed a portable signal acquisition and analysis system for diesel engine PT fuel system. Firstly, the PT pump work Principle was analyzed, and the PT pump failure mapping relation between reason and failure phenomenon was analyzed; Secondly, the diesel engine PT pump failure fuel pressure characteristics were analyzed; Lastly, using the portable signal acquisition and analysis system to diagnose the diesel engine PT fuel system, experiment results show that the system can correctly detect the diesel engine PT fuel system state.In order to solve the problem that the diesel engine PT fuel system is unable to field maintain, developed a portable signal acquisition and analysis system for diesel engine PT fuel system. Firstly, the PT pump work Principle was analyzed, and the PT pump failure mapping relation between reason and failure phenomenon was analyzed; Secondly, the diesel engine PT pump failure fuel pressure characteristics were analyzed; Lastly, using the portable signal acquisition and analysis system to diagnose the diesel engine PT fuel system, experiment results show that the system can correctly detect the diesel engine PT fuel system state.
[1] Zhang Chunrun,Ma Hongwen, Zhao Jinsong, fault detection method based on the vibration intensity of Diesel Fuel Injection System off the oil [J]. Armored Force Engineering University, 2008, 22(4) :62-63. [2] M. Badaoui E.I. Daniere J. Guillet Separation of combustion noise and piston-slap in diesel engine-part I: separation of combustion noise and piston-slap in diesel engine by cyclic wiener filtering [J] Mechanical Systems and Signal Processing 19 2005 1209 1217 [3] X.H. Liu R.B. Randall Blind source separation of internal combustion engine piston slap from other measured vibration signals [J] Mechanical Systems and Signal Processing 19 2005 1196 1208 [4] Sun Yunling A. Zhe Park Zhang Yongxiang The internal combustion engine fault diagnosis research based on instantaneous speed and bispectrum [J] CSICE 22 3 2004 241 244 [5] Liu Yanbin Liu Jianmin Qiao Xinyong Diesel engine fuel supply advance angle detector research based on the vibration signal of [J] CSICE 25 6 2007 565 568

Analysis and Design of Cellular Beam and its Verification
The behavior of cellular beam is described using design methods according to BS: 5950, considering particularly the strength of tee sections and web post element. Such behavior is derived from parametric study involving finite element analysis using software ANSYS. The design method is based on plastic analysis of beam section at ultimate loads and elastic analysis at serviceability loads. The procedure of design of cellular beam is illustrated and an example based on design method is worked out and its verification is done for checking the suitability.The behavior of cellular beam is described using design methods according to BS: 5950, considering particularly the strength of tee sections and web post element. Such behavior is derived from parametric study involving finite element analysis using software ANSYS. The design method is based on plastic analysis of beam section at ultimate loads and elastic analysis at serviceability loads. The procedure of design of cellular beam is illustrated and an example based on design method is worked out and its verification is done for checking the suitability.
[1] R.M. Lawson Design for opening in the webs of composite beams Steel construction institute 1988 [2] British standards institution BS 5950; Structural use of steelwork in building, Part 1, 3.1,4,1985 and 1988. [3] R.G. Redwood Design of beam with web holes Canadian steel industry construction council, Canada 1973 [4] H.C. Olander A method of calculating stresses in rigid frame corners Journal of ASCE august 1953 [5] J.K. Ward Design of composite and non- composite cellular beams 100 1990 SCI publications

Research on Residents’ Low-Carbon Consumption in Heilongjiang Province
The low-carbon economic development has become the trend and orientation of regional economic development. As the residents of Heilongjiang province, their consumption is the most direct way to achieve the low-carbon lifestyle. Based on the research and discussion of the connotation of low-carbon consumption and its culture, behaviour, preferences and habits, it is concluded that the low-carbon consumption requires us to abide by the life-style of knowledge and culture. Therefore, it is obvious that the development of low-carbon economy is a complex and systematic project, involved the economic development mode, technological innovation mode, consumption values and changes of lifestyle.The low-carbon economic development has become the trend and orientation of regional economic development. As the residents of Heilongjiang province, their consumption is the most direct way to achieve the low-carbon lifestyle. Based on the research and discussion of the connotation of low-carbon consumption and its culture, behaviour, preferences and habits, it is concluded that the low-carbon consumption requires us to abide by the life-style of knowledge and culture. Therefore, it is obvious that the development of low-carbon economy is a complex and systematic project, involved the economic development mode, technological innovation mode, consumption values and changes of lifestyle.
[1] Liu Yuan Low-carbon Consumption — the Transformation of Chinese Residents’ Consumption. [D] Master's Degree Thesis of Jilin University 5 2012 9 16 [2] Chen Lu Study on the Problems and Countermeasures of Low-carbon Consumption [J] Chinese Commerce & Trade 33 2011 252 253 [3] Yu Xiaozhong, et al, Research on Low-carbon Consumption Pattern and its Guiding Strategies in different regions. [J]. Soft Science, 2013; 6:79. [4] Huang Zhimei Fen. Huang The Supporting System of Low-carbon Consumption mode [J] Chinese Population Resources and Environment 20 2010 233 236

Ecological Effect of Multi-walled Carbon Nanotubes on Marine Microalgae Pseudo-Nitzschia Pungens and Isochrysis Galbana
The paper presents the results of studies of the effect of multiwalled carbon nanotubes 18-20nm in concentrations of 1 and 10mg / ml for diatoms Pseudo-nitzschia pungens (clone PP-07) and golden alga Isochrysis galbana (clone TISO). The toxic effects of multiwalled nanotubes on both types of algae is revealed, which results in a decrease of the linear dimensions of cells, chloroplasts, and a reduced number of cells when incubated over 24h (Pseudo-nitzschia pungens) and 36hours (Isochrysis galbana).The paper presents the results of studies of the effect of multiwalled carbon nanotubes 18-20nm in concentrations of 1 and 10mg / ml for diatoms Pseudo-nitzschia pungens (clone PP-07) and golden alga Isochrysis galbana (clone TISO). The toxic effects of multiwalled nanotubes on both types of algae is revealed, which results in a decrease of the linear dimensions of cells, chloroplasts, and a reduced number of cells when incubated over 24h (Pseudo-nitzschia pungens) and 36hours (Isochrysis galbana).
[1] M. Monthioux V. Kuznetsov Who should be given the credit for the discovery of carbon nanotubes? Carbon 44 2006 1621 1623 [2] G. Jia H. Wang L. Yan X. Wang R. Pei T. Yan Y. Zhao X. Guo Cytotoxicity of carbon nanomaterials: single-wall nanotube, multi-wall nanotube, and fullerene Environ. Sci. Technol. 39 2005 1378 1383 [3] M. Bottini S. Bruckner K. Nika N. Bottini S. Bellucci A. Magrini A. Bergamaschi T. Mustelin Multi-walled carbon nanotubes induce T-lymphocyte apoptosis Toxicol. Lett. 160 2006 121 126 [4] K.S. Golokhvast V.V. Chaika V.L. Kuznetsov K.V. Elumeeva M.I. Kusaikin A.M. Zakharenko N.N. Kiselev A.M. Panichev G.V. Reva V.V. Usov I.V. Reva T. Yamamoto Gul’kov AN. Effects of Multiwalled Carbon Nanotubes Received Orally during 6 Days on the Gastrointestinal Tract //Bulletin of Experimental Biology and Medicine 155 6 2013 788 792 [5] A. Baun N.B. Hartmann K. Grieger K.O. Kusk Ecotoxicity of engineered nanoparticles to aquatic invertebrates: A brief review and recommendations for future toxicity testing (review) Ecotoxicology 17 5 2008 387 395 [6] K.W. Kwok K.M. Leung E. Flahaut J. Cheng S.H. Cheng Chronic toxicity of double-walled carbon nanotubes to three marine organisms: Influence of different dispersion methods //Nanomedicine 5 6 2010 951 961 [7] D.N. Matorin A.V. Karateyeva V.A. Osipov E.P. Lukashev N.K. Seifullina A.B. Rubin Influence of carbon nanotubes on chlorophyll fluorescence parameters of green algae Chlamydomonas reinhardtii Nanotechnologies in Russia 5 5–6 2010 320 327 [8] D.N. Matorin D.A. Todorenko N.K. Seifullina B.K. Zayadan A.B. Rubin Effect of silver nanoparticles on the parameters of chlorophyll fluorescence and P700 reaction in the green alga Chlamydomonas reinhardtii Microbiology (Russian Federation) 82 6 2013 809 814 [9] Z. Long J. Ji K. Yang D. Lin F. Wu Systematic and quantitative investigation of the mechanism of carbon nanotubes’ toxicity toward Algae Environ. Sci. Technol 46 15 2012 8458 8466 [10] Orlova TYu, Ayzdaycher NA, Stonik IV. Laboratory cultivation of sea algae, including producers of phycotoxins: manual book. Vladivostok: Dalnauka, 2010. [11] Hallegraeff GM. Harmful algal blooms: a global overview /In G.M. Hallegraeff, D.M. Anderson  &  A.D. Cembella (Eds.), Manual on Harmful Marine Microalgae, 2003.

Application of Retrospective Environmental Carrying Capacity Assessment for Marine Reclamation
The retrospective assessment of environmental carrying capacity aims to obtain the historical development situation of reclamation domain, it's an essential tool for improving the managed level and guiding the environmental management of reclamation. In this paper, a synthetic assessment method based on cloud theory is applied to evaluate the single factor and multiple factors environmental carrying capacity in Caofeidian marine district, Tangshan Bay, China. With the field data of five assessment indexes in recent six years, the assessment results are obtained which show that the marine reclamation has a certain impact for the marine environment.The retrospective assessment of environmental carrying capacity aims to obtain the historical development situation of reclamation domain, it's an essential tool for improving the managed level and guiding the environmental management of reclamation. In this paper, a synthetic assessment method based on cloud theory is applied to evaluate the single factor and multiple factors environmental carrying capacity in Caofeidian marine district, Tangshan Bay, China. With the field data of five assessment indexes in recent six years, the assessment results are obtained which show that the marine reclamation has a certain impact for the marine environment.
[1] Q. Si M.C. Li G.Y. Zhang Set pair analysis method for water quality evaluation based on nonlinear power function[J] Appl. Mech. Mater. 573-574 2012 497 500 [2] L.H. Feng J.Y. Wang M.Z. Zhang Grey clustering evaluation of environmental quality[J] Environ. Protect. Sci. 26 2000 37 39 [3] M.C. Li G.Y. Zhang X.Y. You Set pair analysis method with nonlinear membership function for sea water quality assessment[J] J. Hebei Univ. Technol. 39 2010 81 86 [4] Li D.Y., Du Y. Artificial intelligence with uncertainty[M]. Beijing: National Defence Industry Press, 2005. [5] M.C. Li G.Y. Zhang Q. Si Synthetic assessment method with cloud theory for marine water quality[J] Appl. Mech. Mater. 295–298 2013 821 826 [6] M.C. Li S.X. Liang Z.C. Sun Optimal estimation for key parameters of the marine quality model using data-driven neural network[J] J. Mar. Sci. Technol. 18 2010 771 779 [7] State Bureau of Environmental Protection, State Bureau of Technical Supervision. Sea water quality standard (GB 3097-1997) [S]. Beijing: China Environmental Science Press, 1997:2.

Influence of Catalysts on Water-Gas Shift Reaction and Hydrogen Recovery
This study is focused on the water-gas shift reaction (WGSR), occurring in the chemical kinetics equipment, which is used to increase hydrogen recovery from industrial processes. The research deals with comparing hydrogen recovery with the use of three different catalysts. The amount of the produced hydrogen depends considerably on the reaction state and the catalyst composition. To improve the course of the reaction, natural catalysts – calcite, coal char (unburned residues from coal) and modified olivine – are added to the gasification process and heated to the process temperature of 800, 850 and 900oC.This study is focused on the water-gas shift reaction (WGSR), occurring in the chemical kinetics equipment, which is used to increase hydrogen recovery from industrial processes. The research deals with comparing hydrogen recovery with the use of three different catalysts. The amount of the produced hydrogen depends considerably on the reaction state and the catalyst composition. To improve the course of the reaction, natural catalysts – calcite, coal char (unburned residues from coal) and modified olivine – are added to the gasification process and heated to the process temperature of 800, 850 and 900oC.
[1] EFFENDI, A., K. HELLGARDT, Z.-G. ZHANG a T. YOSHIDA. Optimising H2 production from model biogas via combined steam reforming and CO shift reactions. Fuel. 2005, Vol. 84, pp. 869-874. [2] World Energy Outlook 2006, Organisation for Economic Co – operation and Development, France: Paris, 2006, 600 pp., ISBN 92-64-10989-7. [3] OBERMAJER, J. a B. DVOŘÁK.  Katalyzátory pro konverzi syntézního plynu . Chemické listy. 2002, Vol. 96, pp. 685-692. [4] Sun Y, Hla SS, Duffy GJ, Cousins AJ, French D, Morpeth LD, et al.  Effect of Ce on the structural features and catalytic properties of La La(0.9_x) CexFeO3 perovskite-like catalysts for the  high temperature water-gas shift reaction. Int J Hydrogen Energy 36, 2010, pp. 79-86. [5] BIČÁKOVÁ, O.:  Možnosti výroby vodíku biologickými procesy.  Paliva, Vol.2, 2010, pp. 103-112. ISSN 1804-2058. [6] KONIECZNY, A., MONDAL, K., WILTOWSKI, T., DYDO, P.:  Catalyst development for termocatalystic decomposition of methane to hydrogen.  International Journal of Hydrogen Energy 33, 2008, pp. 264-272. [7] GUPTA, R.B.: Hydrogen Fuel:  Production, Storage, and Transport . 1st. Ed., 2008. ISBN: 978-1420045758. [8] Strategická výzkumná agenda vodíkových technologií. Česká vodíková technologická platforma (HYTEP – Hydrogen Technology Platform.  Podpora vodíkových technologií v ČR . Únor 2010, pp. 7-16. [9] Loiacono, Technip KTI SpA, Italy: Hydrocarbon Eng.  2001 , pp. 45. [10] PALMOVÁ, I., SCHÖNGUT, J., et al.:  Perspektivy výroby a využití vodíku.  Chemické Listy 2004, 98, pp. 205-210. ISSN 1213-7103. [11] ABU EL-RUB Z, BRAMER EA, BREM G:  Review of Catalyst for Tar Elimination in Biomass Gasification Processes . Ind. Eng. Chem. Res 43, 6911-6919 (2004). [12] Kirk-Othmer. Encyclopedia of Chemical Technology, 4th. ed., vol. 13, New York: John Wiley  &  Sons 1995, pp. 838-894. [13] SATTERFIELD, C.N.:  Heterogeneous Catalysis in Industrial Praktice , 2nd ed., McGraw-Hill: New York 1991. [14] EL-OSTA W, ZEGHLAM J.: Hydrogen as a fuel for the transportation sector: possibilities and views for future applications in Libya. Appl Energy 2000;65:165. [15] DEMIRBAS A . Biohydrogen for future engine fuel demands . London, England: Springer; 2009. [16] SHANGGUAN J, MIAO M, CHANG L. Desulfurization matching with coal poly generation system based on dual gas resources. Fuel 89, 2010, pp. 7-833. Stoll R. E., Linde F.: Hydrocarbon Process 79, 2000, pp. 42. [17] The Online Guide to Chemistry: Great chemistry review and AP, ACS, IB test preparation, Equilibrium:The Law of Mass Action. [online]. c2013 [cit. 2013-12-10]. Online: http://www.chem.chizeng.com/equilibrium/. [18] GRÖBL T., WALTER H., HAIDER M., Biomass steam gasification for production of SNG – Process design and sensitivity analysis, Applied Energy, Vol. 97, September 2012, pp 451-461, ISSN 0306-2619 http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.apenergy.2012.01.038.

The Study on Flocculation Treating Wastewater from Domestic Animals and Poultry Breeding
Several inorganic flocculating agents, including FeSO4, Al2(SO4)3, FeCl3 and an organic coagulant aid PAM, were used to treat the wastewater from domestic anima and poultry breeding in this paper. The ideal operating conditions were attained by single factor experiment and orthogonal design experiment. And the ideal operating conditions are follows: the dose of FeSO4 and PAM is 135.2mg/L and 0.384mg/L respectively when keeping the pH 10; and the corresponding removal rate is 55% and 60% for COD and turbidity. Based on the experimental results, this paper analyzes the main factors that affect wastewater flocculation treatment.Several inorganic flocculating agents, including FeSO4, Al2(SO4)3, FeCl3 and an organic coagulant aid PAM, were used to treat the wastewater from domestic anima and poultry breeding in this paper. The ideal operating conditions were attained by single factor experiment and orthogonal design experiment. And the ideal operating conditions are follows: the dose of FeSO4 and PAM is 135.2mg/L and 0.384mg/L respectively when keeping the pH 10; and the corresponding removal rate is 55% and 60% for COD and turbidity. Based on the experimental results, this paper analyzes the main factors that affect wastewater flocculation treatment.
[1] K.Q. Zhang H.Y. Gao Treatment and disposal methods for Livestock and poultry breeding pollutants 2004 Chemical industrial press Beijing 164 [2] The natural ecological protection division, The state environmental protection administration. The national survey on the pollution from large-scale animal and poultry breeding industry and the related prevention measures. Beijing: China; 2002. pp 47, 49. [3] B.Y. Li G.W. Gu Experimental research on flocculation treatment of mixed wastewater from chemistry industry Sichuan Environment 23 5 2004 1 3 [4] Q.S. Wang H.D. Li G.N. Zhang H.J. WU C.Z. Liang G.Q. Chang Study on purification of oily wastewater by effective complex flocculants Research of Environmental Sciences 13 6 2000 34 36 [5] P.Q. Fu J. Lin Y.X. Wang H.D. Cheng C.Q. Liu Experimental study on the flocculation treatment of paper mill wastewater Earth and Environment 30 1 2003 87 91 [6] L.S. Zhang L.L. Jiang Decolourization characteristic and mechanism of coagulate in treating dye wastewater Journal of Southeast University(Natural Science Edition) 30 4 2000 72 76 [7] J.H. Lu H.B. Wang H.P. Liu The mechanisms of organic pollutants removal in coking-plant wastewater by flocculation Industrial Water Treatment 20 6 2000 20 22 [8] The 2th editorial office, China standard press. National standard assembly of water quality analysis methods. Beijing: China standard press; 1996. pp 154-166. [9] S.Y. Tang Y.Z. Dai Water treatment engineer manual 2001 Chemical industrial press Beijing 120 [10] X.P. Yang S.H. Wang Study on treatment of organ chlorine pesticide wastewater by flocculation Environmental science  &  technology 27 4 2004 12 13

Lightning Threat Forecast Simulation Using the Schrodinger-electrostatic Algorithm
Many models have been propounded for forecasting lightning. Though majority of the model had shown accuracy, the response time in detecting natural phenomenon is quite low. In this model, we used the mathematical experimentation of the micro scale plasmas to develop the macro scale atmospheric plasma which we believe is a major influence of lightning. The Schrödinger-electrostatic algorithm was propounded to further increase both the accuracy and alacrity of detecting natural phenomena. According to our theoretical experimentation, the air density plays a major role in lightning forecast. Our guess was verified using the Davis Weather Station to track the air density both in the upper and lower atmosphere. The air density in the upper atmosphere showed prospect as a vital factor for lightning forecast.Many models have been propounded for forecasting lightning. Though majority of the model had shown accuracy, the response time in detecting natural phenomenon is quite low. In this model, we used the mathematical experimentation of the micro scale plasmas to develop the macro scale atmospheric plasma which we believe is a major influence of lightning. The Schrödinger-electrostatic algorithm was propounded to further increase both the accuracy and alacrity of detecting natural phenomena. According to our theoretical experimentation, the air density plays a major role in lightning forecast. Our guess was verified using the Davis Weather Station to track the air density both in the upper and lower atmosphere. The air density in the upper atmosphere showed prospect as a vital factor for lightning forecast.
[1] Takashi Nagatani Laplacian growth phenomena with the third boundary condition: Crossover from dense structure to diffusion-limited aggregation fractal Phys. Rev. A 40 1989 7286 7291 [2] M. Boris Smirnov Phenomena of growth of fractal systems Sov. Phys. Usp 32 1989 941 [3] M. Duran and G. L. Vasconcelos. Loewner equation for Laplacian growth: A Schwarz-Christoffel-transformation approach. Journal of Physics: Conference Series; 2010246. [4] H. Takashi Nagatani Eugene Stanley Double crossover phenomena in laplacian growth:effects of sticking probabilityand finite viscosity ratio Phys.Rev. A 41 1990 3263 3269 [5] Theodore Kim Jason Sewall Avneesh Sud Ming C. Lin. Fast Simulation of Laplacian Growth IEEE Computer Graphics  &  Applications 27 2 2007 68 76 [6] Stewart A. Fotheringham Michael Batty A. Longley Paul Diffusion-limited aggregation and the fractal nature of urban growth Paper of the Regional Science 67 1989 65 69 [7] R.H. Holzworth M.P. McCarthy R.F. Pfaff A.R. Jacobson W.L. Willcockson D.E. Rowland Lightning-generated whistler waves observed by probes on the Communication/Navigation Outage Forecast System satellite at low latitudes Journal of Geophysical Research: Space Physics 116 2 2011 1 7 [8] Farnaz Araghi Davoud Dorranian Effect of negative ions on the characteristics of plasma in a cylindrical discharge Journal of Theoretical and Applied Physics 7 41 2013 1 8

Research on Application of Design Semantics in Space Environment
Design semantics is an integration of human mode of existence and view on culture and art, which means it is a unity of art and science. Design semantics is the annotation of form and the reflection of its symbolic meaning, which means it is an explanation of the deposited human cultural spirit. Chinese art stresses Expression, Force and Qi. In China, people advocate “to learn from nature”, “to look up to observe the sun, the moon and stars, and look down to observe the surroundings”, and take “Nature and Man in One” as the highest state of spirit. Design semantics is expressed in space environment design through a symbiotic philosophical view that natural and artificial forms are complementary and interactive. This form of design leads humans back to a better state of living, i.e. Nature and Man in One.Design semantics is an integration of human mode of existence and view on culture and art, which means it is a unity of art and science. Design semantics is the annotation of form and the reflection of its symbolic meaning, which means it is an explanation of the deposited human cultural spirit. Chinese art stresses Expression, Force and Qi. In China, people advocate “to learn from nature”, “to look up to observe the sun, the moon and stars, and look down to observe the surroundings”, and take “Nature and Man in One” as the highest state of spirit. Design semantics is expressed in space environment design through a symbiotic philosophical view that natural and artificial forms are complementary and interactive. This form of design leads humans back to a better state of living, i.e. Nature and Man in One.
[1] Liu Guanzhong. Design Methodology. Higher Education Press; 2011. [2] Li Chengwang, Ai Silin. Introduction to “The German Ideology”. NPCPub; 2012. [3] Sheng Ning. Humanity Perplexity and Reflection. SDX Joint Publishing Company; 1997:270. [4] Liang Qichao. On Freedom - Mind. Zhonghua Book Company; 1989. [5] Lin Shu. Eight Should-knows for Classic Proses of Chun Juezhai. Dumen Printing House; 1916.

Framework for Evaluating Sustainability of Transport System in Megalopolis and its Application
It has been acknowledged that megalopolises are playing a leading role in the processes of both economic development and culture change. Thereupon, the new emphases on sustainability of transportation system in megalopolis are creating new demands for adequate approach to measure its performance and diagnosis potential drawbacks. By examining the descriptions of sustainable transport system as well as its evaluating approach, a framework with the general applicability and easily accessible data resource for evaluating sustainability of transport system in megalopolis is developed based on nature of regional structure and the feature transport demand in megalopolis. The proposed framework is applied in the analysis and comparison of Jing-Jin-Ji and Yangtze River Delta..It has been acknowledged that megalopolises are playing a leading role in the processes of both economic development and culture change. Thereupon, the new emphases on sustainability of transportation system in megalopolis are creating new demands for adequate approach to measure its performance and diagnosis potential drawbacks. By examining the descriptions of sustainable transport system as well as its evaluating approach, a framework with the general applicability and easily accessible data resource for evaluating sustainability of transport system in megalopolis is developed based on nature of regional structure and the feature transport demand in megalopolis. The proposed framework is applied in the analysis and comparison of Jing-Jin-Ji and Yangtze River Delta..
[1] Mihyeon Jeon, C., A.A. Amekudzi, and J. Vanegas, Transportation system sustainability issues in high-, middle-, and low-income economies: Case studies from Georgia (U.S.), South Korea, Colombia, and Ghana. Journal of Urban Planning and Development, 2006. 132(3): 172-186. [2] Frey, W.H., et al., Tracking Metropolitan America into the 21st Century: A Field Guide to the New Metropolitan and Micropolitan Definitions. 2004, Brookings Institution. [3] A. Roy The 21st-Century Metropolis---New Geographies of Theory Regional Studies 43 6 2009 12 [4] K. Newton Metropolitan governance European Political Science 11 3 2012 409 419 [5] Heinelt, H. and D. Kubler, Metropolitan Governance in the 21st Century: Capacity, Democracy and the Dynamics of Place. 2005, 2 Park Square, Miltom Park, Abingdon, Oxon OX14 4RN: Routledge. [6] Litman, T., Developing indicators for comprehensive and sustainable transport planning. Transportation Research Record: Journal of the Transportation Research Board, 2007. 2017(1): p. 10-15. [7] C.M. Jeon A. Amekudzi Addressing sustainability in transportation systems: Definitions, indicators, and metrics, Journal of Infrastructure Systems 11 1 2005 31 50 [8] F. Mameli G. Marletto Can National Survey Data be Used to Select a Core Set of Sustainability Indicators for Monitoring Urban Mobility Policies? International Journal of Sustainable Transportation 8 5 2012 336 359 [9] A.A. Rassafi M. Vaziri Sustainable transport indicators: Definition and integration International Journal of Environmental Science and Technology 2 1 2005 83 96 [10] EEA. Nitrogen oxide emissions still a major problem in Europe. 2014; Available from: http://www.eea.europa.eu/highlights/nitrogen-oxide-emissions-still-a. [11] Samberg, S., A. Bassok, and S. Holman, Method for Evaluation of Sustainable Transportation. Transportation Research Record: Journal of the Transportation Research Board, 2011. 2242(-1): p. 1-8. [12] Sayers, T.M., A.T. Jessop, and P.J. Hills, Multi-criteria evaluation of transport options—flexible, transparent and user-friendly? Transport Policy, 2003. 10(2): p. 95-105. [13] Figueira, J.E., S. Greco, and M. Ehrgott, Multiple Criteria Decision Analysis: State of the Art Surveys. 2005, London: Kluwer Academic Publishers. [14] B. Leng Spatial characteristics and complex analysis: A perspective from basic activities of urban networks in China Acta Geographica Sinica 66 2 2011 199 211 [15] NDRC, Regional Planning of Jin-Jin-Ji megalopolis, T.S.C.o.C. National Development and Reform Commission, Editor. 2010: Beijing.

Intelligent Power Consumption Management Systems
In this paper we consider problems of creating and introducing intelligent management systems as one of the most important mechanism of increasing energy efficiency in industry. Operating principles of intelligent electric power distribution systems developed in MSTU «STANKIN» for AC and DC grids on industrial plants are described. Essential devices composing the systems are considered, their technical characteristics are described. Experimental results are presented.In this paper we consider problems of creating and introducing intelligent management systems as one of the most important mechanism of increasing energy efficiency in industry. Operating principles of intelligent electric power distribution systems developed in MSTU «STANKIN» for AC and DC grids on industrial plants are described. Essential devices composing the systems are considered, their technical characteristics are described. Experimental results are presented.
[1] IEC Smart Grid Standardization Roadmap, SMB Smart Grid Strategic Group (SG3). [2] M. Tarafdar Haque A.M. Kashtiban Application of Neural Network in Power system, A Review, World Academy of Science Engineering and Technology 2005 53 57 [3] European Smart Grids Technology Platform Smart Grids, Vision and Strategy for Europe Electricity Networks of the Future, 2006. [4] Technology roadmap, Smart Grid/International Energy Agency, 2011. [5] Kolechitskaya N.A., Lazarev N.S., Shul’Gara R.N., Zmieva K.A. Ferroresonant phenomena on 6- to 10-kV substation buses //Russian Electrical Engineering. Volume 84, Issue 4, April 2013, Pages 177-184. [6] K.A. Zmieva Methods for using automatic compensators for reactive power to increase power efficiency of electric-drive control in metal-removal machine tools //Russian Electrical Engineering 80 11 2009 604 609

Window Query and Analysis on Massive Spatio-temporal Data
Along with the expansion of computer-based climate simulations, efficient visualization and analysis of massive climate data are becoming more important than ever. In this paper, we try to explore the factors behide climate changes by combining window query and time-varying data mining techniques. With constant query time and acceptable storage cost, the algorithms presented support various queries on 3d time-varying datasets, such as average, min, and max value. A new time-varying data analysis algorithm is given, which is especially suitable for analyzing big data. All these algorithms have been implemented on and integrated into a visual analysis system, with tiled-LCD ultra-resolution display. Experimental results on several datasets from practical applications are presented.Along with the expansion of computer-based climate simulations, efficient visualization and analysis of massive climate data are becoming more important than ever. In this paper, we try to explore the factors behide climate changes by combining window query and time-varying data mining techniques. With constant query time and acceptable storage cost, the algorithms presented support various queries on 3d time-varying datasets, such as average, min, and max value. A new time-varying data analysis algorithm is given, which is especially suitable for analyzing big data. All these algorithms have been implemented on and integrated into a visual analysis system, with tiled-LCD ultra-resolution display. Experimental results on several datasets from practical applications are presented.
[1] Wang. Bin A typical type of high performance computation: earth system modeling: earth system simulation [J] Physics 38 08 2009 0-0 [2] D. Keim G. Andrienko J.D. Fekete Visual analytics: definition, process and challenges [M] 2008 Springer Berlin Heidelberg [3] Schroeder W, Martin K, Lorensen B. The Visualization toolkit: an object-oriented approach to 3D graphics 1998[J]. 1996. [4] “VisIt Web Site”, Lawrence Livermore National Laboratory,  http://www.llnl.gov/visit . [5] P.C. Wong H.W. Shen C.R. Johnson The top 10 challenges in extreme-scale visual analytics [J] IEEE computer graphics and applications 32 4 2012 63 [6] Bo li. Algorithm research on geometric range query [D]. Harbin University of Science and Technology, 2008. [7] Shi Q, JaJa J F. Efficient techniques for range search queries on earth science data [C]//Scientific and Statistical Database Management, 2002. Proceedings. 14th International Conference on. IEEE, 2002: 142-151. [8] Samet H. Foundations of multidimensional and metric data structures [M]. Morgan Kaufmann, 2006. [9] D.M. Mount E. Park A dynamic data structure for approximate range searching [C]//Proceedings of the twenty-sixth annual symposium on Computational geometry ACM 2010 247 256 [10] Fischer J, Heun V. Theoretical and practical improvements on the RMQ-problem, with applications to LCA and LCE [C]//Combinatorial Pattern Matching. Springer Berlin Heidelberg, 2006: 36-48. [11] M.A. Bender M. Farach-Colton The level ancestor problem simplified [J] Theoretical Computer Science 321 1 2004 5 12 [12] Lin J, Keogh E, Lonardi S, et al. Visually mining and monitoring massive time series [C]//Proceedings of the tenth ACM SIGKDD international conference on Knowledge discovery and data mining. ACM, 2004: 460-469. [13] Keim D A, Nietzschmann T, Schelwies N, et al. A spectral visualization system for analyzing financial time series data [C]//EuroVis. 2006: 195-202. [14] R. Rew G. Davis NetCDF: an interface for scientific data access [J] Computer Graphics and Applications, IEEE 10 4 1990 76 82

Improving HPC Application Performance in Public Cloud
Improving as well as evaluating the performance of High Performance Computing (HPC) applications by migrating them to Cloud environments are widely considered as critical issues in the field of high performance and Cloud computing. However, poor network performance, heterogeneous and dynamic environments are some series of pitfalls for execution of HPC applications in Cloud. This paper proposes a new approach to improve the performance and scalability of HPC applications on Amazon's HPC Cloud. The evidence from our approach points a significant improvement in speed up and scale up with the response rate of more than 20 percent parallel efﬁciency on the Cloud in comparison to dedicated HPC cluster. We state that the EC2 Cloud system is a feasible platform for deploying on-demand, small sized HPC applications.Improving as well as evaluating the performance of High Performance Computing (HPC) applications by migrating them to Cloud environments are widely considered as critical issues in the field of high performance and Cloud computing. However, poor network performance, heterogeneous and dynamic environments are some series of pitfalls for execution of HPC applications in Cloud. This paper proposes a new approach to improve the performance and scalability of HPC applications on Amazon's HPC Cloud. The evidence from our approach points a significant improvement in speed up and scale up with the response rate of more than 20 percent parallel efﬁciency on the Cloud in comparison to dedicated HPC cluster. We state that the EC2 Cloud system is a feasible platform for deploying on-demand, small sized HPC applications.
[1] R. Buyya, C.S. Yeo, S. Venugopal, J. Broberg, and I. Brandic, “Cloud Computing and Emerging IT Platforms: Vision, Hype, and Reality for Delivering Computing as the 5th Utility” Future Generation Computer Systems, vol. 25, no. 6, June 2009, pp 599-616, Elsevier Science, Amsterdam, Netherlands. [2] “Amazon Elastic Compute Cloud”, available at “http://aws.amazon.com/ec2”, accessed on 15/05/2014. [3] A. Iosup, S. Ostermann, N. Yigitbasi, R. Prodan, T. Fahringer, and D. Epema, “Performance Analysis of Cloud Computing Services for Many-Tasks Scientiﬁc Computing”, IEEE Trans. Parallel Distrib. Syst., vol. 22, pp. 931-945, June 2011. [4] A. Iosup et al., “Performance Analysis of Cloud Computing Services for Many-Tasks Scientiﬁc Computing”, Parallel and Distributed Systems, IEEE Transactions on, vol. 22, no. 6, pp. 931-945, June 2011. [5] A. Gupta and D. Milojicic, “Evaluation of HPC Applications on Cloud”, in Open Cirrus Summit, Atlanta, GA, pp. 22-26, Oct 2011. [6] “Sirius cluster”, available at “http://wwwvhr.informatik.uni-rostock.de/vhr_cluster.html”, accessed on 15/05/2014. [7] Rashid Hassani, Riaz Choudhury, and Peter Luksch, “Analysis of Sparse Matrix-Vector Multiplication Using Iterative Method in CUDA”, IEEE NAS 2013, ISBN: 978-0-7695-5034-3/13, pp. 262-266, DOI: 10.1109/NAS. 2013.41, July 2013. [8] Rashid Hassani, and Peter Luksch, “High Performance Concurrent Multi-Path Communication for MPI”, EuroPVM/MPI 2012, Springer LNCS 7490, pp. 285-286, DOI: 10.1007/978-3-642-33518-1_34, Sep 2012. [9] Rashid Hassani and Peter Luksch, “Scalable High Performance Computing in Wide Area Network”, HPCS 2012, ISBN: 978-1-4673-2362-8/12, pp. 684-686, DOI: 10.1109/HPCSim.2012.6266993, July 2012. [10] Rashid Hassani, and Peter Luksch, “Optimizing Bandwidth by Employing MPLS AToM with QoS Support”, IEEE NAS 2012, ISBN: 978-0-7695-4722-0/12, pp. 104-108, DOI: 10.1109/NAS. 2012.18, June 2012. [11] Rashid Hassani, and Peter Luksch, “DMT: A new Approach of DiffServ QoS Methodology”, AICT 2012, ISBN: 978-1-61208-199-1, pp. 179-183, May 2012. [12] J. Ekanayake, X. Qiu, T. Gunarathne, S. Beason, and G. C. Fox, “High Performance Parallel Computing with Clouds and Cloud Technologies”, CRC Press (Taylor and Francis), July 2010. [13] Q. He, S. Zhou, B. Kobler, D. Duffy, and T. McGlynn, “Case study for running HPC applications in public clouds”, ACM International Symposium on High Performance Distributed Computing, ser. HPDC ‘10. New York, NY, USA:;1; ACM, pp. 395-401, 2010. [14] K. R. Jackson, L. Ramakrishnan, K. Muriki, S. Canon, S. Cholia, J. Shalf, H.J. Wasserman, and N. J. Wright, “Performance analysis of high performance computing applications on the amazon web services cloud”, in CloudCom’10, 2010. [15] Yan Zhai, Mingliang Liu, Jidong Zhai, Xiaosong Ma, and Wenguang Chen, “Cloud versus in-house cluster: Evaluating Amazon cluster compute instances for running MPI applications”, International Conference in High Performance Computing, Networking, Storage and Analysis (SC2011), pp. 1-10, 2011. [16] L. Rashid, W. Hassanein, and M. Hammad, “Analyzing and enhancing the parallel sort operation on multithreaded architectures”, Journal of Supercomputing, vol. 53, no. 2, pp. 293-312, 2010. [17] “Magellan - Argonne's DoE Cloud Computing”, available at “http://magellan.alcf.anl.gov”, accessed on 15/05/2014. [18] “Nebula Cloud Computing Platform”, available at “http://nebula.nasa.gov”, accessed on 15/05/2014. [19] Kun Zhou, Minmin Gong, Xin Huang, and Baining Guo, “Data-Parallel Octrees for Surface Reconstruction”, IEEE Transactions on Visualization  &  Computer Graphics, 2010. [20] Nadathur Satish et al., “Fast sort on CPUs and GPUs: a case for bandwidth oblivious SIMD sort”, pp. 351-362, 2010. [21] Guojing Cong, George Almasi, and Vijay Saraswat, “Fast PGAS Implementation of Distributed Graph Algorithms”, ACM/IEEE International Conference for High Performance Computing, Networking, Storage and Analysis (SC’10), pp. 1-11, 2010. [22] Duane. M, Andrew. G, “High Performance and Scalable Radix Sorting”, Department of Computer Science, University of Virginia Charlottesville, Virginia, USA, Jan 2011. [23] Rashid Hassani, Ganesh Chavan and Peter Luksch, “Optimization of Communication in MPI-Based Clusters”, IEEE computer society, CyberC 2014, Oct 2014.

Distributionally Extended Network-based Word Sense Disambiguation in Semantic Clustering of Polish Texts
In the paper we present an extended version of the graph-based unsupervised Word Sense Disambiguation algorithm. The algorithm is based on the spreading activation scheme applied to the graphs dynamically built on the basis of the text words and a large wordnet. The algorithm, originally proposed for English and Princeton WordNet, was adapted to Polish and plWordNet. An extension based on the knowledge acquired from the corpus-derived Measure of Semantic Relatedness was proposed. The extended algorithm was evaluated against the manually disambiguated corpus. We observed improvement in the case of the disambiguation performed for shorter text contexts. In addition the algorithm application expressed improvement in document clustering task.In the paper we present an extended version of the graph-based unsupervised Word Sense Disambiguation algorithm. The algorithm is based on the spreading activation scheme applied to the graphs dynamically built on the basis of the text words and a large wordnet. The algorithm, originally proposed for English and Princeton WordNet, was adapted to Polish and plWordNet. An extension based on the knowledge acquired from the corpus-derived Measure of Semantic Relatedness was proposed. The extended algorithm was evaluated against the manually disambiguated corpus. We observed improvement in the case of the disambiguation performed for shorter text contexts. In addition the algorithm application expressed improvement in document clustering task.
[1] Yoan Gutiérrez Sonia Vázquez Andrés Montoyo A graph-Based Approach to WSD Using Relevant Semantic Trees and N-Cliques Model Computational Linguistics and Intelligent Text Processing LNCS 7181 2012 225 237 [2] George Tsatsaronis Iraklis Varlamis Kjetil Norvag An Experimental Study on Unsupervised Graph-based Word Sense Disambiguation LNCS 6008 2010 184 198 [3] R. Mihalcea P. Tarau E. Figa Pagerank on semantic networks with application to word sense disambiguation In Proc. of COLING 2004 [4] E. Agirre A. Soroa Personalizing pagerank for word sense disambiguation In Proc. Of EACL 2009 33 41 [5] R. Navigli Online word sense disambiguation with structural semantic interconnections In Proc. of EACL 2006 [6] R. Sinha R. Mihalcea Unsupervised graph-based word sense disambiguation using measures of word semantic similarity In Proc. of ICSC 2007 [7] Eneko Agirre Aitor Soroa Using the multilingual central repository for graph-based word sense disambiguation In Proc. of the Language Resources and Evaluation, ELRA 2008 [8] Eneko Agirre, Oier Lopez De Lacalle, Aitor Soroa. Knowledge-based wsd on specific domains: Performing better than generic supervised wsd. In Proceedings of the 21st International Jont Conference on Artifical Intelligence, IJCAI’09, pages 1501-1506, San Francisco, CA, USA, 2009. [9] Agirre Eneko Soroa Aitor Mark Stevenson Graph-based word sense disambiguation of biomedical documents Bioinformatics 26 22 2010 November 2889 2896 [10] Bartosz Broda, Michał Marcińczuk, Marek Maziarz, Adam Radziszewski and Adam Wardyński: KPWr: Towards a Free Corpus of Polish. LREC 2012. [11] Andrea Tagarelli George Karypis A Segment-based Approach To Clustering Multi-Topic Documents Text Mining Workshop, SIAM Datamining Conference 2008 [12] George Ying Zhao Karypis Hierarchical Clustering Algorithms for Document Datasets Data Mining and Knowledge Discovery 10 2 2005 141 168 [13] Christiane Fellbaum WordNet – An Electronic Lexical Database 1998 The MIT Press [14] Maziarz Marek Piasecki Maciej Rudnicka Ewa Szpakowicz Stan Beyond the transfer-and merge wordnet construction: plWordNet and a comparison with WordNet In Proc. of the Recent Advances in Natural Language Processing RANLP 2013, Hissar, Bulgaria, ACL 2013 2013 [15] Piasecki Maciej Szpakowicz Stanisław Broda Bartosz A Wordnet from the Ground Up Oficyna Wydawnicza Politechniki Wrocławskiej 2009

Improve Bayesian Network to Generating Vietnamese Sentence Reduction
Sentence reduction is one of approaches for text summarization that has been attracted many researchers and scholars of natural language processing field. In this paper, we present a method that generates sentence reduction and applying in Vietnamese text summarization using Bayesian Network model. Bayesian network model is used to find the best likelihood short sentence through compare difference of probability. Experimental results with 980 sentences, show that our method really effectively in generating sentence reduction that understandable, readable and exactly grammar.Sentence reduction is one of approaches for text summarization that has been attracted many researchers and scholars of natural language processing field. In this paper, we present a method that generates sentence reduction and applying in Vietnamese text summarization using Bayesian Network model. Bayesian network model is used to find the best likelihood short sentence through compare difference of probability. Experimental results with 980 sentences, show that our method really effectively in generating sentence reduction that understandable, readable and exactly grammar.
[1] Ann Arbor, et. al. Constraint based sentence compression: An integer programming 306 approach. Proceedings of the COLING/ACL 2006, pp 144-151, 2006. [2] Blanco, Roi; Lioma; Christina, Graph based term weighting for information retrieval, Information Retrieval, pp. 54-92, 2012. [3] Courtney Napoles; Chris Callison-Burch; Juri Ganitkevitch, Benjamin Van Durme; Paraphrastic Sentence Compression with a Character based Metric: Tightening without Deletion, Proceedings of the 49th Annual Meeting of the Association for Computational Linguistics, pp. 84-90, Portland, 2011. [4] David Vickrey; Daphne Koller, Sentence Simplification for Semantic Role Labeling, Proceedings of ACL-08: HLT, pp. 344-352, USA, 2008. [5] Hongyan Jing; Kathleen R. McKeown. Cut and paste based text summarization. In Proceedings of the 1st Conference of the North American Chapter of the Association for Computational Linguistics, pp 178-185, 2000. . [6] H. Jing; K. McKeown, The Decomposition of Human-Written Summary Sentences, Proceedings of the Annual International ACM SIGIR Conference on Research and Development in Information Retrieval, pp. 129-136, 1999. [7] H. Jing, Sentence reduction for automatic text summarization, Proceedings of the Conference on Applied Natural Language Processing, pp. 310-315, 2000. [8] H. Jing; K. R. McKeown, Cut and paste based text summarization, Proceedings of the North American chapter of the Association for Computa-tional Linguistics Conference, pp. 178-185, 2000. [9] Jenie Turner Eugen Charniak Supervised and unsupervised learning for sentence compression Proceedings of the 43rd Annual Meeting of the ACL 2005 290 297 [10] K. Knight D. Marcu Summarization beyond sentence extraction: A probabilistic approach to sentence compression Artif. Intell. 139 1 2002 91 107 [11] Lloret E; et.al, A. Towards building a competitive opinion summarization system: challenges and keys. In: Proceedings of the NAACL. Student Research Workshop and Doctoral Consortium. pp 72-77, 2009. [12] Lloret E; et.al, Experiments on summary-based opinion classification. In: Proceed-ings of the NAACL HLT 2010 workshop on computational approaches to analysis and generation of emotion in text. pp 107-115, 2010. [13] Lloret; et.al, Text summarisation in progress: a literature review, Springer Science  &  Business Media, pp.1-41, 2012. [14] Mani I, Automatic summarization. John Benjamins Publishing Co. Amsterdam, Philadelphia, USA,;1; 2001. [15] Mei Jian-ping; Chen, Lihui, Sum CR: A new subtopic-based extractive approach for text summarization, Knowledge and Information Systems 31.3 pp. 527-545, 2012. [16] Michel Galley; Kathleen McKeown. Lexicalized Markov grammars for sentence compression. Proceedings of the HLT-NAACL 2007, pp.180-187, 2007. [17] M.L. Nguyen; S. Horiguchi, A Sentence Reduction Using Syntax Control, Proc. Of 6th Information Retrieval with Asian Language, pp. 139-146, 2003. [18] Nguyen, M.L.; et.al, M. Probabilistic Sentence Reduction Using Support Vector Machines. Proceedings of the 20th international conference on Computational Linguistics, 2004. [19] M. Johnson; E. Charniak, A TAG-based noisy-channel model of speech repairs, Proceedings of the Annual Meeting of the Association for Computational Linguistics, pp. 33-39, 2004. [20] Stefan Riezler; Tracy H. King; Richard Crouch; An-nie Zaenen, Statistical sentence condensation using ambiguity packing and stochastic disambigua-tion methods for lexical functional grammar. Proceedings of HLT-NAACL 2003, pp. 118-125, Ed-monton, 2003. [21] V. Aho J.D. Ullman Properties of syntax directed translations Journal of Computer and System Sciences 3 1969 319 334 [22] Wu. Stochastic Inversion transduction grammars and bilingual parsing of parallel corpora Computational Linguistics 23 3 1997 377 404

Extended Access Control and Recommendation Methods for Enterprise Knowledge Management System
Knowledge Management (KM) is one of the hotspots for research in the past decade. In most cases, the number of users in a Knowledge Management System (KMS) is very large, and they are from varied departments, even other companies. In this paper, some defects when existing methods about access control and recommendation are deployed in KMS are analyzed to show that these widely-used approaches need to be extended. To overcome the deficiencies of previous work, this paper proposes an extended Role-Based Access Control (RBAC) method and a hybrid recommendation approach for Knowledge Management System. Also, a real-life system is presented to verify the proposed methodology.Knowledge Management (KM) is one of the hotspots for research in the past decade. In most cases, the number of users in a Knowledge Management System (KMS) is very large, and they are from varied departments, even other companies. In this paper, some defects when existing methods about access control and recommendation are deployed in KMS are analyzed to show that these widely-used approaches need to be extended. To overcome the deficiencies of previous work, this paper proposes an extended Role-Based Access Control (RBAC) method and a hybrid recommendation approach for Knowledge Management System. Also, a real-life system is presented to verify the proposed methodology.
[1] P. Quintas P. Lefrere G. Jones Knowledge management: a strategic agenda[J] Long range planning 30 3 1997 385 391 [2] Ferraiolo D. Kuhn., DR: Role-based access control[C]/15th National Computer Security Conference. 1992. [3] R.S. Sandhu E.J. Coynek H.L. Feinsteink Role-Based Access Control Models yz[J] IEEE computer 29 2 1996 38 47 [4] Luning Xia Jiwu Jing. An Administrative Model for Role-Based Access Control Using Hierarchical Namespace [J] Journal of computer research and development 44 12 2007 2020 2027 [5] Lilin Ma Hong Li A permission model of SaaS system based on RBAC [J] Computer application and software 27 4 2010 42 44 [6] Qi Li, Mingwei Xu, Xinwei Zhang . Towards a group-based RBAC model and decentralized user-role administration[C]//Distributed Computing Systems Workshops, 2008. ICDCS’08. 28th International Conference on. IEEE, 2008: 441-446. [7] Breese J S, Heckerman D, Kadie C. Empirical analysis of predictive algorithms for collaborative filtering[C]//Proceedings of the Fourteenth conference on Uncertainty in artificial intelligence. Morgan Kaufmann Publishers Inc., 1998: 43-52. [8] Liang Zhang, Bo Xiao, Jun Guo. An Approach of Selecting Right Neighbors for Collaborative Filtering[C]//Innovative Computing, Information and Control (ICICIC), 2009 Fourth International Conference on. IEEE, 2009: 1057-1060.

Numerical Solution for Kawahara Equation by Using Spectral Methods
Some nonlinear wave equations are more difficult to investigate mathematically, as no general analytical method for their solutions exists. The Exponential Time Differencing (ETD) technique requires minimum stages to obtain the requiredaccurateness, which suggests an efficient technique relatingto computational duration thatensures remarkable stability characteristicsupon resolving nonlinear wave equations. This article solves the diagonal example of Kawahara equation via the ETD Runge-Kutta 4 technique. Implementation of this technique is proposed by short Matlab programs.Some nonlinear wave equations are more difficult to investigate mathematically, as no general analytical method for their solutions exists. The Exponential Time Differencing (ETD) technique requires minimum stages to obtain the requiredaccurateness, which suggests an efficient technique relatingto computational duration thatensures remarkable stability characteristicsupon resolving nonlinear wave equations. This article solves the diagonal example of Kawahara equation via the ETD Runge-Kutta 4 technique. Implementation of this technique is proposed by short Matlab programs.
[1] S. Cox P. Matthews Exponential time differencing for stiff systems Journal of Computational Physics 176 2 2002 430 455 [2] R. Holland Finite-difference time-domain (FDTD) analysis of magnetic diffusion Electromagnetic Compatibility, IEEE Transactions on 36 1 1994 32 39 [3] P.G. Petropoulos Analysis of exponential time-differencing for FDTD in lossy dielectrics Antennasand Propagation, IEEE Transactions on 45 6 1997 1054 1057 [4] M. Tokman Efficient integration of large stiff systems of ODEs with exponential propagation iterative (EPI) methods Journal of Computational Physics 213 2 2006 748 776 [5] W. Wright A partial history of exponential integrators Department of Mathematical SciencesNTNU, Norway 2004 [6] J.D. Lawson Generalized Runge-Kutta processes for stable systems with large Lipschitz constants SIAM Journal on Numerical Analysis 4 3 1967 372 380 [7] H. Berland B. Owren B. Skaflestad Solving the nonlinear Schrodinger equation using exponential integrators Modeling, Identification and Control 27 4 2006 201 217 [8] A.K. Kassam High order timestepping for stiff semilinear partial differential equations 2004 Universityof Oxford [9] H. Berland B. Skaflestad W.M. Wright EXPINT---A MATLAB package for exponential integrators ACM Transactions on Mathematical Software (TOMS) 33 1 2007 4 [10] A.K. Kassam L.N. Trefethen Fourth-order time-stepping for stiff PDEs SIAM Journal on Scientific Computing 26 4 2005 1214 1233 [11] S. Krogstad Generalized integrating factor methods for stiff PDEs Journal of Computational Physics 203 1 2005 72 88 [12] C. Klein Fourth order time-stepping for low dispersion Korteweg-de Vries and nonlinear Schrödinger equation Electronic Transactions on Numerical Analysis 29 2008 116 135 [13] Z.A. Aziz N. Yaacob M. Askaripour M. Ghanbari Fourth-Order Time Stepping for Stiff PDEs via Integrating Factor Advanced Science Letters 19 1 2013 170 173 [14] Z.A. Aziz M. Askaripour M. Ghanbari A New Review of Exponential Integrator 2012 CreateSpace USA 106 [15] J.M. Hyman B. Nicolaenko The Kuramoto-Sivashinsky equation: a bridge between PDE's and dynamical systems Physica D: Nonlinear Phenomena 18 1 1986 113 126 [16] B. Nicolaenko B. Scheurer R. Temam Some global dynamical properties of the Kuramoto-Sivashinsky equations: nonlinear stability and attractors Physica D: Nonlinear Phenomena 16 2 1985 155 183 [17] M. Askaripour Z.A. Aziz GhanbariM H. Panjmini A note on fourth-order time stepping for stiff pde via spectral method Applied Mathematical Sciences 7 38 2013 1881 1889 [18] Z.A. Aziz N. Yaacob M. Askaripour M. Ghanbari A review for the time integration of semi-linear stiff problems Journal of Basic  &  Applied Scientific Research 2 7 2012 6441 6448 [19] Z.A. Aziz N. Yaacob M. Askaripour M. Ghanbari A review of the time discretization of semi linear parabolic problems Research Journal of Applied Sciences, Engineering and Technology 4 19 2012 3539 3543 [20] Z.A. Aziz N. Yaacob M. Askaripour M. Ghanbari Split-step multi-symplectic method for nonlinear schrödinger equation Research Journal of Applied Sciences, Engineering and Technology 4 19 2012 3858 3864 [21] Z.A. Aziz N. Yaacob M. Askaripour M. Ghanbari A numerical approach for solving a general nonlinear wave equation Research Journal of Applied Sciences, Engineering and Technology 4 19 2012 3834 3837 [22] M. Askaripour Z.A. Aziz M. Ghanbari A. Farzamnia Efficient semi-implicit schemes for stiff systems via Newton's form Journal of Optoelectronics and Biomedical Materials 5 3 2013 43 50

Contractor Selection in Gas Well-drilling Projects with Quality Evaluation Using Neuro-fuzzy Networks
Contractor selection for a project is an important decision, one for the project time and cost, next for the quality obtained by the project. Although the project managers can easily determine the project time and cost, the quality is usually undefined especially for un-experienced managers. With a learnable property, an approach is first introduced in this paper to quantify the quality obtained for a gas well drilling project. Then, based on these three objectives (time, cost, and quality), a contractor selection problem is converted to an optimization problem. Next, the NSGA-II algorithm is utilized for solution. At the end, a sensitivity analysis is performed to select the parameters of the algorithm.Contractor selection for a project is an important decision, one for the project time and cost, next for the quality obtained by the project. Although the project managers can easily determine the project time and cost, the quality is usually undefined especially for un-experienced managers. With a learnable property, an approach is first introduced in this paper to quantify the quality obtained for a gas well drilling project. Then, based on these three objectives (time, cost, and quality), a contractor selection problem is converted to an optimization problem. Next, the NSGA-II algorithm is utilized for solution. At the end, a sensitivity analysis is performed to select the parameters of the algorithm.
[1] K. El-Rayes A. Kandil Time-cost-quality trade-off analysis for highway construction Journal of Construction Engineering and Management 131 2005 477 486 [2] W. Wang Q. Feng Multi-objective optimization in construction project based on a hierarchical subpopulation particle swarm optimization algorithm IEEE on Intelligent Information Technology Application; IITA 1 4739671 2008 746 750 [3] H.R. Tarighian S.H. Taheri On the discrete time, cost and quality trade-off problem Applied Mathematics and Computation 181 2006 1305 1312 [4] G. Xingfu H. Chengshun Z. Denghua Study synthesis optimization of time-cost-quality in project management Systems Engineering Theory  &  Practice 10 2007 112 117 [5] C.A. Afshar A. Kaveh O.R. Shoghli Multi-objective optimization of time-cost-quality using multi-colony ant algorithm Asian Journal of Civil Engineering (Building and Housing) 8 2007 113 124 [6] H. Iranmanesh M.R. Skandari M. Allahverdiloo Finding Pareto optimal front for the multi-mode time, cost, quality trade-off in project scheduling World Academy of Science, Engineering, and Technology 40 2008 346 350 [7] H.R. Tarighian S.H. Taheri A solution procedure for the discrete time, cost and quality tradeoff problem using electromagnetic scatter search Applied Mathematics and Computation 190 2007 1136 1145 [8] C.H. Zhiyong D. Zhida Z.H. Hua Research on the unlimited resource leveling optimization with PSO China Civil Engineering Journal 40 2007 93 96 [9] H.C.W. Lau T.M. Chan W.T. Tsui F.T.S. Chan G.T.S. Ho K.L. Choy A fuzzy guided multi-objective evolutionary algorithm model for solving transportation problem Expert Systems with Applications 36 2009 8255 8268 [10] W.Ch. Yeh M.Ch. Chuang Using multi-objective genetic algorithm for partner selection in green supply chain problems Expert Systems with Applications 38 2011 4244 4253 [11] X. Li G. Du BSTBGA: A hybrid genetic algorithm for constrained multi-objective Optimization problems Computers  &  Operations Research 40 2013 282 302 [12] R.Ch. Lin M. Sir K. Pasupathy Multi-objective simulation optimization using data envelopment analysis and genetic algorithm: Specific application to determining optimal resource levels in surgical services Omega 41 2013 881 892 [13] R.M. Ahari S.T.A. Niaki A hybrid approach based on locally linear neuro-fuzzy modeling and TOPSIS to determine the quality grade of gas well-drilling projects Journal of petroleum science and technology 2014 [14] C.A.C. Coello D.A.V. Veldhuizen G.B. Lamount Evolutionary algorithms for solving multi-objective problems 2001 Kluwer Academic Publishers [15] K. Deb S. Jain Running performance metrics for evolutionary multi-objective optimization Technical report (KanGAL Report No. 2002004) Kanpur Genetic Algorithms Laboratory 2002 Indian Institute of Technology Kanpur, India [16] Zitzler, E., Evolutionary algorithms for multiobjective optimization: Methods and applications, PhD thesis, Swiss Federal Institute of Technology Zurich, 1999.

Ranking of Journals in Science and Technology Domain: A Novel and Computationally Lightweight Approach
In this paper, a regression analysis based method is proposed to calculate the Journal Influence Score. This Influence Score is used to measure the scientific influence of scholarly journals. Journal Influence Score is calculated by using various factors in a weighted manner. The Score is then compared with the SCImago Journal Score. The results show that the error is small between the existing and proposed methods, proving that the model is a feasible and effective way of calculating scientific impact of journals.In this paper, a regression analysis based method is proposed to calculate the Journal Influence Score. This Influence Score is used to measure the scientific influence of scholarly journals. Journal Influence Score is calculated by using various factors in a weighted manner. The Score is then compared with the SCImago Journal Score. The results show that the error is small between the existing and proposed methods, proving that the model is a feasible and effective way of calculating scientific impact of journals.
[1] A.N. Abrizah K. Zainab R.G. Kiran Raj LIS journals scientific impact and subject categorization: a comparison between Web of Science and Scopus Scientometrics 94 2013 721 740 10.1007/s11192-012-0813-7 [2] E. Garfield Citation analysis as a tool in journal evaluation Science 178 4060 1972 471 479 [3] Chiang Kao The authorship and internationality of industrial engineering journals Scientometrics 80 3 2009 123 136 [4] Buela-Casal Gualberto Perkakis Pandelis Taylor Michael Checha Purificacion Measuring internationality: reflections and perspectives on academic journals Scientometrics 67 1 2006 45 65 [5] Svensson Goran Scholarly journal ranking(s) in marketing: single- or multi-item measures? Marketing intelligence and planning 26 4 2008 340 352 [6] Gaby Haddow Paul Genoni, Citation analysis and peer ranking of Australian social science journals, Scientometrics 85 2 2010 471 487 [7] A.N. Langville C.D. Meyer Google's PageRank and Beyond: The Science of Search Engine Rankings 2006 Princeton University Press New Jersey [8] Jain Raj The art of Computer System Performance Analysis 2009 Wiley-India Edition

Human-robot Communication for Surveillance of Elderly People in Remote Distance
In this paper, we present a tele-operated mobile robot system for old age surveillance. The robot operates in autonomous mode in which the robots navigates in the environment and search for unusual situation of elderly people. If a patient is lying on the floor, the robot informs the user. The user switches the control mode from autonomous to haptic based user control. In the autonomous mode, the robot utilizes the visual sensor and landmarks to monitor the entire environment. The robot is equipped microphone, speaker and monitor making it possible to communicate with the user in remote place. In addition, the robot utilizes the vital sensors to check the patient's condition. The preliminary surveillance experiments show a good performance.In this paper, we present a tele-operated mobile robot system for old age surveillance. The robot operates in autonomous mode in which the robots navigates in the environment and search for unusual situation of elderly people. If a patient is lying on the floor, the robot informs the user. The user switches the control mode from autonomous to haptic based user control. In the autonomous mode, the robot utilizes the visual sensor and landmarks to monitor the entire environment. The robot is equipped microphone, speaker and monitor making it possible to communicate with the user in remote place. In addition, the robot utilizes the vital sensors to check the patient's condition. The preliminary surveillance experiments show a good performance.
[1] Annual Report on the Aging Society: 2012 (Summary), Cabinet Office, Government of Japan, http://www8.cao.go.jp/kourei/english/annualreport/. [2] T. Matsui Y. Yoshida M. Kagawa M. Kubota A. Kurita Development of a practicable non-contact bedside autonomic activation monitoring system using microwave radars and its clinical ap4plication in elderly people J ClinMonitComput 27 3 2013 351 356 [3] A. Oda Y. Fujiwara Watching System for Care Facilities of The Elderly Journal of the Robotics Society of Japan 28 9 2010 1075 1076 (in Japanese) [4] H. Sawashima Y. Yano Development of Elderly people Monitoring System in Care House The Resaerch Report, Nara Prefecture Institute of Industrial Development 39 2013 6 10 [5] OpenRTM-aist, http://openrtm.org/.

Rapid Topology Design based on Shortest Path Betweenness for Virtual Network Construction
Recently, a network virtualization technology has attracted considerable attention as one of new generation network technologies. In this paper, in order to permit the rapid changing for a topology of a virtual network, we propose a new virtual network construction method based on the shortest path betweenness. In our proposed method, at first, a service provider receives a user's request for the reconfiguration of the constructed virtual network. In this case, the service provider reconfigures the topology of the constructed virtual network rapidly based on shortest path betweenness. We evaluate the performance of our proposed method with simulation, and we show the effectiveness of our proposed method.Recently, a network virtualization technology has attracted considerable attention as one of new generation network technologies. In this paper, in order to permit the rapid changing for a topology of a virtual network, we propose a new virtual network construction method based on the shortest path betweenness. In our proposed method, at first, a service provider receives a user's request for the reconfiguration of the constructed virtual network. In this case, the service provider reconfigures the topology of the constructed virtual network rapidly based on shortest path betweenness. We evaluate the performance of our proposed method with simulation, and we show the effectiveness of our proposed method.
[1] H. Aun, P. Richard, N. Akihiro, “Challenges in Resource Allocation in Network Virtualization,”in  Proc. 20th ITC Specialist Seminar on Network Virtualization , Hoi An, Vietnam, May2009. [2] J. Lu and J. Turner, “Efficient Mapping of Virtual Networks onto a Shared Substrate,”  WashingtonUniversity, Technical Report , WUCSE-2006-35, 2006. [3] M. Mori, T. Tachibana, K. Hirata, and K. Sugimoto, “A Proposed Topology Design and Admission Control Approach for Improved Network Robustness in Network Virtualization,” in Proc. IEEE Globecom 2011, Dec.2011. [4] M. Yu, Y. Yi, J. Rexford, and M. Chiang, “RethinkingVirtual Network Embedding: Substrate Supportfor Path SplittingandMigration,”  ACM SIGCOMM Computer Communication Review , vol.38, no.2, pp.17-29, Apr.2008. [5] Z. Shun-li and Q. Xue-song, “A Novel Virtual Network Mapping Algorithm for Cost Minimizing,”  Cyber Journals: Multidisciplinary Journals in Science and Technology, Journal of Selected Areas in Telecommunications (JSAT) , January Edition, Jan.2011. [6] L. Kou G. Markowsky L. Berman A Fast Algorithm for Steiner Trees ActaInformatica 15 2 1981, June 141 145 [7] A. Tizghadam A. Leon-Garcia Autonomic Traffic Engineering for Network Robustness IEEE Journal on Selected Areas in Communication 28 1 2010, Jan 39 50 [8] M.E.J. Newman and M. Girvan, “Finding and Evaluating Community Structure in Networks,”  Physical .  Review , E69, Feb.2004.

From Single to Multi-clouds Computing Privacy and Fault Tolerance
Security issues of data hosted in a Cloud Computing provider remain hidden seen excessive marketing that led to a totally unrealistic view of cloud computing security. Although Cloud Computing has not yet reached the level of maturity expected by its customers, and that the problems of confidentiality, integrity, reliability and consistency (CIRC) are still open, the researchers in this field have already considered a future cloud strategy which aims: a better QoS, reliability and high availability, it is the Multi-Clouds, Cloud of Clouds or Interclouds.This paper will present the security limitations in the single Cloud and the usefulness of adopting rather Multi-Clouds strategy to reduce security risks, through the use of DepSky which is a virtual storage system that ensures better availability and high confidentiality of data.Security issues of data hosted in a Cloud Computing provider remain hidden seen excessive marketing that led to a totally unrealistic view of cloud computing security. Although Cloud Computing has not yet reached the level of maturity expected by its customers, and that the problems of confidentiality, integrity, reliability and consistency (CIRC) are still open, the researchers in this field have already considered a future cloud strategy which aims: a better QoS, reliability and high availability, it is the Multi-Clouds, Cloud of Clouds or Interclouds.This paper will present the security limitations in the single Cloud and the usefulness of adopting rather Multi-Clouds strategy to reduce security risks, through the use of DepSky which is a virtual storage system that ensures better availability and high confidentiality of data.
[1] Maha Tebaa Said El Hajji « Secure Cloud Computing through Homomorphic Encryption» International Journal of Advancements in Computing Technology (IJACT) 5 16 2013 [2] David Sarno, Microsoft says lost sidekick data will be restored to users. Los Angeles Times, 2009. [3] Erica Naone, Are we safeguarding social data? Technology Review published by MIT Review,  http://www.technologyreview.com/blog/editors/22924/ , 2009. [4] C. Cachin I. Keidar A. Shraer «Trusting the cloud» ACM SIGACT News 2009 81 86 [5] S.L. Garfinkel «Email-based identification and authentication: An alternative to PKI» IEEE Security and Privacy 1 6 2003 20 26 [6] Amazon, Amazon Web Services. Web services licensing agreement, 2006. [7] Mohammed A. Al Zainand and al. «A Survey on Data Security Issues in Cloud Computing: From Single to Multi-Clouds», Journal of Software, Vol 8, No 5 (2013), 1068-1078, 2013. [8] Ali Shokerand and al., BFT Selection, Networked Systems, Lecture Note in Computer Science, Volume 7853, 2013, pp 258-262, 2013. [9] Bessani and al. «DEPSKY: Dependable and Secure Storage in a Cloud-of-Clouds», EuroSys’11, Salzburg, Austria, 2011 . [10] Fernando Martins André, Thesis «Availability and Confidentiality in Storage Cloud», 2011. [11] Monali Shrawankar and al. «Comparative Study of Security Mechanisms in Multi-clouds Environment», International Journal of Computer Applications (0975-8887) Volume 77, No.6, 2013. [12] Christian Cachin and al. «Dependable Storage in the Intercloud», BM Research Report, 2010.

Scripting Language for Java Source Code Recognition
This paper presents general results on the Java source code snippet detection problem. We propose the tool which uses graph and subgraph isomorphism detection. A number of solutions for all of these tasks have been proposed in the literature. However, although that all these solutions are really fast, they compare just the constant static trees. Our solution offers to enter an input sample dynamically with the Scripthon language while preserving an acceptable speed. We used several optimizations to achieve very low number of comparisons during the matching algorithm.This paper presents general results on the Java source code snippet detection problem. We propose the tool which uses graph and subgraph isomorphism detection. A number of solutions for all of these tasks have been proposed in the literature. However, although that all these solutions are really fast, they compare just the constant static trees. Our solution offers to enter an input sample dynamically with the Scripthon language while preserving an acceptable speed. We used several optimizations to achieve very low number of comparisons during the matching algorithm.
[1] Tomáš Bublík., Miroslav Virius. New language for searching Java code snippets. In: ITAT 2012. Proc. of the 12th national conference ITAT. diar, Sep 17-21 2012. Pavol Jozef Safrik University in Kosice. p. 35-40. [2] Christophe-André M. Irniger. Graph Matching - Filtering Databases of Graphs Using Machine Learning Techniques. 2005, ISBN 1-58603-557-6. [3] B.D. McKay Practical graph isomorphism In Congressus Numerantium 30 1981 45 87 [4] J.R. Ullmann An algorithm for subgraph isomorphism Journal ofthe Association for Computing Machinery 1976 31 42 [5] G. Levi A note on the derivation of maximal common subgraphs oftwo directed or undirected graphs Calcolo 1972 341 354 [6] J. McGregor Backtrack search algorithms and the maximal commonsubgraph problem Software-Practice and Experience 1982 23 34 [7] G.A. Stephen. String Searching Algorithms. World Scientific, 1994. [8] H. Bunke K. Shearer A graph distance metric based on the maximalcommon subgraph Pattern Recognition Letters 1998 255 259 [9] M.-L. Fernandez, G. Valiente. A graph distance metric combining maximum common subgraph and minimum common supergraph. Pattern Recognition Letters, 2001, pages 753-758. [10] W.D. Wallis, P. Shoubridge, M. Kraetz, D. Ray. Graph distances using graph union. Pattern Recognition Letters, May 2001, pages 701-704. [11] A. Sanfeliu K.S. Fu A distance measure between attributed relationalgraphs for pattern recognition IEEE Transactions on Systems, Man, and Cybernetics 1983 353 363 [12] W.H. Tsai K.S. Fu Error-correcting isomorphisms of attributedrelational graphs for pattern recognition IEEE Transactions on Systems, Man, and Cybernetics 1979 757 768 [13] M.A. Eshera K.S. Fu A graph distance measure for image analysis IEEE Transactions on Systems, Man, and Cybernetics 1984 398 408 [14] E.K. Wong. Three-dimensional object recognition by attributed graphs. In H. Bunke and A. Sanfeliu, editors, Syntactic and Structural Pattern Recognition- Theory and Applications, World Scientific, 1990, pages 381-414. [15] R. Wilson and E.R. Hancock. Levenshtein distance for graph spectral features. In J. Kittler, M. Petrou, and M. Nixon, editors, Proc. 17th Int. Conference on Pattern Recognition, volume 2, 2004, pages 489-492. [16] A. Robles-Kelly and E.R. Hancock. Graph edit distance from spectral seriation. IEEE Transactions on Pattern Analysis and Machine Intelligence, 2005, pages 365-378. [17] T. Caelli S. Kosinov Inexact graph matching using eigensubspace projection clustering Int. Journal of Pattern Recognition and Artificial Intelligence 2004 329 355 [18] T. Caelli S. Kosinov An eigenspace projection clustering method for inexact graph matching IEEE Transactions on Pattern Analysis and Machine Intelligence 2004 515 519 [19] Ch. K. Roy, J.R. Cordy, and R. Koschke. 2009. Comparison and evaluation of code clone detection techniques and tools: A qualitative approach. Sci. Comput. Program. 74, 7 (May 2009), pp. 470-495. [20] I. D. Baxter, A. Yahin, L. Moura, M. Sant’Anna, and L. Bier. 1998. Clone Detection Using Abstract Syntax Trees. In Proceedings of the International Conference on Software Maintenance (ICSM ‘98). IEEE Computer Society, Washington, DC, USA, pp. 368-377. [21] R. Koschke, R. Falke, P. Frenzel. Clone Detection Using Abstract Syntax Suffix Trees, Reverse Engineering. 2006. WCRE ‘06. 13th Working Conference on, ISBN 0-7695-2719-1, 2006,  pages 253-262. [22] J. T. Yao and M. Zhang. 2004. A Fast Tree Pattern Matching Algorithm for XML Query. In Proceedings of the 2004 IEEE/WIC/ACM International Conference on Web Intelligence (WI ‘04). IEEE Computer Society, Washington, DC, USA, pp. 235-241. [23] G. Valiente. Algorithms on Trees and Graphs. Springer, ISBN 3540435506, 2002, page 170. [24] V. Wahler, D. Seipel, J.W. von Gudenberg, and G. Fischer. Clone detection in source code by frequent itemset techniques. In SCAM, 2004. [25] R. Shamir, D. Tsur. Faster Subtree Isomorphism. In Journal of Algorithms, Volume 33 Issue 2, 1999, pages 267-280, doi:10.1006/jagm.1999.1044.

Performance Analysis of Adaptive Beamforming Algorithms for Smart Antennas
In this paper, adaptive beamforming techniques for smart antennas based upon Least Mean Squares (LMS), Sample Matrix Inversion (SMI), Recursive Least Squares (RLS) and Conjugate Gradient Method (CGM) are discussed and analyzed. The beamforming performance is studied by varying the element spacing and the number of antenna array elements for each algorithm. These four algorithms are compared for their rate of convergence, beamforming and null steering performance (beamwidth, null depths and maximum side lobe level).In this paper, adaptive beamforming techniques for smart antennas based upon Least Mean Squares (LMS), Sample Matrix Inversion (SMI), Recursive Least Squares (RLS) and Conjugate Gradient Method (CGM) are discussed and analyzed. The beamforming performance is studied by varying the element spacing and the number of antenna array elements for each algorithm. These four algorithms are compared for their rate of convergence, beamforming and null steering performance (beamwidth, null depths and maximum side lobe level).
[1] Van Veen D. Barry Kevin M. Buckley Beamforming: A versatile approach to spatial filtering ASSP M agazine, IEEE 5 2 1988 4 24 [2] L. Godara, “Smart Antennas”, CRC Press, Boca Raton, FL, 2004. . [3] R. Monzingo T. Miller Introduction to Adaptive Arrays 1980 Wiley Interscience, John Wiley  &  Sons New York [4] B. Widrow, “Adaptive Filters I: Fundamentals,” Stanford Electronics Laboratories, Stanford,CA, Rept. SEL-66-126 (Tech. Rept. 6764-6), December 1966. [5] J. S. Koford and G. F. Groner, “The Use of an Adaptive Threshold Element to Design a Linear Optimal Pattern Classifier,”  IEEE Trans. Inf. Theory , Vol. IT-12, January 1966, pp. 42-50. [6] K. Steinbuch and B. Widrow, “A Critical Comparison of Two Kinds of Adaptive Classification Networks,”  IEEE Trans. Electron. Comput. (Short Notes) , Vol. EC-14, October 1965, pp. 737-740. [7] F. W. Smith, “Design of Quasi-Optimal Minimum-Time Controllers,”  IEEE Trans. Autom. Control , Vol. AC-11, January 1966, pp. 71-77. [8] B. Widrow, P.E. Mantey, L.J. Griffiths, and B. B. Goode, “Adaptive Antenna Systems,”  Proc. IEEE , Vol. 55, No. 12, December 1967, pp. 2143-2159. [9] F. B. Gross, “Smart Antenna for Wireless Communication” McGraw-Hill, September 14, 2005. [10] J. Litva T. Kowk-Yeung Lo Digital Beamforming in Wireless Communications 1996 Artech House [11] T.K. Sarkar Michael C. Wicks M. Salazar-Palma Robert J. Bonneau Smart Antennas 2005 Wiley-IEEE Press [12] Sadiku, M., Numerical Techniques in Electromagnetics, 2 nd  ed., CRC Press, Boca Raton, FL, 2001.

Different Approaches for Implementing Quantum Search by Adiabatic Evolution
In this paper, three different approaches for implementing a quantum search algorithm by adiabatic evolution are shown. As expected, either one of them can provide a quadratic speed up as opposed to the classical search algorithm. This implies that adiabatic evolution based quantum computation gives more feasibilities than the quantum circuit model, although the equivalence between them has already been proven in the corresponding literature.In this paper, three different approaches for implementing a quantum search algorithm by adiabatic evolution are shown. As expected, either one of them can provide a quadratic speed up as opposed to the classical search algorithm. This implies that adiabatic evolution based quantum computation gives more feasibilities than the quantum circuit model, although the equivalence between them has already been proven in the corresponding literature.
[1] Farhi E., Goldstone J., Gutmann S., Lapan J., Lundgren A. and Preda D., A Quantum Adiabatic Evolution Algorithm Applied to Random Instances of an NP-Complete Problem.Science 2001; 292:472. [2] Grover L. K., Quantum Mechanics helps in searching for a needle in a haystack. Phys. Rev. Lett. 1997;79:325. [3] Shor P. W., Polynomial-time algorithms for prime factorization and discrete logarithms on a quantum computer. SIAM J. Comput. 1997; 26: 1484. [4] Roland J., Cerf N J., Quantum search by local adiabatic evolution. Phys. Rev. A 2002; 65:042308. [5] Tulsi A., Adiabatic quantum computation with a one-dimensional projector Hamiltonian. Phys. Rev. A 2009;80:052328. [6] Aharonov D., Dam W. v., Kempe J., Landau Z., Lloyd S., Regev O., Adiabatic Quantum Computation Is Equivalent to Standard Quantum Computation. SIAM J. Comput. 2007; 37:166.

A Pupil Location Method for WIFI-based Video-oculography System
Video-oculography (VOG) is one of eye movement measurement methods. A key problem of VOG is to accurately estimate the pupil center. Then a pupil location method based on morphology and Canny algorithm was proposed for a WIFI-based VOG system which was developed our latest work. Moreover, a healthy volunteer was introduced to do sinusoidal tracking test to evaluate the pupil location method. Experimental results showed that the method could well trace eye movement and meet the anticipated results with stimulation.Video-oculography (VOG) is one of eye movement measurement methods. A key problem of VOG is to accurately estimate the pupil center. Then a pupil location method based on morphology and Canny algorithm was proposed for a WIFI-based VOG system which was developed our latest work. Moreover, a healthy volunteer was introduced to do sinusoidal tracking test to evaluate the pupil location method. Experimental results showed that the method could well trace eye movement and meet the anticipated results with stimulation.
[1] E. Marg Development of electro-oculography A. M. A. Arch. Ophthalmol 45 1951 169 185 [2] D.A. Robinson A method of measuring eye movement using a scleral search coil in a magnetic field IEEE Biomed Eng. 10 1963 137 145 [3] F. Traisk R. Bolzani J. Ygge A comparison between the magnetic scleral search coil and infrared reflection methods for saccadic eye movement analysis Graefe's Arch Clin Exp Ophthalmol 243 2005 791 797 [4] H.D. Schworm J. Ygge T. Pansell G. Lennerstrand Assessment of Ocular Counterroll during Head Tilt Using Binocular Video Oculography Investigative Ophthalmology  &  Visual Science 43 2002 662 667 [5] J.N. van der Geest M.A. Frens Recording eye movements with video-oculography and scleral search coils: a direct comparison of two methods Journal of Neuroscience Methods 114 2002 185 195 [6] C.S. Lin L.W. Lue M.S. Yeh T.S. Hwang S.H. Lee A new image processing method for evaluating the pupillary responses in a HMD-type eye-tracking device Optics  &  Laser Technology 35 2003 505 515 [7] J.S.J. Lee R.M. Haralick L.G. Shapiro Morphological Edge Detection IEEE J. Robot. Automat 3 1987 142 157 [8] J. Canny A Computational Approach to Edge Detection IEEE Trans. Pattern Analysis and Machine Intelligence 8 1986 679 698 [9] W. McIlhagga The Canny Edge Detector Revisited Int J Comput Vis 91 2011 251 261 [10] P. Bao L. Zhang X. Wu Canny Edge Detection Enhancement by Scale Multiplication IEEE Trans. Pattern Analysis and Machine Intelligence 27 2005 1485 1490

Amplitude-frequency Relationship for the Relativistic Oscillator
The Hamiltonian approach and the variational approach are utilized to treat the relativistic harmonic oscillator for the amplitude-frequency relationship. The nice reliability is shown by the result comparison with that from open literature. The simplicity and efficiency of the methods are also disclosed for different range of the initial amplitude during looking for the amplitude-frequency relationship for the nonlinear relativistic harmonic oscillator.The Hamiltonian approach and the variational approach are utilized to treat the relativistic harmonic oscillator for the amplitude-frequency relationship. The nice reliability is shown by the result comparison with that from open literature. The simplicity and efficiency of the methods are also disclosed for different range of the initial amplitude during looking for the amplitude-frequency relationship for the nonlinear relativistic harmonic oscillator.
[1] A. Beléndez C. Pascual A. Márquez D.I. Méndez Application of He's homotopy perturbation method to the relativistic (an) harmonic oscillator I: Comparison between approximate and exact frequencies, International Journal of Nonlinear of Science and Numerical Simulation 8 4 2007 483 491 [2] Yue-Yun Shen Lu-Feng Mo The max–min approach to a relativistic equation Computers  &  Mathematics with Applications 58 11/12 2009 2131 2133 [3] Xu-Chu Cai, Wen-Ying Wu He's frequency formulation for the relativistic harmonic oscillator, Computers  &  Mathematics with Applications,  58 (11/12) 2009: 2358-2359. [4] J.H. He Hamiltonian approach to nonlinear oscillators Physics Letters A 374 23 2010 2312 2314 [5] M. Kargar A. Akbarzade Application of the Hamiltonian approach to nonlinear vibrating equations Mathematical and Computer Modelling 54 9–10 2011 2504 2514 [6] A. Yildirim Z. Saadatnia H. Askari Y. Khan M. KalamiYazdi Higher order approximate periodic solutions for nonlinear oscillators with the Hamiltonian approach Applied Mathematics Letters 24 12 2011 2042 2051 [7] J.H. He Variational approach for nonlinear oscillators Chaos Solitons Fractals 34 5 2007 1430 1439 [8] S.S. Ganji, D.D. Ganji, Z.Z. Ganji, S. Karimpour Periodic Solution for Strongly Nonlinear Vibration Systems by He's Energy Balance Method. Acta Appl Math, 106(1) 2009: 79-92. [9] Tao. Zhao-Ling The frequency–amplitude relationship for some nonlinear oscillators with discontinuity by He's variational method Phys. Script. 78 2008 015004

The Research of the Regional Financial Risk Early-Warning Model Integrating the Regression of Lagging Factors
This paper make the explained variables our financial stress index consist of the synchronous variables financial systemic risk, and make the explanatory variables the macroeconomic variable, currency credit variable, asset price variable and the macroeconomic variable of correlative economic powers, then use stepwise regression method to establish the financial systemic risk best predict equation, thus set up the reasonable and practical financial systemic risk early-warning index system; besides, use the best prediction equations predicts the financial systemic risk status in 2011. The predicted results show that Chinese financial systemic risk is on the rise in the first three quarters and higher than the peak of 2008; financial systemic risk start to decline since the fourth quarter.This paper make the explained variables our financial stress index consist of the synchronous variables financial systemic risk, and make the explanatory variables the macroeconomic variable, currency credit variable, asset price variable and the macroeconomic variable of correlative economic powers, then use stepwise regression method to establish the financial systemic risk best predict equation, thus set up the reasonable and practical financial systemic risk early-warning index system; besides, use the best prediction equations predicts the financial systemic risk status in 2011. The predicted results show that Chinese financial systemic risk is on the rise in the first three quarters and higher than the peak of 2008; financial systemic risk start to decline since the fourth quarter.
[1] Lore M, Bor IX Iovsky L. The professional's handbook of financial risk management[M], London:Reed Educational and Profession—al Publishing Ltd, 2000. [2] Balakrishnan,Danninger, Elekdag,and Tytell, 2009.The Transmission of Financial Stress from Advanced to Emerging Economies, IMF Working Paper. wp/2009/133. [3] Cardarelli,Roberto,Selim Elekdag,and Subir Lall, 2009,Financial Stress, Downturns,and Recoveries, forthcoming,IMF Working Paper. WP/09/100. [4] (a) A. Demirgüç-Kunt E. Detragiache The Determinants of Banking Crises in Developing and Developed Countries IMF Staff Papers 45 1998 81 109 11 (b) J.A. Frankel A.K. Rose Currency Crashes in Emerging Markets: An Empirical Treatment Journal of International Economics 41 1996 351 366 [5] Hakkio and Keeton, 2009,Financial stress:What Is It, How Can It Be Measured, and Why Does It Matter?, www.KansasCityFed.org. [6] G. Kaminsky C. Reinhart The twin crises: The causes of banking and balance-of-payments problems American Economic Review 89 1999 473 500 [7] Illing M., Y. Liu, 2003,An Index of Financial Stress for Canada, Bank of Canada Working Paper 2003-14, June 2003.

Obstacle Detection and Classification in Dynamical Background
In Obstacle detection is based on inverse perspective mapping and homography. Obstacle classification is based on fuzzy neural network. The estimation of the vanishing point relies on feature extraction strategy. The method exploits the geometrical relations between the elements in the scene so that obstacle can be detected. The estimated homography of the road plane between successive images is used for image alignment. A new fuzzy decision fusion method with fuzzy attribution for obstacle detection and classification application is described The fuzzy decision function modifies parameters with auto-adapted algorithm to get better classification probability It is shown that the method can achieve better classification resultIn Obstacle detection is based on inverse perspective mapping and homography. Obstacle classification is based on fuzzy neural network. The estimation of the vanishing point relies on feature extraction strategy. The method exploits the geometrical relations between the elements in the scene so that obstacle can be detected. The estimated homography of the road plane between successive images is used for image alignment. A new fuzzy decision fusion method with fuzzy attribution for obstacle detection and classification application is described The fuzzy decision function modifies parameters with auto-adapted algorithm to get better classification probability It is shown that the method can achieve better classification result
[1] E. Dagan, O. Mano, G.P. Stein and A. Shashua, “Forward Collision Warning with a Single Camera”. IEEE Intelligent vehicles Symposium (IV2004) June 2004, Parma, Italy p201-205. [2] Yong Zhou, Rong Xu, Xiaofeng Hu, Qingtai Ye, A robust lane detection and tracking method based. on computer vision. Measurement Science and Technology. 2006,21 (17): p736-745. [3] Y. Wang, E.K. Teoh, D. Shen. Lane detection and tracking using B-snake. Image Vision Compute. 2004,22(1): p269-280. [4] J. C. McCall, M.M. Trivedi. An integrated, robust approach to lane marking detection and lane tracking. In Proceedings of IEEE Intelligent vehicles, Parma, Italy, 2004: 533-537. [5] N. Matthews, P. An, D. Charnley, and C. Harris, “vehicle detection and recognition in greyscale imagery,”. Control Engineering Practice, vol. 4, p473-479, 1996. [6] Bo Wu, Nevatia R. Detection of multiple, partially occluded humans in a single image by Bayesian. combination of edgelet part detectors[C]. In: Proceedings of IEEE International Conference on Computer. Vision, 2005, 1:p90-97. [7] Masoud O, Papanikolopoulos N. A novel method for tracking and counting pedestrians in real-time using a. single camera[J]. IEEE Transactions on Vehicular Technology, 2001, 50(5): p1267-1278. [8] http://www.mobileye.info/en/index.html. [9] C. Goerick, N. Detlev and M. Werner, “Artificial neural networks in real-time vehicle detection and. tracking applications,” Pattern Recognition Letters, vol. 17, p335-343, 1996. [10] Z. Sun, R. Miller, G. Bebis and D. Dimeo, “A real-time precrash vehicle detection,” IEEE Intelligent. vehicles Symposium 2000. Dearborn, MI, USA.p35-43. [11] S. Baker and I. Matthews. Lucas-Kanade 20 years on: A unifying framework: Part 1: The quantity. approximated, the warp update rule, and the gradient descent approximation. International Journal of. Computer Vision, 2003, p38-45. [12] Bertsekas, D.P., Tsitsiklis, J.N. (1996). Neuro-dynamic programming. Athena Scientific. pp. 512. ISBN 1-886529-10-8. [13] DANN:Genetic Wavelets. dANN project. Retrieved 12 July 2010.

The Method of Energy Saving in Beam Pumping Unit Based on Genetic Algorithm
The load of beam pumping unit is changeable, which is often in a state of light load. Reducing a certain voltage can improve the power factor and efficiency of the beam pumping unit when in light load .We can change the voltage by changing the thyristor trigger angle. It is complex and unacceptable to analyze the change of the cycles of the load overall. So we can divide the load of the whole cycle into several equal parts, each can be thought of as a constant load. The most optimal voltage for the current load can be calculated by genetic algorithm. When each load is in the most optimal voltage, we can get the whole optimal voltage changeable rule. Then it produces the result of energy saving.The load of beam pumping unit is changeable, which is often in a state of light load. Reducing a certain voltage can improve the power factor and efficiency of the beam pumping unit when in light load .We can change the voltage by changing the thyristor trigger angle. It is complex and unacceptable to analyze the change of the cycles of the load overall. So we can divide the load of the whole cycle into several equal parts, each can be thought of as a constant load. The most optimal voltage for the current load can be calculated by genetic algorithm. When each load is in the most optimal voltage, we can get the whole optimal voltage changeable rule. Then it produces the result of energy saving.
[1] Ni zhen-wen, Qi jun, Hao jian-hua. Motor rotate speed control technology on the beam-pumping unit. Oil field equipment.2001,30(5):46-49. [2] H. Moyano, R.D. Fiore, R. Mazzola. Application of Intelligent Well Management System to Optimize Field Performance in Golfo San Jorge Basin, Argentina. SPE Latin American and Caribbean Petroleum Engineering Conference, 2005, 20-23 June, Rio de Janeiro, Brazil. [3] Tian Jingwen,Gao Meijuan1, Zhou Shiru. Energy-saving control system of beam-pumping unit based on wavelet neural network. 4th International Conference on Natural Computation, ICNC 2008, v 5, p 509-513, 2008. [4] Ding Bao,Tang HaiYan,Qi WeiGui. Research on FNN energy saving control for light load oil well with intermittent oil extraction. 2006 International Conference on Communications, Circuits and Systems, ICCCAS, Proceedings, v 3, p 2034-2037, 2006. Inst. of Elec. and Elec. Eng. Computer Society. [5] Xiang-Bin Xu, Xin-Jian Zhou. The Picking System Optimization Based on Genetic Algorithm and Implimented by eM-Plant.2010Second International Conference on Computer Modeling and Simu8lation, 2010:143-147. [6] Guangming Lv, Xiaomeng Sun, Jian Wang.A Simulated Annealing-New Genetic Algorithm and its Application.2011 International Conference on Electronics and Optoelectronics, 2011:V3246-249.

Research on Object-orientation-based Open Shape Model in Three-dimensional Space
Based on the description model of object-orientation-based direction relation in two-dimensional space, the description mode of object-orientation-based direction relation in three-dimensional space is proposed. The basic idea is that the actual direction region is modeled as an open shape. The computation related to the world boundary of spatial direction region is eliminated, and the processing of the direction predicates is converted into the processing of topological operations between open shapes and closed geometry objects. The algorithms of topological operations between open shapes and closed geometry objects are presented and the theoretical proof for the correctness and completeness of the algorithms is performed.Based on the description model of object-orientation-based direction relation in two-dimensional space, the description mode of object-orientation-based direction relation in three-dimensional space is proposed. The basic idea is that the actual direction region is modeled as an open shape. The computation related to the world boundary of spatial direction region is eliminated, and the processing of the direction predicates is converted into the processing of topological operations between open shapes and closed geometry objects. The algorithms of topological operations between open shapes and closed geometry objects are presented and the theoretical proof for the correctness and completeness of the algorithms is performed.
[1] Shashi Shekhar,Xuan Liu,Sanjay Chawla. An Object Model of Direction and Its Implications[J] GeoInformatica, 2009,13,(4):357-379. [2] X. Liu,S. Shekhar,S. Chawla. Object-Based Directional Query Processing in Spatial Databases[J]. IEEE TKDE, 2008,20(2):295-304. [3] Y. Theodoridis, D. Papadias. Range Queries Involving Spatial Relations: A performance Analysis [C]. Proceedings of the 2nd Conference on Spatial Information Theory (COSIT), 2010:176-180. [4] Yi Zhenshan. Simplex-based 3D-GIS Data Model and Its Preliminary Design.[J].Bulletin of Surveying and Mapping, 2009,12(11):10-13. [5] Qing Zhu et al. An efficient 3D R-tree spatial index method for virtual geographic environments[J]ISPRS Journal of Photogrammetry and Remote Sensing, 2007,62(3):217-224.

Reliability of Distribution Network Components based on Failure Databases
The paper deals with the computation of distribution network components reliability parameters. Knowledge of the component reliability parameters in power networks is necessary for the reliability computation and also for reliability-centered maintenance system. Component reliability parameters are possible to retrieve only with accurate databases of distribution companies. Such a database includes records of outages and interruptions in power networks. It is impossible to retrieve reliability parameters from this data in a direct way because of heterogeneity. In this paper, we introduce some results of databases calculations. We apply this framework for the retrieving of parameters from outage data in the Czech and Slovak republics. There are also actual results.The paper deals with the computation of distribution network components reliability parameters. Knowledge of the component reliability parameters in power networks is necessary for the reliability computation and also for reliability-centered maintenance system. Component reliability parameters are possible to retrieve only with accurate databases of distribution companies. Such a database includes records of outages and interruptions in power networks. It is impossible to retrieve reliability parameters from this data in a direct way because of heterogeneity. In this paper, we introduce some results of databases calculations. We apply this framework for the retrieving of parameters from outage data in the Czech and Slovak republics. There are also actual results.
[1] Piskac J, Marko J. Regulations for electric power system no. 2 -failure statistics at electricity distribution, Prague: CEZ; 1974. [2] Distribution companies of the Czech Republic. Distribution network grid code, appendix no. 2 -Methodology of reliability determination of electric power supply and distribution network equipments. Prague: ERU; 2009. [3] Gono R, Kratky M, Rusek S. Analysis of Distribution Network Failure Databases. Przegląd elektrotechniczny 2010; 86, no. 8, 168-171. [4] Kratky M, Gono R, Rusek S, Dvorsky J. A framework for an analysis of failures data in electrical power networks. Proc. PEA Conf. on Power, Energy, and Applications. Gaborone: 2006; 45-46. [5] Martinek Z, Kralovacova V. The Solution for Repairable Units. Proc. EPE Conf. University of Technology Brno; 2010. [6] Kurimský J, Kolcunová I, Cimbala R. Understanding surface partial discharges in HV coils and the role of semi-conductive protection. Electrical Engineering 2010; 92, no. 7-8, 283-289. [7] Kolcun M, Adamec P, Lovas S. The electric power system and its control in the Slovak Republic. Proc. EPE Conf VŠB-TU Ostrava: 2009; 1-4. [8] Rusnak J, Bena L, Kolcun M. Experiences with examination of dispersed sources impact on distribution power system. Proc. EPE Conf. University of Technology Brno; 2010, 219-222.

Methodology of Establishing Holding Furnace Characteristic for Al-Si Alloys in Pressure Die-casting Process with Application
In the paper we propose a conceptual methodology to control liquid state of Al-Si alloys in melting and holding sub-process of the pressure die-casting process. Given that, we determine the characteristic of the holding furnace based on weight percent (wt %) of the certain alloys and their elements. Subsequently the paper introduces an application of methodology of research for establishing characteristic of holding furnace. The application was realized under real conditions in foundry that uses horizontal cold chamber machine CLH 400.1. The chemical analysis was performed by spectrophotometer SPECTROLAB JR.CCD 2000. Finally the last part of the paper lists overall findings with possible future direction to extend this methodology in practice.In the paper we propose a conceptual methodology to control liquid state of Al-Si alloys in melting and holding sub-process of the pressure die-casting process. Given that, we determine the characteristic of the holding furnace based on weight percent (wt %) of the certain alloys and their elements. Subsequently the paper introduces an application of methodology of research for establishing characteristic of holding furnace. The application was realized under real conditions in foundry that uses horizontal cold chamber machine CLH 400.1. The chemical analysis was performed by spectrophotometer SPECTROLAB JR.CCD 2000. Finally the last part of the paper lists overall findings with possible future direction to extend this methodology in practice.
[1] V.S. Zolotorevsky N.A. Belov M.V. Glazoff Casting aluminum alloys 1 st  ed 2007 Elsevier UK [2] J.G. Kaufman E.L. Roy Aluminium alloy castings 2004 ASM International USA [3] J.G. Kaufman Properties of aluminum alloys: tensile, creep and fatigue data at high and low temperatures 1 st  ed. 1999 ASM International USA [4] J. Laudar Liatie pod tlakom 1964 SVTL Bratislava [5] Ragan E, et al. Liatie kovov pod tlakom Presov: VMV; 2007. [6] J. Malik Zlievarenske stroje a zariadenia 2006 HF TU Kosice [7] J. Valecky Liti kovu pod tlakem 1963 SNTL Praha [8] J. Malik Specielne technologie v zlievarenstve 2010 HF TU Kosice [9] M. Fedak Quality of die casting in dependence on die casting process and running property in die cavity at pressure die casting technology ERIN 2009 1 11 [10] M. Fedak P. Semanco Monitoring of chemical composition of aluminium alloys AlSi in the maintenance furnace Sci Pap: Oper Diagn Mach Prod Sys Oper Stat 3 2010 139 144

Exploitation and Application of Galloping Database based on PMS System
Our country is rich of line galloping, there are many important galloping data failed to collect systematically and completely because there is no unified management platform. After the galloping occurrence in 2009–2010's winter the department of productive of the State Grid Corporation organized a lot of human to carry out the research of galloping information, this work is time–consuming and inefficient. The State Grid Corporation has used the production management system (PMS) which is a powerful and easy to use. With the help of the system we can create a galloping database which can save resources and storage the galloping data. To build and put it into application of database can provide technical support for line galloping prevention and galloping research work.Our country is rich of line galloping, there are many important galloping data failed to collect systematically and completely because there is no unified management platform. After the galloping occurrence in 2009–2010's winter the department of productive of the State Grid Corporation organized a lot of human to carry out the research of galloping information, this work is time–consuming and inefficient. The State Grid Corporation has used the production management system (PMS) which is a powerful and easy to use. With the help of the system we can create a galloping database which can save resources and storage the galloping data. To build and put it into application of database can provide technical support for line galloping prevention and galloping research work.
[1] Guo Yinglong, Li Guoxign, You Chuanyong. Galloping of power transmission line[M].Beijing:China Power Press, 2003. [2] Sa Shixuan, Wang Shan. General of database system [M].Beijing, High education press, 2000. [3] Date C J. An Introduction to Database System(Ed.6) [M]. Addison-Wesley, 1995. [4] Martin J. Principles of Data Base Management[M]. 1976. [5] Brodie ML. On Conceptual Modeling [M]. Springer Verlag, 1984. [6] Valduriez P. Parallel Database Systems: Open Problems and New Issues [J]. Distributed and Parallel Databases, Vol1.1, No.2, 1993. [7] Li Jianzhong, Sun Wenjuan. Guide on parallel relationship database management system[M].One of database series books, Beijing:Science press, 1998. [8] Wiederhold G. Database Design(Second Edition). [9] [M].McGraw-Hill, 1983. [10] Cai Tingxiang. New mechanism study on galloping of power transmission line [J] China Power, 1998 31(10) 62-66.

The Non-fragile Controller Design Based on Quadratic Performance Optimization
This paper presents a non-fragile controller design method based on system quadratic performance optimization. For the additive controller gain variations, the necessary and sufficient conditions for the existence of non-fragile state feedback controller are given and transformed to the LMI problems, which simplifies the solutions to obtain non-fragile state feedback controllers. The flight control simulation results prove the reliability and validity of the method.This paper presents a non-fragile controller design method based on system quadratic performance optimization. For the additive controller gain variations, the necessary and sufficient conditions for the existence of non-fragile state feedback controller are given and transformed to the LMI problems, which simplifies the solutions to obtain non-fragile state feedback controllers. The flight control simulation results prove the reliability and validity of the method.
[1] Zhou K, Doyle J C, Glover K. Robust and optimal control. New Jersey: Prentice Hall Englewood Cliffs, 1996. [2] Sheldon S.L. Chang Adaptive Guaranteed cost control of systems with uncertain parameters IEEE Trans on Automatic control 17 1972 474 483 [3] L.H. Keel, S .P. Bhattacharyya, Robust, Fragile or Optimal? Proceedings of the American Control Conference Albuquerque, New Meixco, June 1997:1307-1313. [4] D. Famularo P. Dorato C.T. Abdallah W.M. Haddad A. Jadbabaie Robust non-fragile LQ controllers: the static state feedback case International Journal of control 1998 1109 1113 [5] G.H. Yang, J.L. Wang, C Lin. H∞ control for linear systems with additive controller gain variations, International Journal of control, 2000;73:1500-1506. [6] YU Li. Robust control. Beijing: tsinghua university press, 2002. [7] WU Ming, GUI Wei-hua, HE Yong. Modern robust control. Changsha: Central South university press, 2006.

Nonlinear Predictive Control Using Fuzzy Hammerstein Model and Its Application to CSTR Process
A fuzzy-Hammerstein model predictive control method is proposed for a continuous stirred-tank reactor (CSTR). In this paper T-S fuzzy model is used to approximate the static nonlinear characteristics of Hammerstein model, and a linear autoregressive model is used to solve the results of optimal control. The designed nonlinear predictive controller using Hammerstein model make good use of the ability of universal approach nonlinear of T-S model, and divide the question of nonlinear predictive control into the nonlinear model recongnization and the question of linear predictive control. The application results of CSTR process show the proposed control method has good control performance compared to PID controller.A fuzzy-Hammerstein model predictive control method is proposed for a continuous stirred-tank reactor (CSTR). In this paper T-S fuzzy model is used to approximate the static nonlinear characteristics of Hammerstein model, and a linear autoregressive model is used to solve the results of optimal control. The designed nonlinear predictive controller using Hammerstein model make good use of the ability of universal approach nonlinear of T-S model, and divide the question of nonlinear predictive control into the nonlinear model recongnization and the question of linear predictive control. The application results of CSTR process show the proposed control method has good control performance compared to PID controller.
[1] Camacho E F, Bordons C. Model predictive control in the process industry [M]. London: Springer, 1995. [2] J.Q. Huang F.L. Lewis Neural-network predictive control for nonlinear dynamic systems with time-delay [J] IEEE Transactions on Neural Networks 14 2 2003 377 389 [3] Sun Jianping, Tan Yue, Li Bing. Single valued fuzzy generalized predictive control and its application in thermal process [J]. Chinese Journal of scientific instrument, 2008: 1494-1498. [4] Xu Xiangyuan Mao Zongyuan Analysis and research-based Hammerstein model predictive control [J] Control Theory and Application (in Chinese) 17 4 2000 529 532 [5] Norquay S L, Palazoglu A, Romagnoli J A. Nonlinear model predictive control of pH neutralization using Wiener models [A]. Proceedings of 13th IFAC World Congress [C], San Francisco, 1996, pp: 31-36. [6] F.J. Doyle B.A. Ogunnaike R.K. Pearson Nonlinear model-based control using second-order Volterra models [J] Automatica 31 5 1995 697 714 [7] K.P. Fruzzetti A. Palazoglu K.A. McDonald Nonlinear model predictive control using Hammerstein models [J] Journal of Process Control 7 1 1997 31 41 [8] Xiang Wei Chen Zonghai New identification method of nonlinear systems based on Hammerstein models [J] Control Theory  &  Application(in Chinese) 24 1 2007 143 147 [9] Zhu Xuefeng D.E. Seborg Nonlinear predictive control based on Hammerstein models [J] Control Theory  &  Applications(in Chinese) 11 5 1994 564 575 [10] Zhu Xuefeng Nonlinear predictive control of CSTR [J] Journal of South China University of Technology (natural science) 23 6 1995 7 16 [11] Zou Zhiyun Yu Dehong Zhen. Hu Predictive control of nonlinear Hammerstein systems and application to a pH process [J] Computers and Applied Chemistry 23 2 2006 137 142

An United Recursive Robot Dynamics Based on Screws
The key point of robot dynamics is optimal design and control. The efficiency of robot dynamics has been the goal of researchers in recent years. Screws are used to describe dynamic problems in this paper, and an O(N) recursive robot forward dynamic algorithm is given on this. It can be easily extended to tree topology, closed loop and spatial robot systems. And three classic methods of robot dynamics are compared for easy of use. The results show that dynamics described with screws are helpful in high efficient dynamics modelling. The dynamical expressions based on screws are concise and clear. It's efficiency is high of O(N) and is linear to the degree of freedom. With the improvement of computation efficiency, it will make the real-time dynamics control become possible.The key point of robot dynamics is optimal design and control. The efficiency of robot dynamics has been the goal of researchers in recent years. Screws are used to describe dynamic problems in this paper, and an O(N) recursive robot forward dynamic algorithm is given on this. It can be easily extended to tree topology, closed loop and spatial robot systems. And three classic methods of robot dynamics are compared for easy of use. The results show that dynamics described with screws are helpful in high efficient dynamics modelling. The dynamical expressions based on screws are concise and clear. It's efficiency is high of O(N) and is linear to the degree of freedom. With the improvement of computation efficiency, it will make the real-time dynamics control become possible.
[1] M. E. Kahn and B. Roth, The Near Minimum time Control of Open-loop Articulated Kinematic Chains[J], Journal of Dynamic Systems, Measurement, and Control, vol. 93, pp. 164-172, 1971. [2] Xiong Y. L, The basic of Robot Technology [M], Huazhong University of Science and Technology Press, 2002. [3] M. W. Walker and D. E. Orin, Efficient Dynamic Computer Simulation of Robotic Mechanisms[J], Trans. ASME, J. Dynamic Systems, Measurement  &  Control, vol. 104, pp. 205-211, 1982. [4] R. Featherstone, Efficient Factorization of the Joint Space Inertia Matrix for Branched Kinematic Trees [J], Int. J. Robotics Research, vol. 24, no. 6, pp. 487-500, 2005. [5] A. Jain, G. Rodriguez, Multibody Mass Matrix Sensitivity Analysis Using Spatial Operators [J], Int. Journal for Multiscale Computational Engineering, vol.1, Issue 2-3, 2003. [6] A. Jain, Unified Formulation of Dynamics for Serial Rigid Multibody Systems [J], Journal of Guidance, Control, and Dynamics, vol. 14, no. 3, pp. 531-542, 1991. [7] J. García de Jalón, Twenty-five years of natural coordinates, Multibody System Dynamics [J]. vol.18, pp. 15-33, 2007.

Tool-path Generation of Multi-axis Machining for Subdivision Surface
An algorithm of multi-axis NC tool-path generation for subdivision surfaces is proposed. The algorithm includes two steps: model building and tool path generation. In the section of model building, in order to obtain the deformed surface, the deformation vector is computed which is associated with the curvature and the slope of cutter location surface. In the procedure of tool path generation, the slicing procedure is adopted to get the CL points. In addition, the inversely converted method is used. The method is tested by some examples with actual machining. The results show that the method can effectively reduce the error of the scallop height for subdivision surface and obtain the better shape and quality. In addition, the computational complexity and is scalable and robust.An algorithm of multi-axis NC tool-path generation for subdivision surfaces is proposed. The algorithm includes two steps: model building and tool path generation. In the section of model building, in order to obtain the deformed surface, the deformation vector is computed which is associated with the curvature and the slope of cutter location surface. In the procedure of tool path generation, the slicing procedure is adopted to get the CL points. In addition, the inversely converted method is used. The method is tested by some examples with actual machining. The results show that the method can effectively reduce the error of the scallop height for subdivision surface and obtain the better shape and quality. In addition, the computational complexity and is scalable and robust.
[1] T. DeRose, M. Kass and T. Truong. Subdivision surfaces in character animation. In:  Proc. of SIGGRAPH 98 Conference , Annual Conference Series. 1998, pp. 85-94. [2] J. Kurgano, H. Suzuki and F. Kimura. Gneration of NC tool path for subdivision surface. In: Proc. of CAD/Graphics’ 2001, August 22-24, Kunming, China. 2001, pp:676-682. [3] P. Wu, H. Suzuki, J. Kuragano, et al. Three-axis NC Cutter Path Generation for Subdivision Surface. In:  Prof. of GMP . 2004, pp:1-6. [4] E. Catmull and J. Clark. Recursively generated B-spline surfaces on arbitrary topological meshes.  Computer-Aided Design , 1978, 10(6):350-355. [5] G.C. Loney and T.M. Ozsoy. NC machining of free-form surfaces.  Computer-Aided Design , 1987, 19(2):85-90. [6] S.J. Kim and M.Y. Yang. A CL surface deformation approach for constant scallop height tool path generation from triangular mesh. International Journal of Advanced Manufacturing Technology, 2005, 28, 314-320. [7] H. Moreton.Minimum curvature variation curves,networks, and surfaces for fair free-form shape design,[Doctor of Philosophy Thesis].BERKELEY:UNIVERSTTY OF CALIFORNIA, 1992.

Adaptive SVR-HDMR Metamodeling Technique for High Dimensional Problems
Modeling or approximating high dimensional, computationally-expensive problems faces an exponentially increasing difficulty, the “curse of dimensionality”. This paper proposes a new form of high dimensional model representation (HDMR) by utilizing the support vector regression (SVR), termed as adaptive SVR-HMDR, to conquer this dilemma. The proposed model could reveal explicit correlations among different input variables of the underlying function which is unknown or expensive for computation. Taking advantage of HDMR's hierarchical structure, it could alleviate the exponential increasing difficulty, and gain satisfying accuracy with small set of samples by SVR. Numerical examples of different dimensionality are given to illustrate the principle, procedure and performance of SVR-HDMR.Modeling or approximating high dimensional, computationally-expensive problems faces an exponentially increasing difficulty, the “curse of dimensionality”. This paper proposes a new form of high dimensional model representation (HDMR) by utilizing the support vector regression (SVR), termed as adaptive SVR-HMDR, to conquer this dilemma. The proposed model could reveal explicit correlations among different input variables of the underlying function which is unknown or expensive for computation. Taking advantage of HDMR's hierarchical structure, it could alleviate the exponential increasing difficulty, and gain satisfying accuracy with small set of samples by SVR. Numerical examples of different dimensionality are given to illustrate the principle, procedure and performance of SVR-HDMR.
[1] G. Gary Wang, S. Shan. Review of Metamodeling Techniques in Support of Engineering Design Optimization. Journal of Mechanical Design 2007;129:370-380. [2] I.M. Sobol, MMCE, 1, 407, 1993. [3] H. Rabitz and O.F. Alis, General foundations of high dimensional model representations, Journal of Mathematical Chemistry 25 (1999), pp. 197-233. [4] G. Li, C. Rosenthal and H. Rabitz, High dimensional model representations, Journal of Physical Chemistry A 105 (2001), pp. 7765-7777. [5] H. Rabitz, O.F. Alis, J. Shorter, K. Shim, Efficient input–output model representations, Comput. Phys. Commun. 117 (1-2) (1999) 11-20. [6] I.M. Sobol, Theorems and examples on high dimensional model representations, Reliabil. Eng. Syst. Safety 79 (2) (2003) 187-193. [7] Rajib Chowdhury, B.N. Rao, Hybrid High Dimensional Model Representation for reliability analysis, Comput. Methods Appl. Mech. Engrg. 198(2009)753-765. [8] Wang SW, Levy II H, Li G, Rabitz H. Fully equivalent operational models for atmospheric chemical kinetics within global chemistry-transport models. Journal of Geophysical Research 1999; 104(D23):30417-30426. [9] V. Vapnik, The Nature of Statistical Learning Theory, Springer, Berlin, 1995. [10] Songqing Shan and G. Gary Wang, Development of adaptive RBF-HDMR model for approximating high dimensional problems, ASME 2009 International Design Engineering Technical Conference  &  Computers and Information in Engineering Conference 14, DETC 2009-86531.

Layered Metal-intermetallic Composites in Ti-Al System: Strength Under Static and Dynamic Load
Metal–intermetallic laminated (MIL) composites are fabricated upon reaction sintering of titanium and aluminum foils of various thicknesses. The intermetallic phase of Al3Ti forming during the above processing gives high hardness and stiffness to the composite, while unreacted titanium provides the necessary high strength and ductility. Some results of studies of microstructure and some mechanical properties of layered composites are presented on the example of Ti-Al system. Static and dynamic tests results are discussed for the case when the intermetallic reaction was interrupted in the course of intermetallic sintering and also for the case when it was completed.Metal–intermetallic laminated (MIL) composites are fabricated upon reaction sintering of titanium and aluminum foils of various thicknesses. The intermetallic phase of Al3Ti forming during the above processing gives high hardness and stiffness to the composite, while unreacted titanium provides the necessary high strength and ductility. Some results of studies of microstructure and some mechanical properties of layered composites are presented on the example of Ti-Al system. Static and dynamic tests results are discussed for the case when the intermetallic reaction was interrupted in the course of intermetallic sintering and also for the case when it was completed.
[1] K. Vecchio Synthetic Multifunctional Metallic-Intermetallic Laminate Composites JOM 3 2005 25 31 [2] W.O. Soboyejo F. Ye L.-C. Chen N. Bahtishi Effects of reinforcement morphology on the fatigue and fracture behavior of MoSi2/Nb composites Acta Materialia 44 1996 2027 2041 [3] A.M. Patselov V.V. Rybin B.A. Grinberg M.A. Ivanov O.V. Eremina Synthesis and Properties of Ti–Al Laminated Composites with an Intermetallic Layer Russian Metallurgy (Metally) 4 2011 356 360 [4] Kral J, Ferdinandy M, Liska D. Formation of TiAl3 on titanium alloys. Mat Sci Eng 1991;A140:479-85.

Design Method for Virtual Network Attack and Defense Platform
A design method for network attack and defense simulation platform is discussed in this paper. Firstly the component and function of the platform are analyzed. Then Visio second development method is used to construct the virtual network topology. The parsing of virtual network topology is also researched and the relative flow sheet is described. Lastly an example is carried out to test performance of the platform. Simulation results show the effectiveness of the proposed method.A design method for network attack and defense simulation platform is discussed in this paper. Firstly the component and function of the platform are analyzed. Then Visio second development method is used to construct the virtual network topology. The parsing of virtual network topology is also researched and the relative flow sheet is described. Lastly an example is carried out to test performance of the platform. Simulation results show the effectiveness of the proposed method.
[1] Wang, S., Wang, Z. Information system attack and defense. Beijing: Electronic Industry Press; 2007. [2] Wu, X. Design and implementation of network attack and defense simulation environment. Xi’an: Xidian University; 2005. [3] MSDN Library for Visual Studio. Microsoft; 2005. [4] Zhu, H., Lei, M., Gao, S. Application of Visio secondary development technology in the electrical engineering teaching graphics. Journal of Electrical  &  Electronic Education; 2006. [5] Zou, J., Zhou, S., Xiang, X. C# enterprise-level development. Beijing: People's Posts and Telecommunications Press; 2006. [6] Richard B. C# network application programming. Beijing: Electronic Industry Press; 2003.

A New Algorithm of GO Methodology Based on Minimal Path Set
The existing GO methodology algorithm is theoretical, and hard to solve with computer. In this paper, we research a new method to get the reliability of system based on GO methodology. According to some properties of the operators in GO chart, GO chart can be transformed into series structure, then the minimal path sets are induced based on Enumeration method from first operator to last one. It is very convenient for computer to calculate the system reliability with the new method based on minimal path sets. The case study indicates the method is suitable for practical engineering, which can be used to possess the quantitative analysis of complex GO methodology models.The existing GO methodology algorithm is theoretical, and hard to solve with computer. In this paper, we research a new method to get the reliability of system based on GO methodology. According to some properties of the operators in GO chart, GO chart can be transformed into series structure, then the minimal path sets are induced based on Enumeration method from first operator to last one. It is very convenient for computer to calculate the system reliability with the new method based on minimal path sets. The case study indicates the method is suitable for practical engineering, which can be used to possess the quantitative analysis of complex GO methodology models.
[1] Zeng Shengkui, Zhao Tingdi, Zhang Jianguo, Kang Rui and Shi Junyou, a course in System reliabiltiy design and analysis, Press of Beihang University,Beijing; 2001. [2] Shen Zupei and Huang Xiangrui, GO methodology and application, Tsinghua University Press, Beijing; 2004. [3] Shen Zupei and Tang Hui, System reliability analysis with shared caused failures using the GO methodology. Tsinghua Uinv(Sci & Tech), 2006; Vol 46, No.6, p. 829-832. [4] Heqing Li and Qing Tan, Reliability Analysis of Hydraulic System for Type Crane Based on Go Methodology, 2009 Second International Conference on Intelligent Computation Technology and Automation; 2009. [5] Yi Ren, Leixing Kong, Zhi Fu, An Algorithm of GO Methodology based on Connection Matrix of Minimal Path Sets, 2010 IRAST International Congress on Computer Applications and Computational Science 2010; p.923-927. [6] Charles E. Ebeling, An Introduction to Reliability and Maintainability Engineering. Beijing: Tsinghua University Press; 2008.

Hidden Node Optimization for Extreme Learning Machine
The number of hidden nodes is a critical factor for the generalization of ELM. Generally, it is heavy for time consumption to obtain the optimal number of hidden nodes with trial-and-error. A novel algorithm is proposed to optimize the hidden node number to guarantee good generalization, which employs the PSO in the optimization process with structural risk minimization principle. The simulation results indicate our algorithm for the optimal number of hidden nodes is reasonable and feasible with 6 datasets on benchmark problems by the accuracy comparisons.The number of hidden nodes is a critical factor for the generalization of ELM. Generally, it is heavy for time consumption to obtain the optimal number of hidden nodes with trial-and-error. A novel algorithm is proposed to optimize the hidden node number to guarantee good generalization, which employs the PSO in the optimization process with structural risk minimization principle. The simulation results indicate our algorithm for the optimal number of hidden nodes is reasonable and feasible with 6 datasets on benchmark problems by the accuracy comparisons.
[1] G.-B. Huang Q.-Y. Zhu C.-K. Siew Extreme learning machine: a new learning scheme of feedforward neural networks Proc of the IEEE International Joint Conference on Neural Networks. 2 2004 985 990 [2] Guorui Feng GuangBin Huang Lin. Qingping Error Minimized Extreme Learning Machine With Growth of Hidden Nodes and Incremental Learning IEEE Trans on Neural Networks 20 8 2009 1352 1357 [3] S. Suresh S. Saraswathi N. Sundararajan Performance Enhancement of Extreme Learning Machine for Multi-Category Sparse Cancer Classification Engineering Applications of Artificial Intelligence 23 7 2010 1149 1157 [4] You Xu Shu. Yang Evolutionary Extreme Learning Machine Based on Particle Swarm Optimization Lecture Notes in Computer Science Advances in Neural Networks 3971 2006 64 652 [5] Saraswathi, S. Sundaram, S. Sundararajan. N. ICGA-PSO-ELM Approach for Multiclass Cancer Classification Resulting Reduced Gene Sets in Which Genes Encoding Secreted Proteins Are Highly Represented inaccurate. IEEE/ACM Trans on Computational Biology and Bioinformatics, 2010; 8(2):452-463. [6] Yoan Miche, Sorjamaa.A, Bas.P. OP-ELM: Optimally Pruned Extreme Learning Machine. IEEE Trans on Neural Networks, 2010; 21(1):158-162. [7] Lahoz.D, Lacruz.B, Mateo.P.M. A Bi-objective Micro Genetic Extreme Learning machine. IEEE workshop on Hybrid Intelligent Models And Applications; 2011, 68-75. [8] GuangBin Huang, QinYu Zhu, CheeKheong Siew. Extreme learning machine: Theory and applications. Neurocomputing, 2006; 70:489-501. [9] Vladimir N. Vapnik. Statistical Learning Theory. 2nd ed. New York: Wiley; 1998. [10] Koiran P, Sontag E D. Neural Networks with Quadratic VC Dimension. Journal of Computer and System Sciences. 1997; 54:190-198. [11] Bartlett P L, Maiorov V, Meir R. Almost Linear VC-Dimension Bounds for Piecewise Polynomial Networks. Neural Computation.1998; 10(8):2159-2173. [12] Karpinski M, Macintyre A. Polynomial Bounds for VC Dimension of Sigmoidal and General Pfaffian Neural Networks. Journal of Computer and System Sciences.1997; 54:169-176.

Trend Prediction of FDI Based on the Intervention Model and ARIMA-GARCH-M Model
For providing the government with effective monitoring of the trends of the economic variables in the future and good reference for developing a reasonable policy, in this paper, we establish a time series model on China's Foreign Direct Investment (FDI) by using wavelet analysis and intervention analysis and time series analysis and predict the trend of FDI in the next several years. This model eliminates the interference of noise for predicting by using wavelet analysis, and describes the autocorrelation and time-varying volatility of the financial time series by using ARIMA- GARCH-M model. The simulation results show that this model explains the dynamic structure of China's FDI trends well.For providing the government with effective monitoring of the trends of the economic variables in the future and good reference for developing a reasonable policy, in this paper, we establish a time series model on China's Foreign Direct Investment (FDI) by using wavelet analysis and intervention analysis and time series analysis and predict the trend of FDI in the next several years. This model eliminates the interference of noise for predicting by using wavelet analysis, and describes the autocorrelation and time-varying volatility of the financial time series by using ARIMA- GARCH-M model. The simulation results show that this model explains the dynamic structure of China's FDI trends well.
[1] Jing Ma Zhao. Guoqing The Test for Chaotic Atractor in China's FDI Inflow and Its Nonlinear Dynamic Prediction:Based on Logistic Models Mathematics in Practice and Theory: 39 20 2009 62 72 [2] Chunlin Li Wang. Huiyan Intervention-ARIMA Forecasts of FDI in Hebei Province Value Engineering 8 2011 124 125 [3] Le Jian Zhao. Yun An application of ARIMA model to predict submicron particle concentrations from meteorological factors at a busy roadside in Hangzhou Science of the Total Environment 426 2012 336 345 [4] Jihong Zhou, Xiaobin Zhou.Application of ARIMA model on the prediction of medium and long-term run off.Journal of Convergence Information Technology:2012;7(1):290-296. [5] Chichen Wang, Yunsheng Hsu, Chenghwai Liou. A comparison of ARIMA forecasting and heuristic modeling.Applied Financial Economics: 2011; (21):1095-1102. [6] Volkan S. Ediger, Sertac Akar. ARIMA forecasting of primary energy demand by fuel in Turkey. EnergyPolicy, 2007; 35:1701-1708. [7] Xiaoxia Dong, Ganqiong Li, Zijie Liu.Choice and Application of Short-term Forecast Method for Agricultural Products Price-Taking Fresh Milk Retail Price as Example.Shandong Agricultural Sciences, 2010;(1):109-113.

Tramway Track: A New Approach for Measuring the Transverse Profile of Worn-Out Rails
Monitoring the wear condition of the tramway superstructure is one of the key points to guarantee an adequate safety level of the light rail transport system. The purpose of this paper is to suggest a new non-conventionalprocedure for measuring the transverse profile of rails in operation by means of image-processing technique. This methodological approach is based on the “information” contained in high-resolution photographic images of tracks and on specific algorithms which allow to obtain the exact geometric profile of the rails and therefore to measure the state of the rail-head extrados wear.Monitoring the wear condition of the tramway superstructure is one of the key points to guarantee an adequate safety level of the light rail transport system. The purpose of this paper is to suggest a new non-conventionalprocedure for measuring the transverse profile of rails in operation by means of image-processing technique. This methodological approach is based on the “information” contained in high-resolution photographic images of tracks and on specific algorithms which allow to obtain the exact geometric profile of the rails and therefore to measure the state of the rail-head extrados wear.
[1] Esveld, C. (2001). Modern Railway Track-Second Edition. MRT Productions. [2] Alippi C., Casagrande E., Scotti F. and Piuri V. (2000). Composite Real-Time Image Processing for Railways Track Profile Measurement. IEEE Transactions on instrumentation and measurement, Vol. 49, n. 3. [3] Guerrieri M., Parla G. and Ticali D. (2012). Mono and Stereoscopic Image Analysis for Detecting the Transverse Profile ofWorn-Out Rails. Procedia - Social and Behavioral Sciences. ISSN:;1; 1877-0428 (SIIV 2012 “Sustainability of Road Infrastructures” Conference proceedings, 29-31 October 2012, Roma, Italy) – [4] Guerrieri M., Parla G. and Ticali D. (2012). A theoretical and experimental approach to reconstructing the transverse profile of worn-out rails. IngegneriaFerroviaria, January 2012, (pp. 23-37), ISSN:;1; 0020-0956. [5] Guerrieri M., Ticali D. (2012). Sustainable mobility in park areas: the potential offered by guided transport systems. International Conference on Sustainable Design and Construction, March 23-25, 2011, Kansas City, Missouri, ASCE (2012). Volume: ICSDC 2011, Integrating Sustainability Practices in the Construction Industry, pp. 661-668, ISBN 9780784412046, ASCE Conf. Proc. doi:10.1061/41204(426)81. [6] Guerrieri M., Ticali D. (2012). Design standards for converting disused railway lines into greenways. International Conference on Sustainable Design and Construction, March 23-25, 2011, Kansas City, Missouri ASCE (2012). Volume: ICSDC 2011, Integrating Sustainability Practices in the Construction Industry, (pp. 654-660), ISBN 9780784412046, ASCE Conf. Proc. doi:10.1061/41204(426)80. [7] Canny J. (1986). A computational approach to edge detection. PAMI(8), No. 6, (pp. 679-698). [8] Gonzales R.C., Woods R. E. (2002). Digital Image Processing 2nd ed. Prentice Hall, Upper Saddle River, New Jersey. [9] Gonzales R.C., Woods R.E, Eddins S.L. (2004). Digital image processing using Matlab. Prentice Hall, Upper Saddle River (New Jersey). [10] Serra J. (1982). Image analysis and mathematical morphology. London, Academic Press. [11] Freeman, H., (1961). Computer Processing of Line Drawing Images. Computing Surveys. 6(1):57-97. [12] TrouillotX., Jourlin M., PinoliJ.C.;1; (2008). Geometric parameters computation with freeman code. Submitted to Image anal stereol, 6 pages. [13] Corriere F., Di Vincenzo D. (2012). The Rail Quality Index as an indicator of the “Global Comfort” in optimizing Safety, Quality and Efficiency in Railway Rails. Procedia - Social and Behavioral Sciences. ISSN:;1; 1877-0428 (SIIV 2012 “Sustainability of Road Infrastructures” Conference proceedings, 29-31 October 2012, Roma, Italy) – [14] RFI (2002). Procedura operativa subdirezionale DMAIMSD P0 IFS 002 0 del 16.01.02, Rilievi della geometria del binario e relative disposizioni manutentive, Rete Ferroviaria Italiana (ItalianRailwayNetrwork).

An Improved Median-based Otsu Image Thresholding Algorithm
Robust and automatic thresholding of gray level images has been commonly used in the field of pattern recognition and computer vision for objects detecting, tracking and recognizing. The Otsu scheme, a widely used image thresholding technique, provides approving results for segmenting a gray level image with only one modal distribution in gray level histogram. However, it provides poor results if the histogram of a gray level is non-bimodal. For enhancing the performance of the Otsu algorithm further, in this work, an improved median-based Otsu image thresholding algorithm is presented. Finally extensive tests are performed and the experiments show that our method obtain more satisfactory results than the original Otsu thresholding algorithm.Robust and automatic thresholding of gray level images has been commonly used in the field of pattern recognition and computer vision for objects detecting, tracking and recognizing. The Otsu scheme, a widely used image thresholding technique, provides approving results for segmenting a gray level image with only one modal distribution in gray level histogram. However, it provides poor results if the histogram of a gray level is non-bimodal. For enhancing the performance of the Otsu algorithm further, in this work, an improved median-based Otsu image thresholding algorithm is presented. Finally extensive tests are performed and the experiments show that our method obtain more satisfactory results than the original Otsu thresholding algorithm.
[1] A Yilmaz, O Javed and M Shah. Object tracking: A survey. ACM Computing Surveys, Vol.38, No.4, (2006), P.1-40. [2] M Sezgin, B Sankur. Survey over image thresholding techniques and quantitative performance evaluation. Journal of Electronic Imaging, Vol.13, No.1, (2004), P.146-168. [3] H F Ng. Automatic thresholding for defect detection. Pattern Recognition Letters, Vol.27, No.14, (2006), P. 1644-1649. [4] N Otsu. A threshold selection method from gray-level histograms. IEEE Transactions on Systems, Man and Cybernetics, Vol.9, No.1, (1979), P.62-66. [5] J N Kapur, P K Sahoo, A K C Wong. A New Method for Gray-level Picture Thresholding Using theEntropy of the Histogram. Computer Vision, Graphics and Image Processing, Vol.29, No.3, (1985), P.273-285. [6] J Kittler, J Illingworth. Minimum Error Thresholding. Pattern Recognition, Vol.19, No.1, (1986), P.41-47. [7] PS Liao, TS Chew, PC Chung. A fast algorithm for multilevel thresholding. Journal of Information Science and Engineering, Vol.17, No.5, (2001), P.713-727. [8] J h Xue, D Michael. Median-based image thresholding. Image and vision computing, Vol.29, (2011), P.631-637. [9] J z Liu, W q Li. The automatic thresholding of gray-level pictures via two-dimensional Otsu method. Acta Automatica Sinica, Vol19, No.1, (1993), P.101-105. [10] J l Fan, F Zhao, X f Zhang. Recursive algorithm for three-dimensional Otsu's thresholding segmentation method. Acta Electronica Sinica, Vol.35, No.7, (2007), P. 1398-1402.

Position Estimation Method for Prism Based Stereovision System
In this paper, a novel position estimation method of prism was proposed for single-lens stereovision system. The prism with multi faces was considered as a single optical system composed of some refractive planes. A transformation matrix which can express the relationship between an object point and its image by the refraction of prism was derived based on geometrical optics, and a mathematical model was introduced which can denote the position of prism with arbitrary faces only by 7 parameters. This model can extend the application of single-lens stereovision system using prism to a more widely area. Experimentation results are presented to prove the effectiveness and robustness of our proposed model.In this paper, a novel position estimation method of prism was proposed for single-lens stereovision system. The prism with multi faces was considered as a single optical system composed of some refractive planes. A transformation matrix which can express the relationship between an object point and its image by the refraction of prism was derived based on geometrical optics, and a mathematical model was introduced which can denote the position of prism with arbitrary faces only by 7 parameters. This model can extend the application of single-lens stereovision system using prism to a more widely area. Experimentation results are presented to prove the effectiveness and robustness of our proposed model.
[1] J. A. Kalomiros and J. Lygouras, Design and hardware implementation of a stereo-matching system based on dynamic programming, MicroProcessors and Microsystems, 35: 496-509(2011). [2] Doo Hyun Lee, InSo Kweon, and Roberto CipollaA, Single Lens Stereo with a Biprism, Proceedings of IAPR Workshop on machine vision applications, pp.17-19(1998). [3] L. Cai, L. He, Y. Xu, Y. Zhao, and X. Yang, Multi-object detection and tracking by stereo vision, Pattern Recogn. 43, 4028-4041(2010). [4] E. Hecht, Theory and Problems of Optics, ser. Schaum's Outline Series, pp. 142-143. [5] Xiaochun.Cao and Hassan Foroosh, Camera calibration and light source orientation from solar shadows, Computer Vision and Image Understanding, 105(1), 60-72(2007). [6] Q. Z. Ye, S.H. Ong and X. Han, A stereovision system for the inspection of IC bonding wires, International Journal of Imaging Systems and Technology, 11, 254-262(2000). [7] A. Goshtasby and W. A. Gruver, Design of a single-lens stereo camera system,Pattern Recognition, 26, 923-936(1993). [8] Doo Hyun Lee, InSo Kweon, Roberto CipollaA, A biprism-stereo camera system,”In Proc. Int. Conf. on Computer Vision and pattern Recognition, 1, 82-87(1999). [9] Doo Hyun Lee and InSo Kweon, A Novel Stereo Camera System by a Biprism, IEEE Transactions on Robotics and Automation. 16(5), 528-541(2000). [10] Kah Bin Lim and Yong Xiao, Virtual stereovision system: new understanding on single-lens stereovision using a biprism, Journal of Electronic Imaging. 14(4), 41-52(2005). [11] Yong Xiao and Kah Bin Lim, A prism-based single-lens stereovision system: From trinocular to multi- ocular, Image and vision Computing. 25, 1725-1736(2007). [12] Xiaoyan Li and Rong Wang, Analysis and Optimization of the Stereo System with a biprism Adapter,Proc. SPIE 7506, 1-8 (2009). [13] Meijun Zhao, Kahbin Lim, Wei Loon Kee. Geometrical-Analysis-Based Algorithm for Stereo Matching of Single-Lens Binocular and Multi-Ocular Stereovision System. Journal of Electronic Science and Technology, 10(2):107-112(2012). [14] Wei Loon Kee, Kah Bin Lim, Daolei Wang. Virtual Epipolar Line Construction of Single-Lens Bi-Prism Stereovision System, Journal of Electronic Science and Technology, 10(2):97-101(2012). [15] Xiaoyu Cui, Kah Bin Lim, Qiyong Guo, and Daolei Wang. Accurate geometrical optics model for single-lens stereovision system using a prism. J Opt. Soc. Am. A 29(9): 1828-1837(2012). [16] Jorge J More. The Levenberg-marquardt algorithm, implementation and theory. Numerical Analysis, Lecture Notes in Mathematics, 630: 105-116(1978).

Research on Power Grid Reasoning Expert System Based on Ontology
Power Grid reasoning expert system is a complex system. To solve knowledge sharing of knowledge Base in expert system, we abstract and analyze the power grid security investigation procedure by using ontology Technology. With ontology-based Power Grid knowledge base, we establish associated relationship of procedure vocabularies. In this paper, we introduce and analyze of semantic reasoning tools such as Jena. The reasoner mechanism and inference rules of grammar has been included and explained. At last we give a specific application of security investigation procedure ontology and reasoning.Power Grid reasoning expert system is a complex system. To solve knowledge sharing of knowledge Base in expert system, we abstract and analyze the power grid security investigation procedure by using ontology Technology. With ontology-based Power Grid knowledge base, we establish associated relationship of procedure vocabularies. In this paper, we introduce and analyze of semantic reasoning tools such as Jena. The reasoner mechanism and inference rules of grammar has been included and explained. At last we give a specific application of security investigation procedure ontology and reasoning.
[1] Brest T, A Semantic Web Framework [Z].(2004.10.12). [2] Seabone A, A Programmer's Introduction to RDQL [Z]. (2004.10-17). [3] Studer R, Knowledge engineering:Principle and methods [J]. Data  &  Knowledge Engineering, 1998, 25(1-2): 161-197. [4] Hakimpour F, Timpf S, Using ontologies for resolution of semantic heterogeneity in GIS[C]. Citeseer, 2001. [5] Buccella, Cechich A, Fillottrani P. Ontology-driven geographic informalion integralion: A survey of current approaches[J]. (computers  & . Geosciencei, 2009, (4Sp. Iss. SI): 710-723. [6] Golfarell M, Proli A, Rizzi S. M-FIRE: A metaphor-based framework for in formalion representation and exploration[A]. WEBIST 2006: Proceedings of the Second Irnernalional Conference on Web Information Syslems and Technologies, Internet Technology/Web Interface and Applications[C]. 2006. 332-340. [7] Neuman Y, Nave O, Metaphor-based meaning excavation[J]. Information Sciences, 2009, 179(16):2719-2728.

Field experience of remote monitored and controlled CP systems
In 1993 the first of a series of cathodic protection (CP) systems were installed on the approach viaducts of a major UK bridge structure. Over subsequent years the structure had additional phases of repairs and CP installations. Due to the requirement to competitively tender each phase, a range of CP systems were installed between 1993 and 2013. The final phase was to replace the various power, control and monitoring systems that had been installed with a smaller number of more up to date units. As part of this process the historic operating performance of each system was employed to optimize the number and size of zones and the number of monitoring probes. In addition, a number of systems were installed but not energized until the final phase had been completed. This paper presents a review of the performance of the systems and the associated control equipment over the twenty year period.


Application of flexi-wall in noise barriers renewal
This paper presents an experimental study on structural performance of an innovative noise barrier consisting of poly-block, light polyurethane foam (LPF) and polyurea. This wall system (flexi-wall) is intended to be employed as a vertical extension to existing noise barriers (sound walls) in an accelerated construction method. To aid in the wall design, several mechanical tests were conducted on LPF specimens and two full-scale walls were then fabricated employing the same LPF material. The full-scale walls were subjected to lateral loading in order to establish their lateral resistance. A cyclic fatigue test was also performed on a full-scale flexi-wall in order to evaluate the performance of the wall under a repetitive loading condition. The results of the experiments indicated the suitability of flexi-wall in accelerated construction and confirmed that the structural performance of the wall system under lateral loading is satisfactory for the sound wall application. The experimental results were discussed and a preliminary design procedure for application of flexi-wall in sound wall applications was also developed.


Damages and causes on the structures during the October 23, 2011 Van earthquake in Turkey
The earthquake in Van Province took place at 13.41 (with local time, GMT+3) on October 23, 2011 with a magnitude of 7.2 in Turkey. The earthquake with an approximate rupture duration of 50s occurred at 43.36 Eastern longitude and 38.75 Northern latitude at a depth of 10–15km below the surface of the earth, triggering an average displacement of 2 m in Northeast–Southwest direction. With Van’s Erciş Town constituting the epicenter, the earthquake was felt in the city center and surrounding villages, along with the nearby provinces of Erzurum, Ağrı, Mardin, Diyarbakır, Muş, Bitlis, Iğdır, Kars, Batman, Siirt and their respective towns. According to the data released by Republic of Turkey, Ministry of Environment and Urban Planning, 2288 buildings fully collapsed as a result of the earthquake. Analyzing the structural characteristics of the region, it is observed that urban centers are dominated by RC buildings, while mostly adobe structures prevail in the rural areas. The on-site technical investigations revealed that the damages were caused mostly by faulty concrete production, defects in reinforcement details and the poor quality of workmanship. In the study, impacts of the mentioned earthquake on the structures in the region and the underlying reasons were analyzed, and a number of recommendations were provided to prevent the repetition of similar flaws.


Evaluating asphalt concrete air void variation via GPR antenna array data
Air void content is one of the most important characteristics of in-place asphalt concrete, substantially affecting early deterioration and long term performance. Destructive measures at limited locations, such as coring, are typically conducted as part of the air-void content evaluation after the pavement has been fully constructed. In this paper, use of an air coupled step-frequency array system for nondestructive assessment of air-void variability is explored. The dielectric properties of the asphalt were determined from the asphalt surface reflection amplitude of all 21 adjacent transmitting and receiving pairs of the array and related to air void content through plotting of dielectric changes with core measured air void content. This approach is an extension of the procedure developed for a single bistatic antenna pair determining properties within top millimeters of the asphalt surface. While cores provide information concerning bulk properties across the depth, the proposed method with an array system provides an opportunity for increased lateral coverage. The case study demonstrated good repeatability and correspondence with core measured air void content. The array-based method improves the coverage and productivity of the measurements, making it an attractive alternative to current state-of-the-practice procedures.


Application of microCT to the non-destructive testing of an additive manufactured titanium component
In this paper the application of X-ray microCT to the non-destructive testing of an additive manufactured titanium alloy component of complex geometry is demonstrated. Additive manufacturing of metal components is fast growing and shows great promise, yet these parts may contain defects which affect mechanical properties of the components. In this work a layered form of defect is found by microCT, which would have been very difficult or impossible to detect by other non-destructive testing methods due to the object complexity, defect size and shape and because the pores are entirely contained inside the object and not connected to the surface. Additionally, this test part was subjected to hot isostatic pressing (HIPPING) and subsequently scanned. Comparing before and after scans by alignment of the volumes allows visualization and quantification of the pore size changes. The application of X-ray microCT to additive manufacturing is thus demonstrated in this example to be an ideal combination, especially for process improvements and for high value components.


Simulation and measurement of ferromagnetic impurities in non-magnetic aeroengine turbine disks using fluxgate magnetometers
In this paper, ferromagnetic impurities in paramagnetic aeroengine turbine disks are investigated. Because such inclusions represent a significant threat in aviation, a detailed analysis is required for impured turbine disks. For this purpose, sensitive fluxgate magnetometers are used. After a premagnetisation, this sensor is able to detect small ferromagnetic particles by recording the variation of the magnetic flux density while the disk rotates below the sensor head. This trajectory creates a unique signature. However, the measured signatures are often distorted. A main reason for these distortions is that the particles are not oriented in axial direction (in the direction of the disks axis). Up to now, it was not possible to interpret the measured signatures. Thus, a simulation tool has been developed that provides a catalogue of different magnetic flux density distributions of typical orientations, positions and various distances to the fluxgate magnetometer position. For these simulations, the particles are assumed to be dipoles. As part of impurities are not caused by concentrated particles but by elongated ones, so-called or dipole lines, the model has been expanded for these cases by using numerical integration techniques. Measurements verify the assumption to approximate impurities by dipoles.


Thermally activated reaction–diffusion-controlled chemical bulk reactions of gases and solids
The chemical kinetics of the reaction of thin films with reactive gases is investigated. The removal of thin films using thermally activated solid–gas to gas reactions is a method to in-situ control deposition inventory in vacuum and plasma vessels. Significant scatter of experimental deposit removal rates at apparently similar conditions was observed in the past, highlighting the need for understanding the underlying processes. A model based on the presence of reactive gas in the films bulk and chemical kinetics is presented. The model describes the diffusion of reactive gas into the film and its chemical interaction with film constituents in the bulk using a stationary reaction–diffusion equation. This yields the reactive gas concentration and reaction rates. Diffusion and reaction rate limitations are depicted in parameter studies. Comparison with literature data on tokamak co-deposit removal results in good agreement of removal rates as a function of pressure, film thickness and temperature.


Conceptual study of ferromagnetic pebbles for heat exhaust in fusion reactors with short power decay length
Ferromagnetic pebbles are investigated as high heat flux (q∥) plasma facing components in fusion devices with short power decay length (λq) on a conceptual level. The ability of a pebble concept to cope with high heat fluxes is retained and extended by the acceleration of ferromagnetic pebbles in magnetic fields. An alloying concept suited for fusion application is outlined and the compatibility of ferromagnetic pebbles with plasma operation is discussed.Steel grade 1.4510 is chosen as a well characterized candidate material to perform an analysis of the heating process. Scaling relationships as a function of q∥ for maximum and optimal pebble diameter, allowed exposure time, and removal time safety margin are obtained numerically for spherical pebble geometry. The acceleration of ferromagnetic pebbles in a tokamak resulting from magnetic gradients is studied and operation parameters for an ITER-based reactor are outlined. Counter-intuitively, it is found that ferromagnetic pebbles perform better for narrow λq profiles, making them an attractive heat exhaust concept for next step devices and thus an option to be investigated in detail.The key results of this study are that very high heat fluxes are accessible in the operation space of ferromagnetic pebbles, that ferromagnetic pebbles are compatible with tokamak operation and current divertor designs, that the heat removal capability of ferromagnetic pebbles increases as λq decreases and, finally, that for fusion relevant values of q∥ pebble diameters below 100μm are required.


